\n                        \n                            This company is not yet accredited. To learn more, see reviews below or 
. Want to know more about ConsumerAffairs accredited brands? Check out 
Please be aware that TiVo customer service and tech support are notoriously bad. My own experience with them was extremely frustrating: the new Bolt I purchased for $300 soon developed major defects, they sent me a "refreshed" unit with even more defects and I went around and around with them for many months, being continually lied to and misrepresented by their employees (mostly making promises that were never fulfilled). I finally documented all written contacts with them then disputed bogus charges with my credit company - and won! Recommend you check out: https://www.consumeraffairs.com/entertainment/tivo.html. I believe they hope dissatisfied customers will just give and go away, which many do due to the extreme frustration of dealing with this company.
\n            \n                \n                    Be the first one to find this review helpful\n                \n            \n        
"Loved the idea of the TiVo Box but once we decided it wasn't going to work out for us, we were stuck with making payments for a year. Called to explain why it wouldn't work and they didn't seem to care. I get it's only $15 a month but what a stupid thing to hold on to as a company. Maybe I'd be back, maybe I could find a way to make it work but now I will never use or recommend anyone to use this service. It's too bad."
\n            \n                \n                    Be the first one to find this review helpful\n                \n            \n        
\n                    Get expert advice delivered right to your inbox\n                
We try to avoid the fluff and deliver tips and guides that really matter
hank you, you have successfully subscribed to our newsletter!
"Multiple phone calls and no resolution. Very poorly trained staff, who make you walk through a series of troubleshooting steps each time, even though you just did them. The result is that you can never get anything actually resolved in less than an hour. Also, they ask you questions, then don't listen to the answer \xe2\x80\x93 and ask the same question seconds later."
"I purchased my TiVo over 2 years ago and really appreciated it. They appeared to have spent a lot of time on human interface issues, especially searching for shows. I even went and purchased a lifetime subscription. About a month ago, they made some firmware changes and I noticed two new things that really bothered me; - Before the highlight color was yellow and now it's white; the white is much more glaring, harder to read, and annoying. - Before, when I turned on my TV set using the TiVo remote control, I would have to wait for about 10 secs to get video."
t the same time I would get audio AND control of volume and mute. This was particularly important to me because our bedroom is next to my room and if the volume would come on while my wife was sleep it would disturb her. Since I got control immediately, I could hit the mute button and at worst I would get a short chirp if there was audio going on. Now it takes another 10 secs after video, with the audio at the old volume setting, before I would get control which would be enough to wake her up.
"I contacted TiVo for the first time about a month ago, explained the issue and impressed on them that these changes ONLY occurred after their firmware changes. I still had to call them at least 6 times as well as send them emails and they kept putting me off. They had me reboot the TiVo 4 times, they sent me a new remote control, they interrogated my box several times and had me go through resynching my remote control at least 3 times, etc. The first tech that I talked to stated that it could be the hard drive since, from his experience, if the hard drive started to fail it could impact the TiVo - TV communications. I changed the hard drive and it didn't make any difference."
o see if something in my TV set was causing this. I connected my VCR to the TV, powered it on, and I got video, audio, and control of volume and mute all in 10 secs. Identically how my TiVo used to work. Today, after many calls and delays, they finally agreed to replacing the box but it would be treated as a regular hardware replace. They would be generous and only charge me $79 instead of $149. And I had to send in my box and get a return in 1 to 2 weeks. If I wanted to go a cross-shipment I would have to give them a deposit of $499. So, for a problem that they caused I would have to pay $79 and be without a TV in my room for up to 2 weeks.
"I am very disappointed and frustrated with them. If I could be assured that they would really replace my box with a new one, transfer my lifetime subscription, and have everything work like it did a month ago I'd pay the money but I don't have confidence that this would really happen. I no longer have confidence in TiVo since they don't stand behind their product."
"I went out and bought a TiVo Bolt and Mini thinking that would be the answer to my frustration with high cable TV prices. I got the hardware installed and signed up for everything online, give them a credit card number for month by month subscription until I decided whether the service was right for me or not. After a few months I realized that it really didn't give me what I needed. I still had to subscribe to Netflix Hulu Amazon in order to give all of the programming that I wanted and TiVo just didn't seem worthwhile."
"I went online to try to cancel my subscription but after being able to do everything else online discovered that the one thing they won't let you do online have to call and talk to somebody. I tried calling but got frustrated waiting in the queue so gave up. About that time the credit card I was using expired so I decided to simply let the subscription end for non-payment. Now they are billing me for $89 for that nonpayment. When I didn\xe2\x80\x99t pay it they turned it over to a collection agency that I am now dealing with. Not to mention a couple hundred dollars of useless equipment. Wish I read the reviews here before getting involved with this awful company!"
\n            \n              How do I know I can trust these reviews about TiVo?\n            \n        
\n                    946,432 reviews on ConsumerAffairs are verified.\n                
\n                    We require contact information to ensure our reviewers are real.
\n                    We use intelligent software that helps us maintain the integrity of reviews.
\n                    Our moderators read all reviews to verify quality and helpfulness.
For more information about reviews on ConsumerAffairs.com please visit our\n                
"I have been a long time customer of TiVo. Just recently I started having issues with my TiVo Roamio and its HDMI port. I called tech support and they had me go through all the basic steps, which I understand. My TiVo Roamio was deemed 'defective' and support sent me out a replacement. The replacement box that I received was defective and would hardly boot up before rebooting itself. I called support, they had me go through all the same troubleshooting techniques again. They deemed that the replacement box was defective, so they sent me out another box. I received the 2nd replacement box and yes, that too was defective. It wasn't an issue with booting up this time, it booted up but the screen was pixelated to the point where it could hardly be read. I started doubting myself here and tested many different scenarios - different HDMI cables, different TVs, etc - nothing."
"I called support, they had me go through all the same troubleshooting techniques again (now it's starting to get a little old) - and they deemed this box defective as well. They sent me out another box. Keep track here, this is the 3rd replacement box. This box worked! Was on a brand new (Completely different brand) TV, UPS, top of the line HDMI cable, anything I could think of that would cause an issue like this. After about 45 days - the HDMI stopped working. I called support, I explained the issue, they had me go through all the troubleshooting techniques and they deemed the box was defective. They were just getting ready to setup a replacement and (this would have been the 4th replacement - my 5th TiVo Roamio) and after a brief hold they told me they did not have any record of my support agreement. They must have some record of what has occurred that shows I had a support agreement, right?!"
"The technical representative was very quick to get me off the line and transfer me to a customer support representative who could look into why I no longer had any record of my support agreement, which don't come cheap if you have ever purchased one. When I finally got to the representative on the phone she saw record of my support agreement and couldn't understand why it was no longer on my account. I was placed on hold, and she came back and said I was no longer eligible to receive replacement boxes. She couldn't explain why - I was asking if I had reached a 'limit of liability' of some sort, but one would think that since I was given essentially 3 faulty replacement boxes that even if there was a liability limit that I would not be subject to that clause. After going back and forth, she said that if I wished, I could extend my warranty for another two years - but I was limited to only ONE replacement box."
"This is outrageous. Why would I pay even more money for the chance that yet another replacement box would work? I find it completely unacceptable and disappointing that TiVo would not only offer such poor support, send out non-functional replacement boxes under their warranty program, but not even stand behind the fact that I have a contract with them to ensure my box is working. I would drop the company all together if I hadn't paid for the lifetime subscription on the TiVo Roamio, and purchased 4 TiVo Minis to work with it. I have a lot invested in this system that is still covered under warranty, but TiVO will not support. Absolutely unacceptable. Buyers beware."
"I upgraded a lifetime service agreement on one of my 2 Premier TiVOs to a new Bolt 10 days ago. The sales rep for TiVO, who was NOT located in the USA, transferred the wrong TiVO Premier lifetime service from a machine I still intend to use. Trying to explain this situation to the various foreign representatives has taken at least 20 phone calls to TiVO and, to date, developed 5 different Case Numbers in the past 10 days. I have requested a representative based in the USA to speak to about this issue. The only thing TiVO has done is to close the Cases without ever talking to me, by voice, or email, or pony express for that matter. This company's customer service is a cruel joke."
We have now owned three TiVos. The most recent being the BOLT. It has just failed and is less than two years old. TiVo insists the only way to transfer our purchase of a lifetime subscription is if they ship to us a new one and we return the nonfunctional TiVo. This whole transaction will take 5 to 6 days. We are requesting that we go and buy a new one now and then ship back to defective one, but TiVo will NOT accommodate us. We would have to buy another lifetime guarantee. This is not customer service! We have spent hours on the phone with TiVo going round and round about this with zero customer service, little to no understanding of what we are saying. They LOVE to put you on hold forever hoping you will hang up or go away. If you are in the market for inferior equipment, horrific customer service and wasting hours of your time, this is your product!
"I purchased a TiVo Bolt. I'm on the road all of the time, so I do not need cable or satellite service. The Bolt works great. The problem is the TiVo Mini's. This is the second one they sent me to fix the problem. It is worse than the first one... The problem is... For those of you who work with computer hardware and software like me. If the wifi card is active and the Ethernet port is also active, they will not be compatible. There is no way to deactivate either one... With so many complaints with this product, you will think they can fix it!!!"
My TIVO Bolt worked for 4 months, but has had issues for over 2 months. Calling support results in the same response. "Unplug the unit, Unplug the modem, do this multiple times" while I am put on hold for 5-10 minutes at a time. Then wait 5-10 days and try it again. When asking to speak to a supervisor usually results in a dropped call. The couple of times I got someone, I was again put on hold for 5-10 minutes. I finally got them to send a new unit, which had a different problem.
fter going through multiple calls, they finally agreed to take the new unit back and send another unit. Surprise, the new unit had the same issue as the first replacement. Now I am told it is a known issue and to wait another 15-20 days for a fix. I have had 14 different service log numbers and spent over 4 hours on the phone with TIVO. I purchased a one year contract upfront, which I now know was a mistake. I plan to cancel as soon as possible and never deal with TIVO again. I rated them a 1 only because there was no 0 option. I hope this save someone the aggravation of dealing with this company.
IVO Discontinued My Lifetime Service. What is the point of paying for Lifetime service if TiVo is just going to cancel it whenever they feel like it? I\'m sure there is something in their legal mumbo-jumbo that allows them to do it but they shouldn\'t be able to call it "lifetime" service if it isn\'t. They should call it "lifetime service until we cancel it", at least that would be truth in advertising. Very sad because I have used Tivo for over 10 years and I hate the idea of using another service.
"Like many others on this thread, I had excellent service and luck with TiVo. I have two Series 2 boxes which have run for 10+ years with little incidents. If/when there were incidents, I'd call the TiVo Tech Support line and they'd invariably help me fix the problem quickly and professionally. In February, I got an email saying the Series 2 boxes would not be supported much longer. They had a great offer to transfer my lifetime service onto a new Bolt. I bought a Bolt and a TiVo Mini to connect to the machine. I then got emails saying the supply was not meeting demand and the delivery was on hold awaiting their manufacturer. I got the new Bolt a few weeks later and got it all running with the TiVo Mini. I really liked streaming off the box onto my phone feature because I travel for business. "
"All was working well until a few weeks ago. I spent 10+ hours on phone with TiVo Support and Verizon as TiVo often blames the provider. Then TiVo sent me a replacement box. I got it, plugged it in, called TiVo to activate. It didn't work. Called Verizon. Spent 3+ hours on phone trying to get it to work. Called TiVo back. Spent another 3+ hours. Finally, I plugged my Series3 boxes back in and they work fine. So, after 20+ hours of working on this, I called TiVo and they're refunding my money. It appears these Bolts are just not working."
"Customer for 9 years. Premiere box in 2008, then Roamio Plus in 2014. Premiere died two years ago (hard drive kaput). Roamio is still alive. The interface for the DVR function is fabulous and the recording function seldom fails. But over the years as streaming and wireless connectivity has taken on a bigger role, Tivo has lagged far behind. During that same timeframe I have owned Apple TV (two boxes) and Amazon box. Never ever an issue with them streaming. Tivo not so much. Once a month Tivo box fails to connect with Tivo's homeland to download the TV listings (without which, Tivo can't record). When that happens, you need to check under the hood and tinker because Tivo support only ever has one solution: reboot your router (then reboot your cable modem then reboot Tivo then start rebooting everything again). "
"I don't even know the support phone numbers for Apple and Amazon because I have never had to call them. Tivo offers a link to Netflix and Youtube just like Apple. Choosing the Tivo link instead of Apple is madness - freezes up midway through any show. Same top of the line router, same distance from it. And the Tivo smartphone app? HaHaHa..."
Purchased three (3) TiVo units that are now 3, 4 and 5 years old respectively - all with lifetime service. Approximately six months ago, the channel guide would not download correctly to all three devices requiring a call into customer support. TiVo acknowledges the problem promising a fix but it has only gotten worse. The temporary fix is to reboot the DVR. After contacting TiVo again for the third time with yet another ticket number, I elected to reach out again by phone.
I first spoke with Muriel who then passed me on to her supervisor, Patrick. In the course of our discussion, Patrick suggested, given the age of my 5 year old unit, that problems are to be expected. I argued, "What therefore, is the value of a Lifetime Service Plan if it is only expected to last 5 years?" Flustered, he proceeded to ramble on with a stream of nonsensical gibberish only to hang up on me.
"Patrick's 5 year admission only serves to confirm that TiVo's long term, life time plans are meaningless. Their business model is based on two elements, 1) monthly service fees and 2) selling new hardware. Bear in mind, there's nothing wrong with my hardware - it's a software issue. As a software developer, there's no easier way for a technology company to render a product worthless than by breaking the software with which its hardware is dependent. TiVo does not want their solutions lasting beyond 5 years - consequently, there's no value in purchasing a TiVo."
"I have had a Tivo DVR since the company's launch. I recently acquired a BOLT after nearly 2 months of fooling around with fixing the #3 generation TIVO. I can't begin to describe the hassle I've encountered -- everything from payment to order to technical support. I suspect that TIVO's recent acquisition by a larger company may have something to do with the problems I've encountered. Now after about 3 weeks of use, the BOLT box I installed isn't working and TIVO is mailing me another. I am ready to pull the plug and use the less user friendly but at least less expensive cable DVR. Don't make an investment in this technology unless you're willing to put up with consistent problems across the board. It's too bad as this used to be a very well run company."
"Like other reviewers, I upgraded my TiVo box, then found out a year later I was being billed for two TiVos... I guess this is standard rip off for them. Now I'm trying to cancel my account, they won't let me! Ridiculous! I will have to cancel the card they are billing. I don't know how to prove I'm trying to cancel this. It's outright robbery. Beware."
I canceled my service two months ago with TiVo after 12 years as a loyal customer. Imagine my surprise when I was billed a couple of days ago for the canceled service. I called today to inquire and was told that the first rep had offered me two months of free service as compensation and since I didn\'t call back to cancel before that time was up, my service was continued and I was billed. Let me be clear, the first rep said he was extending free service so that I could "sell the box" and due to my loyalty. He never once mentioned my having to call back into re-cancel. And now they refuse to refund me for this month. This is very, very poor customer service and TiVo has lost a very loyal customer forever.
"When you call the phone number for Tivo, you no longer get a person in the United States. They no longer have any representation here. If you think as an American I am giving my information to total strangers in the Philippines, think again! Tivo has completely gone downhill. Worst company ever. No wonder everyone has billing issues. And they will lie and tell you that no one can talk right now in the States... Do you get this. There is no more USA jobs for Tivo or Tivo support!!! Know how I know, the supervisor in the Philippines told me so!!! Don't buy a Tivo. They are no longer a good company. It is terribly sad. It's all about them getting your $$$."
I ordered top of the line Tivo, Tivo Mini and service. Received product and when I connected, I was told it would not work with my equipment or service. I immediately returned $1000.00 worth of equipment and was told I would be refunded within 10 days of them receiving it. It has been 20 days and still no refund. When I try to contact customer service, I am disconnected. I have tried email and they acknowledge receiving the email but offer no resolution. This is INSANE.
iVo makes it nearly impossible to cancel. They want to bill you forever, even after you\'ve stopped using their service. They let you sign up online, but you can\'t cancel online. I call them and they pretend they can\'t find my account, even though I give them my name and phone number - the info they request and the info my account was registered with. They play games and will probably turn account over to collection agency once it totals a few hundred bucks. The last time I called them to cancel - June 19, 2017 at 14:44, a gal who called herself "Ann" claimed she couldn\'t find my account; refused to give a last name, employee number or any way to really identify her and refused my three requests to speak to a supervisor. BEWARE - CROOKS!
hree months ago I "thought" I was going to "enjoy" Tivo when I discovered the same day of Tivo activation that I had a serious mold issue! Part of the foundation as well as walls and flooring in approximately one third of my home has gone through the long and intricate remediation process of demolition and building! I discovered that my credit card was paying for the monthly Tivo that I had NEVER EVER even had a chance to turn on and watch even a single TV show of any kind!
I called Tivo and asked to have my account suspended as I had this terrible problem! THEY ARE SO GREEDY! No they would not suspend it! They had to cancel for a penalty of 75.00 or I could continue to pay for nothing as well! Very bad customer relation! I think with the loss I have now into this and the BULLY behavior I experienced with this VERY arrogant company that I will just throw this idea away and put it all behind me! I hope anyone who wishes to experience the Tivo service that they research it thoroughly! Very expensive mistake I made in this one sided uncaring company!
When I purchased a new Bolt a year ago, I cancelled service on the old Premiere. I just found out that I have been being charged 14.99 a month for 12 months for that Premiere. Customer support said I never requested cancellation of the Premiere and that I had been carrying two services for the years. They also said they would not refund the money because it had been my responsibility to stop the service.
I want to warn prospective customers that units are expensive, mostly defective and built not to last (tried both Roamio and Bolt). Charged $300 for a TiVo Bolt. Subscription is $14.99/month. Warranty is only for 90 days, after which they try to sell you a "refurbished" unit for an additional cost of $149! Then try to rip customers off further with selling "service agreements". The front green light on my almost 13-month-old Bolt suddenly stopped lighting up. The unit would not respond in any way to the remote. The light on the back was on and I could hear the fan running. I checked online - seems to be a common problem - and went through all the recommended steps, including unplugging the unit, trying to set up again, etc. but nothing worked.
When I called tech support, I was first told that they only offer a 90-day warranty but would send me a "refurbished" unit for a cost of $149. Told them I would not be forced or coerced into paying them AGAIN for a practically new $300 unit. They agreed to send me a \'refreshed?\' unit (with no cords or remote) at no charge. I spent hours transferring my saved programs onto the new unit, with phone help from TiVo. Within a week, the so-called refurbished/refreshed unit started to cut out sound, freeze screen picture and kept losing connectivity with my WiFi (the latter of which was working perfectly with my laptops and printer combo). I then wasted hours on the phone with a variety of tech support and customer service staff. For my "frustration and inconvenience," I was promised a brand new Bolt with attachments. A week later, another "refreshed" unit with no attachments was received.
ince then I have called several times, always maintaining politeness to reps in both tech support and customer service. I was assured that my case would be escalated to a supervisor and promised a call within 3 days - which never came. I called again May 8th, was disconnected several times, even when "escalated" to a supervisor twice (with no call back, despite them verifying my phone number on my account). Bottom line, they sell you an expensive product, charge you a monthly subscription fee, and don\'t give a damn about selling a lasting product or customer service.
I am not writing this to be vindictive, but to warn others not to get sucked into this giant scam. Yes, it\'s a good service - WHEN IT WORKS! Do NOT trust a "refreshed" unit - both a replacement Roamio and Bolt were defective from the start. They also make every effort to get customers to pay another 50% of the cost of a new unit that was only purchased 13 months prior.
"HDMI Input stopped working a couple months after purchase. I called TIVO who not only refused a refund, they charged me $75 to cancel my service early! Terrible company! They know this is an issue (Google it!) and they are scamming people that bought one. Don't EVER do business with TIVO!!"
We have always liked TIVO for 10 plus years until we bought the Bolt and this is a disaster. We are disgusted with TIVO. After a month of not programming properly and TIVO not answering any questions about their problems they finally sent out an email saying the problem was fixed. After doing all they asked we find out they messed up yet again. I would like to know if they are ever going to get this problem with recording one passes. We are so very disappointed in them.
oday, my TiVo Mini just refuse to work. It was working fine yesterday, but today, nope. I tried to do some troubleshooting myself, but it would not work. I called tech support and, after about 30 minutes of unplugging everything, etc., etc., the tech guy said I had to replace the Mini. I believe it is barely more than one year old. So, I have to pay $79 to get another one, but they will not send it out until I Fedex them the broken one. So, this process will take about a week during which time, obviously, no TV service in the main room of the house.
With what they charge for their equipment and service fees, I expect a better quality product. Or, if something happens, I expect them to make it work ASAP and not wait until I find a box to mail them a faulty piece of equipment. I could use the box the replacement is coming in - IF I COULD GET IT. And, as a further insult, TiVo has already charged my credit card for the full amount of the replacement - which is not being sent to me. I will never recommend TiVo to anyone and am considering getting another service, myself.
I have had a TIVO Roamio for a couple of years and have really enjoyed it. I decided to purchase a TIVO Bolt. I started the activation process and found out that I would be committed to paying the monthly price regardless of whether or not I used it. It is absolutely ridiculous that you must purchase their hardware (which would be useless without a subscription), and then be held to pay on a monthly basis regardless of use. I wonder if Donald Trump owns a share of this company. It\'s something he would do to take advantage of people with limited income. I told the "advanced" customer service representative that I did not agree with the terms and he hung up on me. 
"I am returning the TIVO Bolt to Best Buy (letting them know why they need to take the device back) and I am going to find out if I will be committed to a year subscription for the Roamio I currently have when the current year expires. If so, I'm done with that. If more customers refused to be held hostage, TIVO would get a clue and treat us with some respect."
"Terrible customer service and product support. After 2 different TiVos and 4 different cable cards I am still receiving a V52 error. Tivo customer service was rude and condescending. Although this is a known problem with TiVos they act like I'm the only one that has ever had this problem, which is completely untrue. They should not sell a product that they cannot honestly support. Really too bad, this used to be a great company. Unfortunately, not anymore."
Happy customer for over 10 years. I was really surprised to see all the negative reviews. Tivo has state side support and always seem friendly and helpful to me. They stand behind their product better than most companies. But it does come at a price, you buy the equipment and pay a subscription.
"I have no idea how far to go with the horrid support. I have been a Tivo owner since 2004 and simplicity has been the reason... That is gone. I literally lost 2-3 weeks of my life due to a defective unit. Not only did it not work until it was replaced over two weeks later (I requested it be replaced right away) but they insisted to be patient and keep downloading updates even though as long as it was hooked up I couldn't use my tv at all... Two weeks of no tv and missed shows and spending most of my time forcing updates or calling and playing games is absurd. My time is valuable and obviously tivo doesn't seem to care. I even got one support agent talking down to me and literally gaslighting me. No one should get that from tech support."
"The only reason I even got a replacement was because after the abuse I Insisted on talking to a manager as my desire to return it was ignored. He sent one out asap. I asked about a previous unit that was supposed to come to me a week earlier and it was never sent even though support kept claiming it was on its way. They also kept insisting a new unit wouldn't fix the problem even though a new unit worked perfectly out of the box. I lost weeks worth of functionality, time and stress I didn't need."
"It's not too much to ask a company to respect your time is valuable. My time lost could have bought 10 bolts... this refurbished one... which I only bought due to the discounted price wasn't worth it. It's working fine now but I feel compromised keeping it. I just don't want to fight with them anymore. When it expires I highly doubt I will ever use tivo again. If you get the runaround DON'T play their game. Insist on returning it or getting a new one ASAP and insist if it doesn't arrive in time to take it back. Although I doubt they will. You'd think they respect your desire to return things but I can't force them to live up to their legal responsibility without a lawyer."
\n                    TiVo expert review by Jonathan Trout\n                
iVo first appeared in 1999 with the DVR. Today it offers the TiVo BOLT, a streaming device that turns your TV into a smart TV by integrating your favorite streaming apps like Hulu, Netflix, Sling TV and more. The BOLT comes in a 500GB, 1TB and 3TB storage capacities. That comes out to be about 75, 150 and 450 hours of show and movie storage capability. Pricing starts at $199.99 for the 500GB BOLT, $299.99 for the 1TB and $499.99 for the 3TB.
\n                                You have three options when it comes to TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s service plans. You can pay a monthly service fee of $14.99, an annual service fee of $149.99 or an all-in service plan for a one-time payment of $549.99. The monthly plan comes with a one-year commitment and a $75 early termination fee.\n                            
"\n                                By using the TiVo BOLT box instead of your cable provider's box, you can integrate your cable TV subscription with your streaming services subscriptions and puts them all in one place. This lets you avoid monthly rental and DVR fees from your cable company.\n                            "
\n                                SkipMode on the BOLT makes sure you never have to watch commercials again. Not only that, but you\xe2\x80\x99ll never have to fast forward commercials again. One button lets you skip a whole commercial break and resume your show exactly where it picks up again.\n                            
\n                                4K UHD TVs are slowly creeping into the market as the next big thing. TiVo BOLT is 4K compatible so you can get all the clarity, color and detail your new TV offers.\n                            
\n                                TiVo BOLT lets your record four shows at once for up to 150 hours of HD programming (for the standard model). Watch your recorded shows on your TV or your mobile device.\n                            
\n                                You can stream content from the TiVo BOLT on up to ten TVs as long as you have a TiVo Mini for each TV ($150 each).\n                            
\n                                    people who want to integrate their cable subscription and streaming service subscriptions in one place.\n                                
s a member of the ConsumerAffairs Research Team, Jonathan Trout believes having access to free, comprehensive information on products and businesses is vital to making smart purchasing decisions. He focuses his efforts on researching and reviewing multiple brands across a variety of industries, with the goal of writing unbiased buyers guides to help inform consumers on impending purchases.
Your use of this site constitutes acceptance of the 
dvertisements on this site are placed and controlled by outside advertising networks. ConsumerAffairs.com does not evaluate or endorse the products and services advertised. See the 
he information on this Web site is general in nature and is not intended as a substitute for competent legal advice. ConsumerAffairs.com makes no representation as to the accuracy of the information herein provided and assumes no liability for any damages or loss arising from the use thereof.
Copyright \xc2\xa9 2017 Consumers Unified LLC. All Rights Reserved. ConsumerAffairs 
. The contents of this site may not be republished, reprinted, rewritten or recirculated without written permission.
450 hours of HD recording space. \nSix tuners. \n4K output to UHD TVs. \nSpeed viewing and commercial skip functions. \nOneSearch and OnePass combs both broadcast schedules and streaming services.
"Pricey. \nDigital cable only. \nCurved design isn't practical."
he Bolt+ is an upgraded DVR for TiVo power users who want 4K support, six tuners, hundreds of hours of recording time, and are willing to pay a high price for it.
"Readers' Choice Awards 2016: Consoles, Streaming Devices, and Services"
"When it's time to relax, there is plenty of video to watch and games to play. But which services and devices are best?"
Is OnePlus just another name marketing ploy from Oppo to gain an edge over the market?
imilarity between One Plus 5T and Oppo R11 S is not just ...
We will be focusing on Quantum Computing: Nadella
ccording to the CEO, the next wave in the digital revolution is ...
 week with the Google Pixel 2 XL
"First-hand account of Google's new powerful smartphone"
How to pick the right storage for your desktop or laptop
From HDD to M.2, here is everything that you should know before ...
Xiaomi is slowly shifting focus and that could be a problem for the brand
he company should focus on improving their service channel, quality control and ...
\n      PCMag India is operated by Times Internet Limited under license from ZiffDavis\n      \n      \n      
 smaller, faster media box to meet your TV watching needs -- at home or away
iVo Bolt DVR streams 4K and streamlines the way you watch TV
"Whether you're a cable cutter or you just want to ditch your cable provider's DVR, TiVo's latest box has something for you. Its handy new features make watching your favorite shows -- whatever the source -- more enjoyable."
he TiVo Bolt combines a best-in-class DVR experience with a streaming media box; it has the capability to stream and download recorded content to iOS and Android devices; and easy expansion to other rooms with TiVo Mini extenders; skip commercials on primetime TV recordings with a single button press; excellent cross-service search.
he still-required monthly or "lifetime" service fees raise the total cost of ownership; though the app selection is very good, you still may need another streaming-media box to fill in the gaps; doesn\'t work with satellite or AT&T U-verse.
he TiVo Bolt makes a strong claim to the throne as king of DVRs and streaming media, but those pesky TiVo service fees keep it short of perfection.
"TiVo's supply of on-demand apps continues to grow, but at the moment this includes Netflix, Amazon Instant Video with Prime, Hulu Plus (coming soon to Bolt), YouTube, Yahoo, Aol On, Vudu, Plex, Web Video Hotlist and HSN for video. Spotify, iHeartRadio and Pandora are available for music. Also, the app platform is based on the Opera web browser, and the Bolt has access to apps developed for that browser. "
\n                    The best iPhone asks you to think different\n                
\n                    Google Home Mini sounds great but lacks vision.\n                
\n                    Google Pixel 2 XL: What we know so far\n                
"\n                    August's affordable Smart Lock is solid, even sans Siri\n                "
\n                            Hell in a Cell: The surprising story behind the Reddit meme\n                        
"\n                            You may soon be testing Microsoft's next software\n                        "
\n                            FCC chairman calls Twitter the real threat to an open internet\n                        
"Be respectful, keep it clean and stay on topic.  We'll remove comments that violate our policy."
\xc2\xa9 CBS Interactive Inc. \xc2\xa0/\xc2\xa0 All Rights Reserved.
CBS might turn \xe2\x80\x98Entertainment Tonight\xe2\x80\x99 into its own streaming service
HDMI 2.1 is here with 10K and Dynamic HDR support
YouTube pulled 150,000 videos of children over predatory comments
\n                HDMI 2.1 is here with 10K and Dynamic HDR support\n              
11.28.17\n
\n                How to find the best 4K TV for your space\n              
11.22.17\n
\n                Facebook Messenger will now send your photos in 4K \n              
11.21.17\n
"\n                Leica's CL gives an iconic design the modern tech it deserves\n              "
11.21.17\n
iVo Bolt review: Getting smaller and faster has a price
10.18.15\n
"TiVo has been in the DVR game for the better part of two decades, and even in the slow-paced TV world, that's enough time to see lots of change. Surprisingly, with the "
". The company seems to have realized it's not just trying to beat your cable or satellite company's half-assed excuse for a set-top box, as Apple, Google, Roku, Amazon and others join game systems and Blu-ray players in a fight for living room dominance. Now, TiVo has a new design and, for the first time, a solution for easily skipping commercials. Still, that might not be enough to make the Bolt (starting at $300) a good buy."
\n            Gallery: TiVo Bolt Review | 10 Photos\n          
Commercial skipping is easy to use and works as promised
QuickMode is the best way to binge watch in a hurry
"Lifetime"TiVo service just got way more expensive
o out-of-home streaming yet, no six-tuner or 3TB option
kipMode sometimes failed to appear on shows where it should
"The Bolt isn't for cord-cutters, or power TiVo users who value Lifetime service or need more recording space and tuners. But for the casual TV viewer who just wants a better cable box without making a huge upfront investment? Even with an interestingly curved frame, it's a perfect fit -- all while piling on extras like commercial skipping and sending recordings to your phones and tablets."
"You can check out our preview for most of our impressions of the hardware, which continued to hold up under further use. The Bolt's bent shape means you won't be stacking anything on it, but it's so much smaller than the TiVos of old, we don't think most people will have a problem fitting it in their cabinets somehow. In my living room it was virtually silent, and you can turn off the lights on the front, as on previous models. It's missing analog video/audio outputs, but that's about all you'll have to give up for the size of this relatively diminutive DVR."
Inside, TiVo has switched to a 2.5-inch hard drive, which some owners have already taken a shot at 
WeaKnees is selling units with 2TB drives
"about the bottom-mounted fan (positioned where the box is curved so it can get some air) being too loud. If it's in a spot that can provide vibrations or echoes, it could be much louder than other DVRs, since there's less space for the air to flow through."
"Judging by the style of TiVo's refreshed logo, the Bolt's arc shape is something fans will need to get used to, at least for certain units. I like it, but for many it's disconcerting at best, and annoyingly incompatible with stacking at worst. I'd be shocked to see if the new "
"The software has been revamped, but with a light touch -- it's still TiVo. A new style with flatter icons and channel logos gives it a more modern look, but if you already liked the UI, it's not a big change. I'm not sure if it's the new hardware inside the Bolt or a switch from Flash to HTML5 for apps, but the new box is definitely better equipped to page through Amazon and Netflix than its predecessors. Still, that's not quite enough to make this style of DVR a direct competitor for the likes of Apple, Roku and Amazon. The basic TiVo interface has had so many things added to it over the years, that it still feels like you're taking extra clicks to get into and out of apps, set up new OnePass recordings or even just browse through the guide. The number of features the Bolt offers is definitely better than competing TV boxes that are stuck pushing just internet TV or cable TV, but the trade-off there is a more complicated UI."
"I talked about the ad-skipping and sped-up QuickMode viewing in the preview, and most of that still applies. After using it for a few weeks, I was a bit surprised to find that my favorite thing about SkipMode is using it to jump to the beginning of a show. Usually there's a few seconds of whatever was already on at the beginning of a recording (more if I'm padding it with an early start time) and on SkipMode-enabled recordings, hitting the green button immediately takes you to the start, no fiddling or fast-forwarding-then-rewinding required. It's a tiny thing, but I've come to love it. I also noticed rare occasions where the SkipMode failed to appear, although it's not clear why -- it's not enough to be particularly troubling, but if you're buying a box for this feature, you would expect it to work all the time."
his is your TiVo app on the Fire TV. No guide or flashy UI, just a bare-bones list of recordings.
 new feature that applies to the whole TiVo family (with streaming abilities) is the option to watch recordings from a non-TiVo set-top box: the Amazon Fire TV. It\'s something some have already been doing by hacking the app, but now it\'s official. I loaded up the (still "beta") app 
") comes with the ability to sling video around your house. At launch, it's not ready for streaming when you're away from home -- that's coming in a future software update."
"Where TiVo is losing some of its diehards however, isn't the software -- it's the cost. Fretting over the price of Lifetime "
and whether or not it will go away for good
 One year of TiVo service (necessary to actually use the box) is included right off the bat. That\'s great, but adding "Lifetime" service, which keeps the box active for as long as it\'s working, and can transfer if you sell it in the future, now costs $600, up from $400. Combined with the base model Bolt, that\'s $900 spent before you\'ve even added a Mini extender or extra storage, and for now there\'s no rebate for existing customers. If that\'s too big of a commitment, TiVo offers a one-year plan for $150 and (
"There's no question that this makes for a pricier upgrade than usual, and it also means that the difference between buying Lifetime and going with a year-to-year plan puts your break-even point (considering the year of service included and assuming prices stay the same) at five years clear of the original purchase. That's a long time to be tethered to a TiVo, although it does enhance resale value if you ever decide to move on. Clearly, TiVo is trying to quietly push customers to its year-to-year service plan, and on its face, it may simplify the pricing for newbies to the ecosystem. Diving into a TiVo setup with Lifetime service was always an expensive proposition, and with that decision largely pushed off by the new pricing, now you will only compare it to the cost of renting a (likely inferior) DVR from a cable or satellite company."
"Compared to a cable DVR, I currently pay $26 per month (total, $10 for the DVR and $8 each for two extenders) to rent Comcast's X1 setup. After 24 months that's $624, so even just a couple of years of TiVo ($300 for a 500GB Bolt + $300 for two Minis + $150 for an extra year of service = $750) can be a comparable decision compared to cable, for a better experience that doesn't reboot every night at 3AM. After three years, it's $936 for cable vs. $900 for TiVo on that plan, although it could take longer for the price advantage to flip if one opts for Lifetime service."
\n                  CBS might turn \xe2\x80\x98Entertainment Tonight\xe2\x80\x99 into its own streaming service\n              
Would be its fourth after All Access, CBSN and its forthcoming CBS Sports.
\n                  This DIY Furby Echo speaker will probably give you nightmares\n              
\n                  Alexa and Echo will land in Australia and NZ in early 2018\n              
"Alexa could land in time for Amazon.com's Australia launch."
"\n                  'Destiny 2' gets a Ghost Alexa skill and replica speaker\n              "
\n                  Velodyne LiDAR helps self-driving cars operate at highway speeds\n              
It can spot motorway threats that even humans might miss.
\xc2\xa9 2017 Oath Tech Network Aol Tech. All rights reserved.
Press enter or click on the search icon
bility to stream and download to mobile
Cable companies make it harder to use
4K video output from HDMI 2.0 port
he set-top box market has become increasingly competitive with the likes of 
o add to consumer confusion, there are cable and satellite boxes, as well as DVR replacements. The options are seemingly endless, and trying to determine which solution best fits your needs is tough.
he TiVo Bolt, however, attempts to be the set-top box that can fulfil most of your requirements. It comes with the streaming applications you\xe2\x80\x99d would find in other set-top boxes, but adds the ability to watch live TV, record shows, and even skip adverts. 
It also has smartphone integration, which should appeal to households that are committed to the world of cable but looking to break away from the living room. The TiVo Bolt is currently only available in the US and only works with US cable providers.
ee our UK-compatible DVRs and media player reviews
lthough notably smaller than previous TiVo devices, it remains substantially larger than recent set-top boxes such as Apple TV or Roku 4. Worse, its banana-like shape means you have no choice about where you place it in your media centre if you stack devices on top of one another, which is just plain awkward.
he TiVo Bolt is available with either 500GB or 1TB of hard disk storage. I tested the 1TB version, which is enough to store around 150 hours of full HD video.
s with previous TiVos, the TiVo Bolt requires a CableCard, which your cable company should be able to supply. Some companies may charge you a monthly fee for this, however, so it\xe2\x80\x99s worth finding out before you take the plunge. The set-top box also supports an HD aerial for those who want to watch broadcast TV.
mazon Cyber Monday 2017 UK: The best Amazon Cyber Week deals this Thursday
Best Dyson Deals: You can still suck up these epic Cyber Monday savings
ony on-ear Bluetooth headphones for $48 as Amazon US deals keep on coming
he stunning Galaxy S8 is now somehow cheaper than it was on Cyber Monday
eal: Grab the HP VR headset for a massive \xc2\xa3100 off RRP
he Bolt has both Wi-Fi connectivity and a gigabit Ethernet port. The 802.11ac, dual-band Wi-Fi is particularly impressive: despite sitting in my basement, the Bolt easily connected to a router two floors up and delivered a consistent and reliable connection.
he obligatory HDMI port supports the latest HDMI 2.0, Ultra HD-compatible standard making it future-proof even if your current TV does not support Ultra HD content. You also get two USB2 ports and an eSATA port for hooking up external storage, which acts as an overflow for the internal disk.
he Bolt comes with a wide range of streaming apps, including the familiar options you would expect, such as Netflix, Amazon Instant Video, Hulu and YouTube.
etup takes some time, however, so block out an afternoon to make sure you can get everything up and running. The device ships with an HDMI cable, so I was able to quickly plug that into my TV, hook it up to my cable connection through its coax port, and flick it on. Once the Bolt powered on, it was the start of a set-up process that took close to an hour.
Get news, competitions and special offers direct to your inbox
By submitting your information, you agree to the 
Please keep me up to date with special offers and news from UKCE and 
"We'd also like to send you special offers and news just by email from other carefully selected companies we think you might like. Your personal details will not be shared with those companies - we send the emails and you can unsubscribe at any time. Please tick here if you are happy to receive these messages.\n"
he TiVo Bolt needs to calibrate on several fronts just to get to a television connection. After I spent the time plugging the device into my other hardware, I had to provide location information, connect it to my wireless network, and follow the many on-screen prompts to get going. While those prompts were helpful and easy to follow it was still a laborious experience. The Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s remote may work well for a viewing experience, but for tapping around a menu, it\xe2\x80\x99s a pain. Hopefully you\xe2\x80\x99ll only have to do this once so the pain will be short lived.
here are two ways to get started with the TiVo: via over-the-air broadcasts, which is the quicker option, or by getting a CableCard from a service provider and watching TV through their offering. Since I already had CableCards handy, I opted for the latter. 
he biggest issue with TiVo is that you\xe2\x80\x99re required to pay a monthly service fee. While the Bolt comes with one year free, once that period ends you will need to pay $149.99 per year or $14.99 per month just to keep the TiVo service running. 
he other consideration is that some service providers require that TiVo owners add a tuning adapter, called a switched digital video adapter, to the device. While connecting that adapter takes some manoeuvring of cables, it proved annoying to have to use it. It\xe2\x80\x99s perhaps also worth noting that on-demand channels and other features one would find from their standard cable box may be unavailable, adding another wrinkle.
ervice and setup present some issues that TiVo \xe2\x80\x93 at least right now \xe2\x80\x93 can\xe2\x80\x99t address. And for many, the hassle of the extra adapter and monthly fee will be enough to make them look elsewhere.
iVo Bolt \xe2\x80\x93 Remote, Interface and Experience
he TiVo Bolt comes with the familiar peanut-shaped TiVo remote, although this one has been redesigned somewhat from the TiVos of old. While it is small, it\xe2\x80\x99s still comfortable to hold and both children and adults should have no problems using it.
s with previous models, the remote has a TiVo button at the top, as well as easy access to critical features, such as the Guide, play, pause, and navigation. TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s thumbs-up and thumbs-down feature for refining your tastes is also available, providing old-time TiVo owners with some familiarity.
he remote itself is well designed and I had no issue learning quickly where the buttons were placed and how to move my fingers around to find the features I wanted. As far as DVRs go, TiVo is still offering the finest remote on the market.
iVo is similarly top-notch when it comes to user interface design. The company has polished the interface a little, but it still delivers an enjoyable, familiar experience that makes it easy to find programming, search for shows, and flip through menus.
It includes a feature called OnePass (a service that replaced the former Season Pass), which automatically finds and records shows across both live TV and online streaming services. For example, fans of the show Gotham can enter their account information for services such as Amazon Instant and Netflix and OnePass will pull in the series\xe2\x80\x99 shows from all of those as well as your cable provider\xe2\x80\x99s own on-demand service (if available) and put them into one easy-to-access place. OnePass is intelligent and convenient, and made both starting new shows and catching up on others simple and elegant.
rguably its most intriguing feature, however, is the ability to skip adverts. SkipMode, which becomes available after a show has been recorded, provides an alert to let you know adverts are incoming. I simply pushed a button on the remote, and I was back to my show without having caught sight of an ad. 
here are some caveats that govern the SkipMode\xe2\x80\x99s use. For one, it\xe2\x80\x99s only available for programmes that run from 4pm until midnight. In addition, it only works on around 20 channels. However, TiVo is expected to expand its partnership with other networks in the future to offer the SkipMode to more channels.
here\xe2\x80\x99s also QuickMode, which I used to skip through parts of a reality show at increased speed while still being able to listen to the audio. It\xe2\x80\x99s particularly useful for catching up on sports events and speech-heavy content as well as shows that perhaps don\xe2\x80\x99t engage your full concentration. The device also comes with the ability to connect to an Android or iOS device, and either download or mirror content to those devices.
s someone who\xe2\x80\x99s been locked in a world of cable for years, not having quick and easy access to on-demand channels was a pain. Granted, streaming apps have made this a little easier to swallow, but TiVo has several gaps in that area that need to be addressed before it can become a full replacement for heavy TV watchers. 
With all of that said, it\xe2\x80\x99s hard to find fault in the overall TiVo Bolt experience. Moving around the software was simple and I didn\xe2\x80\x99t succumb to any annoying glitches. The device was able to render the features quickly, its 4K support is a welcome addition, and TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s own features, such as suggestions and wish list, are still among my favourite for finding new shows. 
iVo Bolt \xe2\x80\x93 Should I buy the TiVo Bolt?
hose in the market for a new set-top box to upgrade their TV experience need to weigh up the pros and cons of switching to TiVo. They need to decide how many services are available, how much value they\xe2\x80\x99ll get out of the device, and crucially, the total cost of ownership. Ultimately it depends on your own viewing habits and the services your cable provider already offers.
For those looking for a DVR experience and want some of the extras that are offered in streaming boxes, the TiVo Bolt delivers. Those who want a wider array of streaming services and don\xe2\x80\x99t care about what\xe2\x80\x99s on TV at any given time, however, will find that the TiVo Bolt falls short.
here\xe2\x80\x99s also the issue of cost. The TiVo Bolt costs $300 for the 500GB model and $400 for the 1TB option. While that cost includes one year of TiVo service, after that, the TiVo-exclusive features \xe2\x80\x93 including SkipMode, QuickMode, OnePass, and others \xe2\x80\x93 come at a cost of $14.99 per month or $149.99 per year. Add that to the standard cost of cable television and the monthly fees charged by streaming services, and the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s total cost of ownership starts to soar.
t $300 or $400, the TiVo Bolt may be one of the more expensive set-top boxes on the market, but it also delivers one of the richest and most appealing experiences. Despite its unorthodox design, the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s outstanding software, unique features, good performance and plenty of add-ons make it a worthy buy.
Cheap Cyber Monday Headphone Deals: All the best prices and discounts still going
his Canon DSLR camera and two-lens bundle is price-slashed to just \xc2\xa3379
hese iPhone 7 Cyber Monday deals are still live and we can\xe2\x80\x99t believe it
he new Sony PS4 Pro is down to just \xc2\xa3259.99 \xe2\x80\x93 save \xc2\xa390 today!
Cyber Monday iPhone 8 Deal: You can still get the iPhone 8 for just \xc2\xa329 per month right now
Best Cyber Monday Drone Deals 2017: DJI Mavic Pro Fly More still has a saving of \xc2\xa3260 but not for long
Best John Lewis Cyber Monday Deals 2017: Last chance savings here!
Currys Cyber Monday Deals: Best Currys deals, offers and codes beyond Black Friday
hese unbeatable Galaxy Note 8 deals are still live after Cyber Monday
\xc2\xa9 Copyright Time Inc. (UK) Ltd. Trusted Reviews is part of Time Inc. (UK) Ltd Fashion & Beauty Network. All rights reserved.
In a perfect world, everyone would have TiVo. Gone would be the hours of frustration spent while you railed at your cable provider\xe2\x80\x99s DVR that had managed, 
, because the late-Sunday Packer\xe2\x80\x99s game went into overtime and, God-forbid CBS ever just 
, and you knew this would happen; but the only options your dumb box gave you were \xe2\x80\x9cRecord\xe2\x80\x9d and \xe2\x80\x9cCancel\xe2\x80\x9d so you had to just trust that it would 
"\xc2\xa0know that it needed to timeshift things when the schedule got all f'(ootball)ed-up."
Baby got ports (Photo by Anthony Karcz)
But the hardware is secondary to the amazing software package you get with the TiVo Bolt. After living with it for a few weeks, I would find it practically impossible to go back to anything but the Bolt. For those of you on an older TiVo box, you\xe2\x80\x99ll notice right away that the interface has been cleaned up considerably, with a Live TV window in the corner and suggested shows running along the top. The menus are responsive and all settings are much more accessible than in previous versions of the OS. What\xe2\x80\x99s particularly noteworthy is OnePass. The outdated Season Pass feature is gone. I loved it because it let me catch every episode of a show, no matter when or where it aired. But inevitably I would miss an ep and be stuck rifling through Netflix or sifting through VuDu or Amazon. OnePass takes those two paradigms, recording live television and streaming video, and mashes them together. Now, I can see a listing of all the seasons and episodes of a OnePass show, along with\xc2\xa0where I can get them from. VuDu, Netflix, and Amazon Prime are currently supported on the Bolt (Don\xe2\x80\x99t worry! HuluPlus is coming too!). This was an absolute life saver when I managed to delete the only\xc2\xa0
\xc2\xa0show that daughter was interested in watching.
QuickMode is an essential feature on Sunday at my house. My son is a consummate football geek. He wants to listen to every second of commentary and pore over every replay. Me? I just want them to snap the ball already. Usually this meant I would fast forward through all the cruft between plays, right up to the snap, allowing me to watch the game in a fraction of the time. After all, when you\xe2\x80\x99ve got two kids and the schedule to match, fitting in three hours of football is an unheard of luxury. QuickMode lets us both get what we want \xe2\x80\x93 it speeds up the playback to 30% of normal, which is just enough to considerably compress the time it takes to watch a game; but still leave all the commentators intelligible \xc2\xa0(well, as intelligible as they ever were\xe2\x80\xa6it\xe2\x80\x99s not a 
kipMode is the Holy Grail feature for the Bolt. Having used TiVo for the past decade, I have a deep-seated dislike\xc2\xa0of commercials. It\xe2\x80\x99s amazing how being able to fast forward past them practically whenever you watch a show considerably lessens your tolerance. In fact both of my children, when confronted with live television for the first time, were gobsmacked when I explained to them that we couldn\xe2\x80\x99t just fast forward past the commercials to get back to their shows. The Roamio introduced a dedicated 30-second skip button, which made jumping past commercial breaks a matter of a couple of presses (and some guessing). The Bolt retains that button; but adds the ability to skip past the commercials entirely with a single press. SkipMode is\xc2\xa0the closest thing you can get to a streaming video experience for recorded television and it\xe2\x80\x99s glorious. It\xe2\x80\x99s gotten so I practically refuse to watch anything live anymore. I\xe2\x80\x99d much rather wait the hour or so for SkipMode to be enabled for the show. It\xe2\x80\x99s available on nearly every Prime Time show and its commercial-free nirvana. My only wish is that this feature could be enabled across the entire TiVo line (and on\xc2\xa0
\xc2\xa0show)\xc2\xa0so that I could use it on my Mini.
he elephant in the room is that the Bolt requires you to sign up for a service package (or buy a lifetime subscription for the unit). However, it does comes with a free year of service \xe2\x80\x93 so you\xe2\x80\x99ll have plenty of time to decide if the greatest DVR ever is worth the $150 a year (They do offer a monthly plan, but it\xe2\x80\x99s not offered up front and it\xe2\x80\x99s $15 a month, which is kind of a \xe2\x80\x9cgotcha\xe2\x80\x9d after a year of free service). The nice thing is that you can recoup some\xc2\xa0of those costs by turning in your cable-provider\xe2\x80\x99s DVR and renting\xc2\xa0a CableCard from them instead. In the end, you\xe2\x80\x99re getting a far superior experience for less cash per month.
, depending on the capacity you choose. My advice? Spring for the more expensive 1TB model, get a TiVo Mini for your other TVs, and let the Bolt be the media streaming device for the whole house.\xc2\xa0Speaking of, there are huge streaming plans in the works for the Bolt. Currently, you can stream your recorded shows in-house to your phones and tablets. But the addition of out-of-home streaming is coming, which means you can get anything your Bolt can access\xc2\xa0
I was a big fan of the software refresh that came out for the Roamio last year and figured the Roamio would be the last TiVo I bought for a long time. When the Bolt was first announced, I was skeptical that TiVo could do much more to improve upon their model. I have happily been proven wrong. If you watch TV, you need a Bolt. it\xe2\x80\x99s that simple.
Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)
Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)
Click to share on Google+ (Opens in new window)
Click to share on LinkedIn (Opens in new window)
Click to share on Reddit (Opens in new window)
Click to share on Pocket (Opens in new window)
Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)
Click to print (Opens in new window)
Writer, father of two, runner, Marvel-phile, recovered WoW addict, unrepentant Generation 1 Transformers nerd (seriously, I know more about G1 than is healthy). Author of the superhero novel: 
Polaroid Cube \xe2\x80\x93 The Perfect Kidproof Video Camera 
Were you in any way paid for this favorable review?
iVo provided me with a Bolt, as I noted in the review. But just because a company offers an item to review does not guarantee them a favorable article. The opinions expressed in the review are my own. 
I\xe2\x80\x99ve been a TiVo subscriber for over 10 years. I\xe2\x80\x99m a big fan of their products.
uto refresh on a page that users can leave comments?  Wow, talk about bad design  My long comment went poof on the refresh
Hey! Sorry about that \xe2\x80\x93 it\xe2\x80\x99s a per-article setting that I usually catch and turn off (since I\xe2\x80\x99ve been caught by it too and it\xe2\x80\x99s ULTRA annoying). I\xe2\x80\x99ve made sure that the auto-refresh is off now. Thanks for bringing it to my attention!
I\xe2\x80\x99m tired of lousy cable/Fioptics DVRs. I\xe2\x80\x99ve been looking at buying a Bolt since it came out. But I want aa remote Mini with it, and realized that it requires a hardwire network connection, NOT wireless. That\xe2\x80\x99s not possible for me.
eading further, you can use coax to set up a network \xe2\x80\x93 MoCA. The Bolt can create such a network, but the Bolt must be hardwired into the router \xe2\x80\x93 also not possible for me. You can buy a $50 MoCA to define network\xe2\x80\xa6
o it\xe2\x80\x99s not simple, unfortunately, and I haven\xe2\x80\x99t made the investment yet.
I can appreciate that. Setting up the MoCA network over coax was the part that gave me the most trouble. Of course, that was due as much to my poor networking skills as anything else.
nter your email address to subscribe and receive notifications of new posts by email.
"If you'd like to help GeekDad & GeekMom out, use this link for any shopping you do on Amazon.com. When you do, we'll receive a small affiliate bonus that'll really help keep the site running!"
Joseph and Filona, who only know each other over letter, write fictional letters back and forth. Two people from two completely different places. Who knows what could happen?
im Johnides, Jeff Williams, Dante Lauretta, Magnus Dahlsr\xc3\xb6m, Jayson Peters, David Michael, Gerry Tolbert, Andrew Smith, Ray Wehrs, Joel Becker, Scott Gaeta, Beth Kee, Joey Mills, talkie_tim, Danny Marquardt, Adam Bruski, John Bain, Bill Moore, Adam Frank, Lacey Hays, Peter Morson, James Needham, Matt Fleming, Adam Anderson, Jim Reynolds, Seiler Hagan, Bryan Wade, Petrov Neutrino, Jay Shapiro
oug Smidebush, Lior Keinan , Kelvin Nduka, Thad Standley, Nolan Zak, Adam Franks, Stephen Brown, Loren Roberts, Matt and Nykki Boersma, Tom Morgan, Jack Everitt, John Kovalic, Seiler Hagan, Jess Hart, Will James, Christopher M. Kelly, Roberto L. Vargas, Michele Hall, Chuck Lawton, Ismael Schonhorst, (There are those who call him) Tim, Vladimir Weinstein, Randiman Rogers, Robert Booth, Henry Roenke, Kevin Culp, W. David MacKenzie, Nicholas Richards, John Idlor, Michael Fox, Rob H., Matthew Cody, Dan Callahan, Patrick Kohn, Seth Phillips, Kevin Korpi, Ben MS, Monica, Mark Gonyea, Pharlain Ross, Derick Larson, 
Propelstalz, Mary Crocker, Wayne Moulton Jr,\xc2\xa0Mitch Gross, Jim Valko, Andrew Brown, Lucy Ravitch, Nicholas Duresky, Heather Hofshi, John Kemp, Thorsten Karge, Natasha Dzurny, Keith Ives, Benjamin Chan, Neal Bhatnagar, Justin Farr, Regan Lee, Elaine, Nate Fugal, Stephanie Tennison, Jon Rasmussen, Ryan Pulis, Owen Duffy, Colman Reilly, Anthony, Mark Richman, Alexis Ohanian, Steve, Greg \xe2\x80\x9cTVsEgon\xe2\x80\x9d Skinner, Andy Saavedra, Daniel, Willie Raymond Taylor III, Chad Ingham, Irene Christian, Clinton Richmond, Jamey Stegmaier, James Allenspach, John Howell, Leif Terry, Tiago Pereira, Nathan Heath, Grinidon, Roman, Berserker Hew, Clark Stacey, Ben Harkins, Kayvaan Ghassemieh, Travis B., Justin Myers, Magna Nordgard, Jim Griffin, Jeff, David Smith, Matthew Titelbaum, Dennis Hitzeman, Daniel Lieske, Michael Jantze, Ruddy, Tom Damico, Kelson, Michelangelo Grigni
hanks to these wonderful folks who are 
\n\t\t\t\tPost was not sent - check your email addresses!\t\t\t
\n\t\t\t\tSorry, your blog cannot share posts by email.\t\t\t
pple Music, iTunes movies, and iBooks are now available in China
esla\xe2\x80\x99s amazing Model X is finally here, and I got to drive\xc2\xa0it
\n      TiVo Bolt review: Watching TV faster\n    
kip commercials with one click, and speed up the rest of the show, too
Back in 1999, when I first reviewed the original TiVo DVR, I griped that \xe2\x80\x9cTiVo has no commercial-skipping button\xe2\x80\x9d and noted that its press literature denounced such a feature on grounds that, while it "may appeal to the pirate in all of us, it just doesn\'t make good business sense."
It\xe2\x80\x99s taken 16 years, but TiVo has finally changed its mind. Its latest model, the radically redesigned Bolt, which goes on sale this week for a base price of $300, finally lets you ditch all the ads in a blink. By simply pressing a button once, you can skip an entire block of commercials in many recorded programs, a feature called SkipMode. No more fast-forwarding and hoping you land on the right spot, or repeatedly hitting a 30-second advance button.
nd the company\xe2\x80\x99s PR has changed as well. \xe2\x80\x9cSkipMode transports you past these annoying interruptions and back to your recorded show in an instant,\xe2\x80\x9d TiVo now boasts.
, a new weekly commentary and reviews column on The Verge and  Re/code by veteran tech journalist Walt Mossberg, now an Executive Editor at The Verge and Editor at Large of Re/code.
Of course, TiVo is a hybrid box that\xe2\x80\x99s for people who want both cable and streaming shows, at a time when more people are shunning cable. But it\xe2\x80\x99ll be a long time before cable is truly abandoned, and lots of people will be happy that the company is making it easier to watch.
In my tests, over the past week, SkipMode invariably made all the commercials disappear and returned me exactly to where programming resumed. The box even prompted me when it was time to skip the ads. But it doesn\xe2\x80\x99t work on every recorded show.
nd that\xe2\x80\x99s not the only way the Bolt can save you time when watching TV.
he latest TiVo also boasts another new feature, called QuickMode. It speeds up any recorded show by 30 percent, without making the dialogue sound like it\xe2\x80\x99s being delivered by chipmunks. It\xe2\x80\x99s a timesaver, to be sure \xe2\x80\x94 perfect for, say, golf or baseball or talk shows. But you won\xe2\x80\x99t want to watch every show this way. In my tests, QuickMode worked as promised, though shows looked more or less watchable at faster speeds, depending on their nature. For instance, I noticed no problems with "The Big Bang Theory," where the characters talk fast anyway; but found I missed some nuances when watching "Sherlock".
till, you can save a lot of time with these QuickMode and SkipMode \xe2\x80\x94 even more if you combine them, which you can for those recorded shows compatible with both.
he Bolt is an odd-looking, white box with an angled top and bottom, which replaces the current low-end, and most popular, model of TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s current Roamio line, the Roamio-S. (The other Roamio models will remain on the market.) It\xe2\x80\x99s much smaller than the Roamios, and the tapered top surface makes it much harder to stack things on top of it.
Like the Roamio-S, the Bolt has four tuners, which means you can record four shows at once. It also has the same 500 Gigabytes of storage as the Roamio-S, though you can double that for another $100.
But it improves on the older model by supporting 4K video, gigabit Ethernet, the faster AC version of Wi-Fi, and streaming of shows to mobile devices and computers on the same network. (It lacks the costlier Roamio\xe2\x80\x99s out-of-home streaming feature, but the company says it plans to add that next year.)
Unlike some TiVos I\xe2\x80\x99ve tested over the years, I found setting up the Bolt to be a breeze, including the transfer of the cable card from my personal, older TiVo.
iVo has not only drastically overhauled the appearance of its product, it has taken steps to hide the monthly $15 fee it charges over and above what your cable service costs. The company has long justified this fee on grounds that cable companies also charge for boxes and DVR service, but it has always seemed excessive to me for what should be an all-inclusive tech device.
o make the price more palatable, TiVo has trimmed it some and bundled the first-year service fee with the hardware to arrive at a $300 base price, with no additional service charge for the first year. After the first year, you\xe2\x80\x99ll be billed $149 a year for the service. By comparison, the older model it\xe2\x80\x99s replacing sold for $200 and had a $15 monthly fee, or $180 a year.
o what are the limitations of the new commercial-skipping feature?
Well, for one thing it only works on recorded shows, even though after a day I was dying to use it on live TV as well. For another, it only works with shows where the start and end points of the commercial blocks have been tagged, a process TiVo says is done by actual people. So far, only 20 channels are included, but they include popular ones like the four major broadcast networks, USA, TNT and Comedy Central.
It also doesn\xe2\x80\x99t work with sports or local programming \xe2\x80\x94 even when they are recorded. And it only works for other shows between 4pm and midnight, because TiVo figures that\xe2\x80\x99s when most viewing occurs, and it wanted to put some limits on its manual tagging process to start with. Also, it can take a few minutes for a show to become commercial-skippable and gain a tag in its listing that says "Skip."
"One of the most important features of the Bolt isn't new, but it\xe2\x80\x99s improved: it combines old-fashioned cable TV with popular online streaming services in one box. That means you can go from cable to Netflix without the common hassle of changing your TV\xe2\x80\x99s input to switch from your cable box to, say, your Apple TV or Roku."
For years now, TiVo has been quietly (and clumsily) integrating services like Netflix and YouTube and Amazon Prime into its boxes, but it hasn\xe2\x80\x99t boasted much about it.
ow, with the Bolt, TiVo is ready to proclaim itself the One Box To Rule Them All. Or, in the company\xe2\x80\x99s words, a "Unified Entertainment System".
ot only does the new Bolt call itself the only TV box you\xe2\x80\x99ll need, it actually has new features to make that claim stronger. It switches between cable and streaming video more smoothly than past TiVos, and it has a faster version of its previous integrated search, which brings up results from both cable and internet video and lets you watch or record from the source of your choice.
In fact, the whole product is faster and smoother, due to a faster processor and triple the memory, when compared to the base Roamio. Also, the user interface is now almost entirely HD, except for two subsections of the settings menu. And the platform for apps like Netflix is now HTML5 only. The company junked Flash.
nd, when you set up a season-long recording (called a OnePass), the Bolt fetches episodes from every available source, including streaming services and my cable company\xe2\x80\x99s On Demand service. Even if a show is on hiatus, older episodes available on these services are offered up.
In my tests, Netflix and Amazon Prime and YouTube looked as good as they do on Apple TV and Roku. And, if I had a 4K TV, Netflix and YouTube could have looked even better, since the Bolt supports their 4K programming.
Well, the Bolt only offers a handful of the many, many online streaming services available from Roku or even the more-limited Apple TV: Netflix, Amazon, YouTube, Vudu, Yahoo, and popular music services including Pandora and Spotify. It doesn\xe2\x80\x99t include Hulu, which is on the Roamio, but TiVo says it expects Hulu to return once its app has been reconfigured for HTML5.
lso, there\xe2\x80\x99s a bug in the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s Netflix app which can cause the service to freeze. TiVo says it\xe2\x80\x99s infrequent and will be fixed soon, but I ran into it and had to reboot the unit.
While TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s search is reasonably fast and cross-platform, it still requires you to peck out characters on an onscreen keyboard. Meanwhile, Amazon, Roku, Apple and even Comcast have gone to searching by voice. TiVo says it\xe2\x80\x99s actively exploring doing the same.
I have owned a TiVo for years, and appreciate it. Despite the odd look of the Bolt, I found its new features attractive and reliable.
But the fusion of linear cable and streaming internet video in one box is a big deal, even if it\xe2\x80\x99s been around \xe2\x80\x94 quietly \xe2\x80\x94 for awhile. TiVo has finally got this right.
ure, a lot of what\xe2\x80\x99s on cable is already available in streaming form on many devices. And, eventually, all of it will be. But that will take awhile. Meanwhile, unless you\xe2\x80\x99ve cut the cord, you\xe2\x80\x99re going to want some mix of cable and streaming services. And this product pulls that off, while making old-fashioned TV much better, with commercial skipping and the occasional speed-viewing.
I wouldn\xe2\x80\x99t say that the Bolt should make non-cable users suddenly buy cable. But, if you already have it, this is a good solution.
\n          Exclusive: Kickstarter launches Drip, a new service that lets fans subscribe to their favorite\xc2\xa0creators\n        
\n          Are holograms the future of how we capture\xc2\xa0memories?\n        
\n          Left on read: the nail-biting mobile games that leave you waiting for\xc2\xa0texts\n        
Check out our status page for more details.
, Inc. All Rights Reserved\n      \n      \n    
"Review: TiVo's latest model makes it easier to bolt from cable"
\n                      September 30, 2016 \n                      by Jim Rossman, The Dallas Morning News\n                      \n                  
"The first thing you'll notice about the TiVo Bolt is its odd shape - it looks like someone bent the case in an industrial press.\n                                "
"In a call with the Bolt's product manager, I asked why the case was not level. I said it wouldn't play nice in my home theater cabinet because it would be difficult to stack other components on top of it."
ew TiVo DVR will skip through entire commercial break
Physicist explores the possibility of vestiges of a universe previous to the Big Bang
nalysis of ancient DNA reveals a previously unrecognized genus of extinct horses that once roamed North America
Leave a buffer for your bumper: Study contradicts practice of traffic light tailgating
cientists demonstrate one of largest quantum simulators
Feathered dinosaurs were even fluffier than we thought
iding a motorcycle in a circle, power slide
ynthetic fibers (rope) that absorb water and shortens
ew TiVo DVR will skip through entire commercial break
iVo wants to help you skip TV commercials.
iVo to make version for those without cable
"Here's a sign more households are going without cable or satellite TV: TiVo Inc. is making a digital video recorder just for so-called cord-cutters."
"GM's electric Chevy Bolt to go 238 miles per charge"
"The Chevrolet Bolt, General Motors' Tesla-fighting electric hatchback for the masses, will be able to go 238 miles (383 kilometers) on a single charge."
Gift Guide: Six ways to get streaming video to your big screen
Watching video on a phone or personal computer can sometimes feel less than awesome\xe2\x80\x94not to mention kind of lonely, given the limited viewing angle of the small screen.
iVo fans now have something new to smile about. The television digital video recorder company TiVo announced Tuesday the launch of its TiVo Series2 DT DVR May 1, which will allow consumers to record two shows at once.
Cox to offer video-on-demand content through TiVo
"(AP) --  Digital video recording pioneer TiVo Inc. and cable television provider Cox Communications Inc. are making it easier for Cox subscribers who use TiVo's DVR boxes to watch Cox's on-demand video content."
Flexible impedance sensor can fit inside urinary catheters; monitor and treat biofilm
"A long-term, interdisciplinary research collaboration at the University of Maryland's A. James Clark School of Engineering has made significant progress in detecting and treating bacterial biofilms by developing new chemical ..."
oyota showcases humanoid robot that mirrors user
"Japanese auto giant Toyota Wednesday showcased a humanoid robot that can mirror its user's movements, a product it says has uses as varied as elderly care and disaster response."
ew 3-D printer is ten times faster than commercial counterparts
MIT engineers have developed a new desktop 3-D printer that performs up to 10 times faster than existing commercial counterparts. Whereas the most common printers may fabricate a few Lego-sized bricks in one hour, the new ...
Bitcoin hits new records, heads for $10,000 as bubble fears grow
"Bitcoin soared to fresh records Tuesday, putting it on course for $10,000, but the virtual currency's stratospheric rise has fuelled fears of a bubble after a 10-fold increase this year."
irbus, Rolls-Royce, Siemens working on hybrid plane
irbus, Siemens and Rolls-Royce are teaming up to develop a hybrid passenger plane that would use a single electric turbofan along with three conventional jet engines running on aviation fuel.
oft robotics has made leaps and bounds over the last decade as researchers around the world have experimented with different materials and designs to allow once rigid, jerky machines to bend and flex in ways that mimic and ...
\n                Sign in to get notified via email when new comments are made.\n            
\n\t\t\t\t    Sign in with your Facebook or Google+ account\n\t\t\t\t    
\n<script type="text/javascript">\n// redirect to PCMag digital edition ad\n(function() {\nvar cookieEnabled = (navigator.cookieEnabled) ? true : false;\nif(cookieEnabled == true)\n{\nvar _zd_pcmde_dl = __PCMAG.GetCookie(\'_zd_pcmde_dl\'),\n_zd_pcmde_nothanks = __PCMAG.GetCookie(\'_zd_pcmde_nothanks\'),\nisIpad = navigator.userAgent.indexOf("iPad") !== -1;\nif (!isIpad) { return; } // not ipad\nif (_zd_pcmde_dl) { return; } // clicked DL button\nif( _zd_pcmde_nothanks) {return;}//clicked No thanks\nif (document.referrer.indexOf(\'pcmag.com\') !== -1) { return; } // pcmag.com not referrer\nif(window.location.href.indexOf("search_redirect") > -1) { return; }\ndocument.location.href = \'https://www.pcmag.com/prestitial/pcmde.html?referrer=\' + encodeURIComponent(document.location.href);\n}\n})();\n</script>\n
How to Block a Number on Any Phone
How to Create an Anonymous Email Account
How to Save Money on Your Cell Phone Plan
How to Set Up and Configure Your Wireless Router
Best Social Media Management & Analytics Tools
Best Samsung Galaxy S8 and S8+ Cases
23andMe
"The Bolt is TiVo's smallest, sleekest DVR yet. And it packs some powerful new features like 4K video support, the ability to speed up your shows, and a button to skip past entire commercial blocks with one quick press. "
, but we may earn affiliate commissions from buying links on this page.\n
upports 4K video. OnePass organizes available shows easily. Powerful app and streaming features. Comes with a year subscription to TiVo service. Useful new features like QuickMode and SkipMode.
"Requires TiVo subscription after first year. No Hulu Plus. Less storage than TiVo's Roamio Pro."
"The Bolt is TiVo's smallest, sleekest DVR yet. And it packs some powerful new features like 4K video support, the ability to speed up your shows, and a button to skip past entire commercial blocks with one quick press. "
iVo has been facing some stiff competition in the form of cable and satellite company-provided 
"\xc2\xa0and streaming video services like Hulu, making\xc2\xa0its subscription plan and expensive hardware look less and less appealing. The Bolt could be the DVR that puts TiVo back on top. At $299.99 for a 500GB model and $399.99 for a 1TB version, it's still a relatively pricey device, but it's more affordable than the previous generation of TiVos, and comes with a year of service included, so you don't need to commit to a monthly fee in the first year. Add four tuners, robust content management, out-of-the-home streaming of recordings and live television, and an easy-to-use (albeit text-heavy) interface, and you have a very compelling\xc2\xa0DVR that works with both cable and over-the-air (OTA) television. It's our new Editors' Choice for digital video recorders."
"\xc2\xa0is almost Apple-like in design: simple, white, and curved. It looks like a slightly warped box that lifts off of the ground half an inch in a gentle slope on the left side. The front bears a black TiVo logo at the top of the curve, and a small green power LED on the right side of the panel. The back holds an HDMI port, a coaxial cable/antenna connector, an Ethernet port, two USB ports, an eSATA connector for adding storage, 3.5mm and optical audio outputs, the power connector, and a Remote Finder button that makes the remote beep audibly. The CableCARD slot hides behind the Bolt's casing, on the underside of the device. "
he remote is a large, curved dog bone of a wand, with a white top panel and black underside. It has two large circular pads: one with directions around a Select button for menu navigation, and one with playback controls around a Pause button. They feel very similar under the thumb, which can make navigating menus in the dark a bit awkward. The remote also has a number pad, four color buttons, and a set of TV controls, including a separate TV Power button.
"As mentioned above, the Bolt comes with one free year of TiVo service. After that, it costs $149.99 per year or $14.99 per month. If you want to use the Bolt with your cable or FiOS service, you're going to need a CableCARD from your service provider. However, the Bolt can also work with OTA broadcasts, which is how we configured it in our test lab. Satellite service is not supported."
etting up the Bolt was simple, but tedious. Connecting everything and telling the device information like geographical location and Wi-Fi network was very straightforward and guided by on-screen prompts. However, getting the Bolt to the point where it could actually show television took over an hour of preparing, setting up, and downloading all of the data it needed to function.
Once everything was up running, the Bolt functioned smoothly. All available OTA channels appeared in the live program guide, and information about current and upcoming shows was aggregated across the various menus. Search results and apps were also responsive.
"TiVo has tweaked and polished its interface over the years, but it remains very text-heavy compared with most streaming media devices. The menu system is built around lists of easy-to-read text choices, with graphics like show logos appearing in the periphery or a few menu levels down from the main screen. It's very easy to navigate, and leaves little ambiguity in menu choices. Whatever screen you're on in the interface, the top right corner will show the current live television feed or recording, letting you keep an eye on what you are\xc2\xa0watching."
With everything set up, I started to populate the TiVo recording schedule. The classic Season Pass feature has been replaced by OnePass, which collects episodes of your favorite shows across both live television and online services. I added new episodes of\xc2\xa0
, and any and all episodes of 
"By default, the Bolt shows its own unique Live Guide when you press the Guide button rather than a conventional grid-based guide. However,\xc2\xa0the Live Guide\xc2\xa0is fairly functional, and you can switch the view to a grid guide in a settings menu. It displays a list of available channels and what is currently playing on each on the left side of the screen. The right side displays what will be on the currently selected channel in the near future. Browsing through channels instantly updates this list to show upcoming programming. It doesn't offer as much information on-screen at a given time as a grid display, but it's a bit simpler to navigate."
"Besides live television from cable, FiOS, or OTA, the Bolt can access streaming television and movies from a handful of sources. It supports Amazon Instant Video, Netflix, YouTube, Plex, Vudu, and AOL On, plus streaming music through Pandora, Spotify, and iHeartRadio. Once you've signed in to your respective accounts for the different services on the Bolt, your search results and OnePass information expands to include those services. With "
"The TiVo Central menu displays a rotating selection of four shows or movies on the top of the screen, highlighting what's already in OnePass, upcoming live television, and new content available on demand. From the main screen you can look up your OnePass recordings and streaming content under My Shows; see what is currently on live television under What to Watch Now; search for content or browse lists, collections, and streaming video services under Find TV, Movies & Videos; and check your OnePass settings and both upcoming and previous recordings under Manage Recordings & OnePass."
he vast majority of what you want to watch can be found under the aforementioned headings, but two separate sections, Music & Photos and Apps & Games, offer additional options for content. Music & Photos currently only includes music apps and Plex. Apps & Games offers full access to the Opera TV Store and its app ecosystem, but using it was sluggish and apps were slow to load.
"The TiVo Bolt offers two handy features to make watching your favorite shows faster: QuickMode and SkipMode. SkipMode lets you automatically jump to the end of a commercial break by pressing the green button on the remote. However, it only works on certain shows, most of which are prime time network programming. You can't skip commercial breaks on the vast majority of content."
"QuickMode speeds up recordings by 30 percent and pitch-corrects the audio to make dialogue sound natural. This works with anything you record, and it's very effective. Be wary when watching actors who naturally speak quickly, though; it's easy to miss lines when already fast dialogue is sped up by nearly a third. Still, it's a great way to quickly catch up on a backlog of recordings without missing out on anything important."
"\xc2\xa0video output, though you won't find this to be very useful with your cable or OTA television yet. Currently, UHD video isn't broadcast in any way over the air or through cable services. However, you can watch 4K content on Netflix and Amazon Video through the Bolt. I loaded episodes of\xc2\xa0"
\xc2\xa0on Amazon Video, and both displayed in UHD on 4K television.
iVo also includes all of the useful features introduced with the 
. You can remotely control the Bolt with the free TiVo remote app for Android and iOS. More importantly, you\xc2\xa0can stream your OnePass recordings and live television to mobile devices and Web browsers. The Bolt also supports multi-room television setups with optional 
\xc2\xa0expansion boxes. One\xc2\xa0weakness: relatively limited\xc2\xa0storage space when compared with the 3TB Roamio Pro.\xc2\xa0
"If you're not completely committed to keeping cable/OTA, you can save a solid chunk of cash with a non-DVR, tuner-free\xc2\xa0"
". Of course, we haven't quite reached the point where\xc2\xa0"
\xc2\xa0is available to stream the day after it airs, so compromises have to be made depending on the shows you want to watch.
"The TiVo Bolt doesn't force you to compromise, and offers the best (and one of the most economical) TiVo experiences yet. It's still a bit pricey at $300 for 500GB of storage, but an eSATA drive can fix that, and the included year of TiVo service really softens the blow (though you'll have to pay for a TiVo subscription after that as long as you use the Bolt). It handles both cable and OTA, and incorporates several major streaming video services seamlessly into its interface. It's easy to use, and powerful enough to serve as your main media hub for both live television and streaming content, making it our Editors' Choice for DVRs."
"The Bolt is TiVo's smallest, sleekest DVR yet. And it packs some powerful new features like 4K video support, the ability to speed up your shows, and a button to skip past entire commercial blocks with one quick press. "
\nWill Greenwald has been covering consumer technology for a decade, and has served on the editorial staffs of CNET.com, Sound & Vision, and Maximum PC. His work and analysis has been seen in GamePro, Tested.com, Geek.com, and several other publications. He currently covers consumer electronics in the PC Labs as the in-house home entertainment expert, reviewing TVs, media hubs, speakers, headphones, and gaming accessories. Will is also an ISF Level II-certified TV calibrator, which ensures the thoroughness and accuracy of all PCMag TV reviews....\n
\nDropMix is a fun and addictive music game that lets you create great-sounding remixes regardless of ...\n
"\nLG's Signature OLEDW7P series of TVs let you hang a thin, bezel-free OLED right on your wall and pa...\n"
"\nLG's Signature OLEDG7P series is every bit as attractive and capable as last year's excellent OLEDG6...\n"
, but we may earn affiliate commissions from buying links on this page.\n
ech on a Budget: 35 Gift Ideas Under $20
28 Hidden iOS 11 Tips You Need to Know
10 Games Every Nintendo Switch Player Needs
"TV Shows to Watch if You Love 'Stranger Things'"
"How to Master iOS 11's New Control Center"
How to Play DVDs in Windows 10
How to Stop Blue Light From Disturbing Your Sleep
1996-2017\n
\nPC, PC Magazine and PC PCMag.com are among the federally registered trademarks of 
Ziff Davis, LLC and may not be used by third parties without explicit permission.
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\tMatching 4K UHD with supreme home theater control, the Bolt is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s best box ever\t\t\t\t\t\t
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tWithout a doubt, the Bolt is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s most outstanding product to date.\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tWithout a doubt, the Bolt is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s most outstanding product to date.\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\tWithout a doubt, the Bolt is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s most outstanding product to date.\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
o Amazon 4K UHD streaming at launch\r
o out of home streaming at launch
12.03.15)
, and rumors are swirling that a 4K Roku\xc2\xa0is days away from announcement. It seems clear that 4K UHD support is the next big thing for streaming set-top boxes (unless, of course, you\xe2\x80\x99re Apple TV). Now you can add TiVo to that list of supporters with the introduction of the new TiVo Bolt Unified Entertainment System.
ressed in a Storm Trooper-White chassis that is both sleeker and more compact than TiVo DVRs of the past, the Bolt aims to redefine what people think of when they think TiVo.
kipMode is the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s most exciting new feature (and likely to be its most controversial).
ptly described by the company as a \xe2\x80\x9cUnified Entertainment System\xe2\x80\x9d rather than a DVR, the 4-tuner Bolt carries on the tradition 
he bottom line: With a boatload of fun new features, 4K UHD streaming apps, and the best content-searching system available, the TiVo Bolt is in prime position to take over as your home entertainment hub.
When it comes to set-top design, big black boxes are out and significantly smaller black boxes are in. Even cable companies stuck in the last century have managed to shrink down the size of their cable boxes. Anyway, TiVo needed a new look, and the Bolt supplies this in a bold way. The new chassis is bright white, the on-board buttons are gone, and the lights have been integrated. The box is also much smaller than TiVo units of the past \xe2\x80\x93 33 percent smaller than the Roamio and 65 percent smaller than the Roamio Plus and Pro, according to TiVo. And then, of course, there\xe2\x80\x99s the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s strange arch in the middle \xe2\x80\x93 this is likely more of a utility feature than an aesthetic choice, but we\xe2\x80\x99ll get to that later.
urprisingly, TiVo still uses a mechanical hard drive here (likely to keep costs down). The new Bolt is available in a 500GB model for $300 and a 1,000GB (that\xe2\x80\x99s 1 TB to everyone else) goes for $400. One year of TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s service (normally $150 per year) is included with each. \t\t\t
622\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
942\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
In the box with the\xc2\xa0Bolt is a white 12-volt DC power cable, a white TiVo remote, and a black 6-foot HDMI cable, along with a setup and product features guide.
ot much is new in terms of connectivity for the TiVo Bolt. The most notable change is the inclusion of an HDMI 2.0a compliant output for the latest 4K UHD support. You\xe2\x80\x99ll also find two USB 2.0 ports and an eSATA port for external storage.
iVo needed a new look, and the Bolt supplies this in a bold way.
n Ethernet port provides a hard-lined connection to the Internet, which we recommend for 4K UHD content streaming, though a built-in Wi-Fi adapter is available (which won\xe2\x80\x99t work with the TiVo mini, by the way). For those with neither of the aforementioned network options, the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s coaxial cable connector does support MoCA for Internet over a cable connection \xe2\x80\x94 separate MoCA adapter required. Inside the Bolt is a 4-tuner DVR capable of recording \xe2\x80\xa6 you guessed it, four shows at a time.
iVo also placed the box\xe2\x80\x99s CableCARD slot underneath the unit, behind a small panel.
On the feature front, however, plenty is new. Here\xe2\x80\x99s the breakdown
kipMode \xe2\x80\x93 Perhaps the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s most exciting new feature (and likely to be its most controversial), SkipMode takes TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s ad-avoidance capabilities to the next level. Rather than force users to press a skip button several times during commercial breaks, SkipMode removes them automatically at the press of a single button. Here\xe2\x80\x99s the catch, though: SkipMode works only with certain primetime and late night TV shows, and only after they have been completely recorded \xe2\x80\x93 it won\xe2\x80\x99t work if you start watching while the recording is in progress. Still, this new feature gives users an extremely powerful tool for cruising through their favorite programs, requiring minimal effort to avoid long-running ads along the way.
QuikMode \xe2\x80\x93 This feature allows the user to get through long-running programs a little bit faster. Similar to the speeding up of syndicated content that certain networks employ in order to cram in more ads, QuickMode speeds up the show by 30 percent (1.3 times the standard play rate) but without raising the pitch of the sound. For example, you could cruise through a 3-hour sports broadcast in just 2 hours and 6 minutes, but the game announcers won\xe2\x80\x99t sound like chipmunks \xe2\x80\xa6 they\xe2\x80\x99ll just sound like auctioneers.
4K UHD Apps \xe2\x80\x93 Though we\xe2\x80\x99re a little disappointed that 4K UHD app support is a bit scant at launch, the Bolt will support 4K UHD streams from Netflix and YouTube right away. Support for Amazon, Vudu, and other 4K UHD streaming content is expected (and needed) in the near future.
ven more apps \xe2\x80\x93 The Bolt also supports Plex, Pandora, Spotify, and Rdio, connecting you with content you have on your home network, as well as tunes from popular streaming music services.
upport for Apple TV and Fire TV \xe2\x80\x93 TiVo would probably prefer that you invest in one of its TiVo Mini boxes to share stored content with other televisions in the house, but with support for Apple Airplay and a new TiVo Android app available for Fire TV, you can use the streamers you might already have to access all of your recordings. The TiVo Mini is still the best tool for getting the most out of the Bolt, however, with support for SkipMode, QuickMode, and access to streaming apps like Netflix, Amazon Prime, and more.
emote finder \xe2\x80\x93 Press a button on the back of the Bolt and a little song will play from your remote, enabling you to find it among the couch cushions, in the fridge, or wherever else you are prone to misplacing it.
iVo offers the best search feature available on the market. Simply plug the title of what you want to watch into the OneSearch box, and TiVo will show you where you can watch it and how much, if anything, it will cost you. When you search for a movie or TV show, TiVo polls your DVR recordings, live TV, VOD (in select markets), and apps like Netflix, Amazon Prime Instant, and Vudu (depending on whether you have a subscription) to show you where you can watch and if there\xe2\x80\x99s a fee involved. It\xe2\x80\x99s a great way to avoid paying twice for a flick you already paid to have access to.
\xc2\xa0lets you watch live and stored content anywhere you have an Internet connection. And if you know you\xe2\x80\x99re going to be away from the Internet for a long period of time, you can download your stored recordings for offline viewing any time you want. The app also works as a remote control and allows users to manage recordings.
Current TiVo owners will be happy to know the Bolt doesn\xe2\x80\x99t present any unpleasant surprises. The interface looks and feels exactly as you\xe2\x80\x99d expect, so there\xe2\x80\x99s no learning curve. Aside from having to manage some settings in order to get your OnePass recordings going and secure access to your streaming service accounts (entering usernames and passwords), getting the Bolt up and running is a piece of cake.
hose new to TiVo will wonder how they ever put up with their cable company\xe2\x80\x99s terrible interface for so long. Unnecessarily long strings of menu options are a thing of the past with most common commands just a few clicks away. And for a really easy search experience, TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s mobile app cuts a lot of time out of data entry.
For this review, we\xe2\x80\x99re going to focus on evaluating the new features the Bolt brings to the table. We\xe2\x80\x99ll start with QuickSkip which was everything we had hoped it would be. Remarkably, we were able to skip entire segments of The Tonight Show starring Jimmy Fallon so that we could get to the parts we really wanted to see. The skip is nearly instantaneous, and if you\xe2\x80\x99re not certain whether you\xe2\x80\x99re watching a show that is QuickSkip enabled, the Bolt will remind you. Our only complaint (and likely an unreasonable one) is that we can\xe2\x80\x99t use the feature on every show, but that\xe2\x80\x99s just us being greedy. The feature covers most of the primetime favorites, and that\xe2\x80\x99s going to be plenty for most.
QuickMode is a great idea, but we think it will take some getting used to for most folks. Returning to Jimmy Fallon on The Tonight Show, the comedian and host often speaks quickly enough that speeding him up makes some of what he\xe2\x80\x99s saying unintelligible. On top of that, there\xe2\x80\x99s a certain comedy to the sped-up, quick-clipped movement you see when watching standard TV programming. However, we imagine this feature will be great for golf and other slow-paced sports, and an absolute God-send for any long lectures one might have to sit through. Now if only we could QuickMode life when we wanted to!
treaming 4K UHD media went exactly as expected. We think TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s superior services and search abilities make using the Bolt appealing as an alternative to using the 4K UHD apps embedded in Smart TVs. The Bolt also packs plenty of horsepower, quickly loading apps and keeping buffering to a minimum when Internet speeds were sufficient.
Our complaints are few. Chief among them, however, is that there\xe2\x80\x99s no Amazon Prime Instant 4K UHD support right out of the box. You get Amazon Prime, sure, just no 4K UHD video, and that\xe2\x80\x99s a bit of a disappointment.
We\xe2\x80\x99re also sad that out-of-home streaming isn\xe2\x80\x99t available at launch, though TiVO promises it will be offered in a future firmware update.
he Bolt isn\xe2\x80\x99t prepared to handle streaming High Dynamic Range (HDR) content yet, either. The company told Digital Trends that HDR is too much a moving target, with three different formats competing. That may be true, but Amazon has picked its pony, so we can only hope TiVo is prepared to react when Amazon brings this new element of 4K UHD video to consumers.
We should note that the Bolt runs a little warm. Conveniently, however, the box\xe2\x80\x99s exhaust fan is located underneath the chassis at the apex of the angle, maximizing exhaust and cooling potential. The only potential issue we see with the shape, however, is that it is destined to the top component on any stack, as you won\xe2\x80\x99t be placing anything on top of it.
Other issues are just nitpicks. For instance: The included Plex is quartered in the Music and Photos menu, even though it very much plays video.
Up your game and the get the most out of your gear with the following extras, hand-picked by our editors
WD My Book 1TB External Hard Drive
VIZIO M55-C2 55-Inch 4K Ultra HD Smart LED HDTV
While Amazon, Apple, Roku, and Google primarily have the attention of so-called cord-cutters and cord-nevers (those who have given up cable or never had it) the TiVo Bolt appeals to everyone \xe2\x80\x93 and especially cable subscribers \xe2\x80\x93 with a long list of useful features you simply won\xe2\x80\x99t find anywhere else. In a world where the digital content we want to watch is smeared across a jagged landscape, the TiVo Bolt does an outstanding job of putting everything you want to watch, and listen to, in one place. Without a doubt, the Bolt is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s most outstanding product to date.
o Amazon 4K UHD streaming at launch
o out of home streaming at launch
\n\t\t\t\t\t\tDigital Trends helps readers keep tabs on the fast-paced world of tech with all the latest news, fun product reviews, insightful editorials, and one-of-a-kind sneak peeks.\t\t\t\t\t
iVo Roamio OTA review: It feels like going back in time
"TiVo's over-the-air DVR box feels a lot like cable, for better and for worse."
Use commas to separate multiple email addresses
here was an error emailing this page.
"Channel Master DVR+ review: Over-the-air recording that's a bit too basic"
iVo Bolt Vox DVR review: New look, same old app problem
iVo Roamio OTA review: This DVR would be a cord-cutter\xe2\x80\x99s dream machine, if...
If you want to ditch cable without losing the cable DVR experience\xe2\x80\x94warts and all\xe2\x80\x94the TiVo Roamio OTA is your answer.
iVo\xe2\x80\x99s $400 DVR for over-the-air channels has all the creature comforts of a cable box, from the traditional channel grid and button-packed remote control to the seemingly limitless recording options for TV shows and movies. And like TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s own cable boxes, it comes with some powerful ad-skipping features.
But TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s old-school approach to recording broadcasts from an antenna also brings some baggage. It\xe2\x80\x99s easy to get lost in the Roamio OTA\xe2\x80\x99s labyrinthine menus, or forget what button you\xe2\x80\x99re supposed to press. And while TiVo tries to be a complete cord-cutting solution with both over-the-air and streaming video, its options for the latter can\xe2\x80\x99t compete with dedicated streaming boxes like Roku, Amazon Fire TV, Apple TV, and Nvidia Shield TV.
he TiVo Roamio OTA is a hulking piece of creaky plastic, more like a cable box than a modern streaming device. Around back, there\xe2\x80\x99s an HDMI output, an optical audio jack for connecting to older sound systems, and, quizzically, a couple USB ports whose only purpose is to charge other devices (external USB storage is not supported). You supply your own antenna, which plugs into the Roamio OTA\xe2\x80\x99s coaxial input.
"If you want to expand the Roamio OTA's storage, you'll need to replace its existing internal drive. The USB ports are only good for charging devices and the only compatible e-SATA drive was discontinued."
Inside, the box has 1TB of storage\xe2\x80\x94good for about 150 hours of HD programming\xe2\x80\x94and four tuners, so you can watch or record four programs at once. The internal drive is replaceable, but while the Roamio OTA technically allows external storage via a rear e-SATA port, the only supported drive is WD\xe2\x80\x99s DVR Extender, which is no longer manufactured or sold.
qually cable-like is TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s remote control, a hefty implement with more than 40 buttons for changing channels, controlling the TV, controlling playback, and navigating through the TiVo Guide. Having almost every conceivable function just a button press away makes some sense, but it\xe2\x80\x99s going to create whiplash for anyone who\xe2\x80\x99s used to streaming remotes, with their minimalist designs, contextual on-screen menus, and voice search.
he remote does, however, have some welcome departures from cable boxes: It uses an RF signal to control the TiVo\xe2\x80\x94no line-of-sight required\xe2\x80\x94but still includes an IR blaster for your television\xe2\x80\x99s volume, power, and input. Best of all, it lets you easily skip advertisements. Pressing up or the green \xe2\x80\x9cD\xe2\x80\x9d button during commercials automatically takes you to the end of the break on certain programs, and there\xe2\x80\x99s also a dedicated button for jumping ahead by 30 seconds.
"TiVo's remote is loaded with buttons. On the bright side, it has both RF and infrared transmitters."
iVo used to charge for DVR service, but now it\xe2\x80\x99s included in the $400 price. That\xe2\x80\x99s a lot to pay up front, but in the long run it beats paying TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s old $15-per-month service charge.
In terms of raw capabilities, the TiVo Roamio OTA offers an impressive amount of granular controls. When setting up a series recording\xe2\x80\x94a \xe2\x80\x9cOnePass\xe2\x80\x9d in TiVo lingo\xe2\x80\x94you can record just new airings, limit recordings to a specific channel, record in HD only, record in SD only, keep only recent recordings, keep recordings only until you run out space, and add buffer time on either end of the recording. Through TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s \xe2\x80\x9cWishList\xe2\x80\x9d section, you can even program recordings for a specific actor, director, category, or keyword.
iVo also pulls TV episodes from various streaming services into OnePass, so if a show is on Netflix, Amazon Prime, or Hulu, it\xe2\x80\x99ll show up in the same list as your over-the-air recordings. The feature will likely be most beneficial to Hulu subscribers, given that service\xe2\x80\x99s emphasis on network television. With Netflix and Amazon, you may find that there\xe2\x80\x99s not much overlap between recorded and streaming series.
"TiVo's channel guide offers impressively granular control over what you want to watch now and record for later."
Use TiVo enough, and the system will even start automatically recording programs that it thinks you\xe2\x80\x99ll like. You\xe2\x80\x99re still in charge of fine-tuning the suggestion algorithms by giving thumbs up or down to whatever you\xe2\x80\x99re watching, but being able to populate the DVR without programming everything manually is a nice way to feel like you\xe2\x80\x99re getting your money\xe2\x80\x99s worth.
Where TiVo falters is in helping users make sense of its many features. The TiVo Roamio OTA is overwrought with menus that are redundant or of dubious utility, including two separate menus for launching apps, two areas for browsing live TV, and a recommendations row on the main menu that rarely seems relevant. There\xe2\x80\x99s also a menu full of curated movie and TV show \xe2\x80\x9ccollections,\xe2\x80\x9d but TiVo doesn\xe2\x80\x99t label the sources for this content up front, and in many cases the selections are only for rental or purchase.
he whole interface could use a complete overhaul. One is supposedly 
, but we\xe2\x80\x99ve yet to see how that redesign works on a day-to-day basis.
iVo\'s curated "collections" don\'t indicate where the content is coming from, so you won\'t know if it\'s included in a service you already have or if you\'ll need to pay more to access it.
hose issues aside, the TiVo Roamio OTA is also missing some benefits you\xe2\x80\x99d get with other over-the-air DVR solutions.
Its app selection, for instance, is dismal compared to dedicated streaming boxes. New streaming bundles such as Sling TV, PlayStation Vue, and DirecTV Now are absent, and the only TV Everywhere apps are HBO Go and Epix. New streaming services like SeeSo, Pluto.TV, and Filmstruck aren\xe2\x80\x99t available either. The apps that do exist also seem slower than their streaming box counterparts, especially those that come from the Opera TV app store. Don\xe2\x80\x99t expect TiVo to serve all your streaming needs unless they\xe2\x80\x99re fairly basic.
nd unlike OTA DVR products from Tablo, HDHomeRun, and Plex, TiVo can\xe2\x80\x99t stream your recordings onto other connected devices, at least not without additional hardware. Watching TV on your phone or tablet requires a $130 TiVo Stream box, and watching on other televisions requires a 
, raising the cost considerably if you want a whole-home or out-of-home solution.
he TiVo Roamio OTA is still worthwhile for folks who want a powerful DVR solution, but don\xe2\x80\x99t want to deal with the vagaries of streaming. With four tuners, ample recording options, and helpful ad-skipping features, TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s over-the-air DVR excels at squeezing every bit of value out of your antenna signal. It\xe2\x80\x99s just hard to shake the feeling that its best days are behind it.
o comment on this article and other TechHive content, visit our 
"TiVo's over-the-air DVR box feels a lot like cable, for better and for worse."
One-button ad skipping for primetime shows, and a 30-second skip button for everything else
he cost of whole-home DVR is much too high
Jared writes for PCWorld and TechHive from his remote outpost in Cincinnati.
"TechHive helps you find your tech sweet spot. We steer you to products you'll love and show you how to get the most out of them."
"Already a print edition subscriber, but don't have a login?"
Let friends in your social network know what you are reading about
eview: TiVo Bolt stream, DVR + cord shaver
Pricey all-in-1 device is geared toward TV lovers
 link has been posted to your Facebook feed. 
o find out more about Facebook commenting please read the 
eview: TiVo Bolt stream, DVR + cord shaver
\n            Published 9:31 a.m. ET Nov. 4, 2015 | 
Updated 7:43 p.m. ET Nov. 4, 2015
\n    Jefferson Graham reviews the TiVo Bolt, an all in one DVR + streaming device on #TalkingTech.\n    
iVo Bolt is a combo DVR, streaming media device and replacement for your cable box.
MANHATTAN BEACH, Calif. \xe2\x80\x94\xc2\xa0TiVo Bolt is\xc2\xa0a DVR. It\xe2\x80\x99s a media-streaming device. It\xe2\x80\x99s a replacement for your cable box.
"It's actually all of those, as well as a pricey all-in-one unit geared toward\xc2\xa0the TV lover in a big way."
"After spending several weeks watching, recording and finding programming via Bolt, I never want to go back to renting my\xc2\xa0Verizon FIOS set-top box again. And unlike the new (and less expensive) Apple TV, or other streaming boxes from Roku and Amazon, the Bolt offers a major consumer plus. You don't have to change the TV input settings to bring on the streaming. Everything is tied together."
iVo imagines a world in which broadcast, cable TV and streaming media apps like Netflix and Amazon Prime all live in one universe, and if you were to search for a TV series like 
\xc2\xa0on the Bolt, you\xe2\x80\x99ll find entries for CBS, local syndication or streaming on Amazon Prime.
iVo\xe2\x80\x99s program guide is more viewer-friendly than what I get on my cable box, it\xe2\x80\x99s easier to read and more colorful, and finding my taped shows takes fewer clicks than with cable.
iVo threw in a bunch of fun features to sweeten the deal. A \xe2\x80\x9cskip\xe2\x80\x9d button automatically jumps over commercials, taking you from the first segment of the show to the second. It\'s\xc2\xa0a total blast. Fine print alert, though: "skip"\xc2\xa0only works on 20 channels, the broadcast networks and selected cable channels such as AMC, Food Network and Comedy Central, and with shows that have aired from 4 p.m. to midnight.
It wasn\'t that long ago that the broadcast networks were up in arms about technology like this, when the Dish Network introduced the "Hopper" to skip ads. But with TiVo\'s "skip," there has been barely a peep.\xc2\xa0To access the feature with\xc2\xa0TiVo, you need to look for the "SKIP" tag on your recorded show, and then once it starts, hit the D button on the remote.
Via TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s terrific smartphone app for Apple and Android devices, you can watch recorded shows on your device\xc2\xa0within your home network, or just use it as a remote to change channels and adjust volume.
Like streaming boxes from Apple, Roku and others, the Bolt has a collection of entertainment apps \xe2\x80\x94\xc2\xa0including Netflix, Amazon Prime, Vudu and others, but the offerings are skimpy compared to others. TiVo says other apps will be joining the lineup, including HuluPlus and potentially HBO Now.
"Unlike the new Apple TV, the Bolt can show programming that's been presented in ultra-high definition 4K\xc2\xa0via the Netflix and Amazon Prime apps."
"One feature TV lovers should get a kick out of is\xc2\xa0TiVo's suggestions. Once you start recording shows, TiVo begins to figure out your tastes\xc2\xa0and records other shows. For instance, once I asked TiVo to record every episode of "
". (Not that I specifically wanted them, but what the heck. They're nice to have.) But what if you buy the entry-level $300 unit with 500 GB storage\xc2\xa0and don't want these shows clogging up your hard drive? TiVo says not to worry \xe2\x80\x94\xc2\xa0your suggested shows will be deleted first when TiVo looks to make room for the shows you go out to record."
iVo Bolt review from USA TODAY TalkingTech
Finally, let\xe2\x80\x99s look at price. The Bolt starts at $300, but includes one free year of Tivo service, which is $15 per month.
"Still, that's twice as much as an Apple TV or about three times the cost of a Roku."
"Those boxes, of course, can't record shows\xc2\xa0or give you a guide to what's playing on TV."
In this day and age of on-demand streaming, do we still need program guides and DVRs?
"There's a lot that can be watched at one click. But there's still plenty that can't always be seen this way, such as\xc2\xa0complete newscasts, sporting events\xc2\xa0and shows like the aforementioned "
"I like having a DVR and really like the commercial skipper. Plus I love the idea of replacing a cable box with a unit that isn't owned by Verizon."
"It's not cutting the cord, but shaving it a bit."
I give Verizon $420 yearly to rent two set-top DVR boxes. But with the Bolt, I was able to request a \xe2\x80\x9cCableCard,\xe2\x80\x9d which continued to give me service without having to rent Verizon\xe2\x80\x99s equipment.
My $420 got whacked down to $120 a year \xe2\x80\x94\xc2\xa0$5 a month for each card and now the bottom line is a yearly savings of $150.
poiler alert: Cable companies are notorious for being tough to deal with when the "CableCard" is requested, and my experience was no different. It took many calls, tweets and eventually two visits\xc2\xa0to make it work\xc2\xa0for simply inserting a card in\xc2\xa0a TiVo box. But Verizon had to activate it.
With the CableCard\xc2\xa0finally installed and TiVo Bolt running the show, TV is more enjoyable, I don\xe2\x80\x99t have to change the TV input to go back and forth between cable and the streaming box. And\xc2\xa0I\xe2\x80\x99m sending Verizon less money.
\n         to help improve our site experience!\n    
his story is part of the series 
\n                How to take great photos of fireworks
\n                Grandma can now get stream of baby photos
\n                Happy birthday, iPhone \xe2\x80\x94will we get to 2027?
How to Maintain Your Central Air Conditioning Units
How to Avoid Common Car-Seat Installation Mistakes
taying Power: Find the Most Reliable Car
Is Now the Time to Get a TV Antenna?
he Best Insect Repellents for You and Your Family
5 Expert Tips for Staining a Deck
Preserve an open internet where you can access websites without barriers. Make your voice heard by standing up for net neutrality.
"We're fighting to ensure you and your family can get a fair deal in the marketplace, especially on the choices that matter most: health care, privacy, automobiles, food, finances and more. Join our campaigns and together, we'll hold corporations and lawmakers accountable."
1-800-333-0663
By clicking "Create My Account" you accept the terms of our\xc2\xa0
hanks Jennifer. We are looking forward to working with you. We will be in touch
"New TiVo Bolt Seems Like a Binge-Watcher's Dream"
he 4K-ready DVR lets you race past commercials and speed up the action and dialogue when shows get boring
Yes, send me a copy of this email.
. ALL email addresses you provide will be used just for sending this story.\n                        
\n                        Oops, we messed up. Try again later\n                    
Love watching TV shows without commercials? Then you might be interested in the new TiVo Bolt, an all-in-one DVR with a mode that lets you 
In fact, the new player seems to be all about speed. Not only does it rocket you through commercials\xe2\x80\x94one at a time or an entire block\xe2\x80\x94using SkipMode, it also has an innovative QuickMode, which the company claims wisks you through recorded shows up to 30 percent faster without causing any audio sync issues. Imagine watching a replay of the Academy Awards, for example, in less than three hours\xe2\x80\x94all without missing a word.
"SkipMode doesn't work with sports\xe2\x80\x94so you'll have to live with beer ads\xe2\x80\x94but QuickMode can speed up the action during play lags."
Like other TiVo models, the distinctively angled Bolt box offers multiple sources of content\xe2\x80\x94cable, video on demand, over-the air (via an antenna) broadcasts, and streaming\xe2\x80\x94with universal search capability. It can also record up to four shows at once. And its HDMI 2.0 output makes this the first TiVo to support 4K video content.
"The SkipMode ad feature frees you from repeatedly hitting a 30-second skip button or futilely trying to pull your finger off the fast-forward button precisely at commercial's end. For now, though, it's somewhat limited. It only works with recorded programs from specific providers\xe2\x80\x94TiVo says that includes the top 20 most-watched networks\xe2\x80\x94and (unlike QuickMode) it's not offered at all on sports programs. To see if a show is skip-enabled, look in your My Shows folder, where titles will be listed with skip icons beside them."
Let us know what you think of the new TiVo Bolt in the comments section below
"The TiVo Bolt will start appearing in stores October 4th. It's already available online at TiVo, Amazon, and Best Buy. It comes in two flavors: The 500GB hard drive model costs $300 and the 1TB version is priced at $400. Both include one year of TiVo service, which currently costs $150."
iVo says it will offer a few updates this fall, including the ability to create a personalized "what to watch" screen based on your hobbies and interests, and a social sharing feature that provides links so your friends can watch the same show as you.
"The TiVo Bolt replaces the basic TiVo Roamio model in the company's lineup, but the other "
he pursuit of commercial-free TV is nothing new, of course. More than two decades ago a company called Arista introduced a product called Commercial Brake that let you skip past ads on your VCR, and more recently the 
In comparison to the Roamio DVRs, however, the Bolt has a faster processor, improved Wi-Fi (it supports 802.11AC), and more memory, so we imagine it will operate more quickly. If you decide to get a TiVo Bolt, let us know what you think of it, and how well the commercial skip feature works.
Yes, send me a copy of this email.
. ALL email addresses you provide will be used just for sending this story.\n                        
\n                        Oops, we messed up. Try again later\n                    
"\n    Shopping links are provided by eBay Commerce Network and Amazon, which makes it easy to find the right product from a variety of online retailers. Clicking any of the links will take you to the retailer's website to shop for this product. Please note that Consumer Reports collects fees from both eBay Commerce Network and Amazon for referring users. We use 100% of these fees to fund our testing programs.\n"
"I've been a tech journalist for more years than I'm willing to admit. My specialties at CR are TVs, streaming media, audio, and TV and broadband services. In my spare time I build and play guitars and bass, ride motorcycles, and like to sail\xe2\x80\x94hobbies I've not yet figured out how to safely combine."
Great Ways to Watch NFL Games Almost Anywhere
"Comcast to Launch 'Instant TV' Streaming Service This Fall"
"The Many Ways to Watch 'Game of Thrones'"
\n    The global footer component must use the following versions of js/css:\n    /etc/designs/versioned-clientlibs/cr/clientlibs/component/globalFooter-new/css/7-4-1/globalFooter-new.css\n    /etc/designs/versioned-clientlibs/cr/clientlibs/component/globalFooter-new/js/7-2-2/globalFooter-new.js\n\n    If global header and footer componenents are used on the same page, the following dependencies can be used instead\n    of individual header and footer dependencies\n\n    /etc/designs/versioned-clientlibs/cr/clientlibs/component/globalNavigationStandalone/js/7-2-2/globalNavigationStandalone.js\n    /etc/designs/versioned-clientlibs/cr/clientlibs/component/globalNavigationStandalone/css/7-4-1/globalNavigationStandalone.css\n
tart Tablet and mobile only social section
nd Tablet and mobile only social section
9to5Google
9to5Mac
eview: TiVo Bolt+ would be a TV-enthusiast\xe2\x80\x99s dream DVR if the cable companies would just get out of the\xc2\xa0way
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\t- Nov. 4th 2016 4:41 pm ET\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\t\t
, perhaps the most luxurious set-top box ever created. With a monstrous 3TB hard drive, 4K and six tuners, it staked its claim as the king of the hill. TiVo maintained the sleek design of the previous generation despite upping 
. Over the last month, I\xe2\x80\x99ve lived with the Bolt+ as my everyday DVR and now it\xe2\x80\x99s time to share some thoughts. Does TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s high-end feature list\xc2\xa0justify the price tag? Head below to find out\xe2\x80\xa6
It\xe2\x80\x99s been two full generations of products since I\xe2\x80\x99ve been in the TiVo ecosystem.\xc2\xa0In that time, I\xe2\x80\x99ve wandered through the likes of the 
iVo has always stood tall with its impressive software and search functionality. While other providers have spent significant resources focusing on smartphone features and multi-room capabilities, TiVo continually invested deeper into its season pass features. I\xe2\x80\x99ll jump into the software aspect in a moment, but first lets look at the arduous process of adding this DVR to my setup.
he Bolt+ continues the trend of requiring a 
. This cost is in addition to any fees your provider may (likely) impose with this DVR. You can opt for a month-to-month plan at $15, full year at $150 or TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s all-in service plan for $550. That means the Bolt+ could cost upwards of $1,050 before you even factor in your cable subscription. While that is likely to be a deterrent for some, let\xe2\x80\x99s dive into the features before making a final conclusion.
iVo recycled the original Bolt design on its newest DVR, with the only change being its black casing. Most of the real evolution occurred on the inside. TiVo claims that Bolt+ is \xe2\x80\x9c33% smaller\xe2\x80\x9d than competitors in this category. While I can\xe2\x80\x99t speak to that specifically, it certainly takes up less room than my Time Warner set-top box.
On the back is a coax connector, optical audio out, 3.5mm jack, HDMI 2.0 port, gigabit ethernet, dual USB 2.0 ports, an eSATA connector and a spot for the 12V power supply. A tiny button resides off the left that triggers the remote finder feature. Flipping the Bolt + over reveals a hidden door that covers the CableCARD slot. You\xe2\x80\x99ll note that this model does not support OTA signals (but the original Bolt does). The built-in tuner can handle up to six shows at once, up from four on the previous generation.
It\xc2\xa0is anchored by a 3TB hard drive inside that can store up to 450 hours of HD footage. For comparison, DirecTV\xe2\x80\x99s Genie can only hold 200 hours. TiVo has upped the internal processing power significantly over the previous generation with three times the processing power and DDR memory.
Of course, your DVR experience isn\xe2\x80\x99t complete without a solid remote. TiVo includes a color-coded ergonomic remote that is full-featured but doesn\xe2\x80\x99t overwhelm. Given the price tag here, I would\xe2\x80\x99ve expected something with a bit more flash but it gets the job done. Menu and TV controls are at the top while playback and channel selection reside in the lower-third. The remote has an excellent tactile feel to it, which is a welcome feature. TiVo does an excellent job of matching features shown on-screen with corresponding colors on the remote.
iVo\xe2\x80\x99s robust software has always been the cornerstone of its product line. While hardware\xc2\xa0comes and goes, it\xe2\x80\x99s the top-grade search functionality and features that have sustained this brand for many years. Thankfully, we can say that this trend continues on the Bolt+.
One of the calling-card features from TiVo in 2016 is its \xe2\x80\x98Unified Entertainment System\xe2\x80\x99. Like most consumers, I\xe2\x80\x99m a subscriber to other streaming services in addition to cable. Before the Bolt+, I had to switch between my Apple TV or Xbox One to enjoy content from Netflix and the like. TiVo brings that all together into one streamlined experience.
OneSearch presents your subscription services content in-line with shows and movies on cable (kind of like Apple\xe2\x80\x99s 
). For example, if you\xe2\x80\x99re looking to watch an episode of The Office, a simple search reveals all of the upcoming options on cable alongside the full catalog of content on Netflix. There\xe2\x80\x99s no switching back and forth between two apps, with TiVo it\xe2\x80\x99s all there together. I find this feature to be particularly valuable as the third-party app experience on other streaming media players can be very hit-or-miss.
nother new feature on the Bolt line is SkipMode. TiVo actually has real humans marking when commercial breaks begin and end on popular shows during primetime. When you go to watch recorded content, you simply press a button on the remote to skip through the entire commercial break. I\xe2\x80\x99m someone that hates trying to hit the play button at just the right time when fast forwarding, so this feature really stands out for me. I love that TiVo has people on the backend nailing the start and stop times at just the right moment. Another feature, although not as notable, is QuickMode that takes your recorded content and plays it 30% faster with pitch-correct audio. I didn\xe2\x80\x99t find this to be as useful, but it\xe2\x80\x99s an interesting feature for sports, particularly baseball.
iVo is also pushing smartphone connectivity as a main feature on Bolt+. Overall, the iOS experience is ok but not the best that I\xe2\x80\x99ve used. DirecTV\xe2\x80\x99s Genie app really is second-to-none in this area. Right off the bat, it was disappointing that TiVo doesn\xe2\x80\x99t offer native support for iPhone Plus models. Video playback works fine but otherwise everything is just a little off.
hat said, you can access your recorded content or live TV on up to four devices at a time plus manage all of your OnePass subscriptions. This isn\xe2\x80\x99t a mind blowing feature but its one that TiVo executes fairly well. I didn\xe2\x80\x99t have any issues with streaming content during my review and was overall pleased with the experience. The smartphone app is available 
lthough a footnote in the laundry list of specs, Bolt+ has a handy find your remote feature. All you have to do is press a small button on the back of the set-top box and your remote will play a tune. It\xe2\x80\x99s a nice fall-back if you\xe2\x80\x99re someone that regularly looses the remote.
iVo Bolt+ does support 4K video, although I was not able to test that functionality as my provider does not yet offer high resolution content. Overall, I could see an improvement in image quality versus my existing set-top box. As 4K continue to grow, Bolt+ is prepared for the next generation of shows and movies.
iVo continues\xc2\xa0the trend of being one of the absolute best ways to enjoy television. Its extensive search and backend software make it a dream for someone that records a lot of content through the week. The massive 3TB hard drive and six tuners sit head and shoulders above the competition. It\xe2\x80\x99s also one of the most attractive DVRs that we\xe2\x80\x99ve ever laid eyes on.
hose compliments aside, TiVo faces an ever-increasing uphill battle against the competition. I referenced my frustration that was caused during the initial setup period with my provider. The bottom line is, all of the big-names in this industry would prefer that you use their own set-top boxes. It allows them to push more content and offer greater control over their customer\xe2\x80\x99s experience. Even worse, DirecTV, Dish Network and Comcast are making huge strides in the areas that TiVo has long dominated. Add in the extra steps required to get the Bolt+ up and running?\xc2\xa0
revor Daugherty is the Senior Editor of 9to5Toys. Since joining in 2014, he\xe2\x80\x99s specialized in product reviews, exclusive discounts and 9to5\xe2\x80\x99s New Toy of the Day. Contact him direct at trevor@9to5mac.com.
he Best Christmas Stockings to buy now
he new Jim Beam smart decanter is like Amazon Echo
uper Mario cereal slated to hit super market shelves
Outfit your ride w/ a new CarPlay receiver
How To Watch TV Online and Over-the-Air
05/03/2016
Falling in Love with TiVo Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s Slick\xc2\xa0Features and Elegant Design
iVo\xe2\x80\x99s top tier iteration to the OTA DVR Streaming Box brings together\xc2\xa0your OTA signal, DVR and all your streaming options via a single smooth interface. No need to switch from device to device in order to find the show you want to watch.
One of the most valuable assets in a cord cutters toolbox is the OTA\xc2\xa0DVR. A drawback to over-the-air (OTA) television is that if you miss a show, you miss the show; but DVR\xe2\x80\x99s help restore that balance by helping you record everything. For many cord cutters, the DVR is the bow they use to tie off their cord cutting experience; so making the right choice is always critical. 
Most recently, DVR giant TiVo unveiled their next generation of home DVRs, dubbed the Bolt. The Bolt is a product\xc2\xa0upgrade on their existing, yet similar product, the 
. This latest iteration of the companies home DVR is meant to provide an\xc2\xa0all in one entertainment experience, replacing all other 
Featuring four tuners, the Bolt allows you to record up to four shows at once. To record the content, you will of course\xc2\xa0still need to connect to\xc2\xa0an 
, but that\xe2\x80\x99s nothing new. The Bolt also works with cable television, but who cares? We\xe2\x80\x99re trying to\xc2\xa0cut costs, not inflate them.
From a hardware perspective, everything has been upgraded and condensed.\xc2\xa0So the Bolt is not only smaller than other DVRs, it\xe2\x80\x99s also faster and more powerful.
s far as price is concerned, the 500GB Bolt is going to cost you 
)\xc2\xa0will provide approximately 75 hours of HD video recording. Or you can go with the 1TB version, costing around\xc2\xa0
), and you will get\xc2\xa0approximately 150 hours of HD video recording. You\xe2\x80\x99ll also have to pay service fee; which will either run you $15 a month, $150 a year or $600 for a lifetime.
With online streaming capabilities, you can download streaming apps like Netflix, 
, Hulu, and YouTube. No word on whether or not it will support 
If you\xe2\x80\x99re a fan of super high resolution, then I\xe2\x80\x99ve got good news: the Bolt supports 4k. Currently, you can only get 4k from YouTube and Netflix, but 4k for Amazon Prime is on the way. Sadly, the 4k support doesn\xe2\x80\x99t do much for you in the way of OTA television; we\xe2\x80\x99re years away from that (at least for the average consumer).
Where the Bolt shines brightest is in its interface. The TiVo Bolts makes it incredibly easy to search for new content across streaming services and OTA television. You can search for shows by genre, actor, director, etc\xe2\x80\xa6 And all of your content is sorted by title, not by source.
What that means is that if you\xe2\x80\x99re trying to watch 
, you won\xe2\x80\x99t have to jump between Netflix, Hulu, and your DVR. Instead, you\xe2\x80\x99ll just pull up the show and all of the available content will be there. You\xe2\x80\x99ll also be able to see content available for purchase and be able to compare it across different services.
o learn more about what the TiVo Remot has to offer, here is a 
he Bolt also features some pretty smart recording features that can automatically record content that it thinks you might like or can record content based off a specific actor or director. If you\xe2\x80\x99re not a fan of automatic recording, no worries; you can easily turn it off.
Perhaps my favorite feature is QuickMode, which allows you to speed up a program by 30 percent\xe2\x80\xa6 with pitch-correct audio. That means if you\xe2\x80\x99re a glutton for punishment and decided to watch a Presidential Debate, you can speed things up without having to listen to the chipmunk voice.
his also has a huge appeal for 
\xc2\xa0with not a lot of time. Ever want to record your favorite 
he Adobe Flash Player is required for video playback.
ll in all the Bolt is a fantastic DVR with a wonderful interface, features, and design. That being said, the worst part about it is the price; especially the monthly service fee. If you\xe2\x80\x99re the kind of person that loves to tinker with things, you may be better off 
However, if you\xe2\x80\x99re the kind of person that doesn\xe2\x80\x99t mind paying a little more for an intuitive and enjoyable experience; you should definitely give the Bolt a look. 
What do you think about the Bolt? Is it a must-have for cord cutters or just another thing you don\xe2\x80\x99t need? Sound off in the comments below!
What you Need to Know about Rabbit TV
Black Friday Deals Week \xe2\x80\x93 Up to 85% Off
6 Ways to Watch College Football Without Cable
FL Game Pass allows you to Watch Every NFL Game Online, All Season Long\xc2\xa0
Could Amazon Fire TV be used as a Cable TV Alternative?
5 Ways to Watch NFL Football without Cable TV
Cord Cutter\xe2\x80\x99s Guide to the NBA Finals \xe2\x80\x93 June 2017
ling TV Offers the Most Cost Effective DVR Available
Watch 2017 NBA Finals Without Cable \xe2\x80\x93 1st Round
How Amazon Prime Started the Downloadable Revolution
MAZON DAILY DEALS \xe2\x80\x93 Up to 85% Off
"Leave this field empty if you're human: "
Portion of our profits go to the WWF
\n                    The Latest news for the marketing & media industries.\n                
\n                    Explore the latest, and greatest, creative work from around the globe.\n                
\n                    Providing great companies with the recognition they deserve.\n                
\n                    Holding events to support, inform, challenge and advise.\n                
\n                    Latest insights, case studies and news from agencies, tech vendors, freelancers and other organisations.\n                
\n                    Search 2,345 jobs in marketing, advertising, creative and media.\n                
\n                 Take a fresh approach to raising your profile with potential clients.\n                
\n                    Features providing insights into the marketing industries.\n                
\n                    Creating compelling content your customers will love.\n                
\n                    The fastest way to find the right agency\n                
ir New Zealand wishes passengers a \xe2\x80\x98Mirry Christmus\xe2\x80\x99
Creative sector grew twice as fast as wider economy in 2015-16
etsafe and DDB NZ use artificial intelligence to waste the time of email scammers
Coca-Cola Christmas truck faces ban over obesity fears
eview: The Tivo Bolt will make you forget about cord cutting
11:00am
), and guest contributors, bring the inside track on the latest developments in the TV space.
here\xe2\x80\x99s a general sentiment in the TV industry that cord cutting (the art of ending your traditional cable subscription) will very soon be the norm. With the latest F.C.C. 
iVo, the television device manufacturer and technology company is disproving that by innovating around your cable subscription, even your cable company isn\xe2\x80\x99t. The new 
, released in 2015, not only allows you to completely skip commercial breaks, but the connected device includes apps for Netflix, Amazon Prime Video and most recently, Hulu.
Found Remote is giving the TiVo BOLT 4.8/5 Remotes.
he TiVo Bolt costs $299.99 and includes a free year of the TiVo service. After the first year, the service costs $149.99 per year (roughly $12.50/month). Here are the details of my experience test driving the TiVo BOLT at home over the past few months.
ransitioning from my DVR to a TiVo
Like many I was skeptical about moving away from my Verizon FiOS DVR because I had been using it for so long and generally didn\xe2\x80\x99t have much to complain about. I also had recorded programs saved on my DVR from years ago that I didn\xe2\x80\x99t want to lose in the transition.
dditionally, the general sentiment around TiVo among the ignorant (which I was once myself) was that TiVo was some company from the late 1990s early 2000s that had been made irrelevant once the cable companies white-labeled their own digital video recorders.
hen I slowly began to learn that this wasn\xe2\x80\x99t the case. Not only was TiVo still around but also they had been innovating around the television experience for the last decade;I, on the other hand, had been stuck in the past with a DVR that had looked and operated the same way for the last decade. After a friend in the industry recommended that I switch and after another 
When the TiVo arrived it came in a beautiful box, with fun messaging all over it about how they\xe2\x80\x99ve been innovating the TV experience. Setting it up was easy for the most part. I had avoided renting a CableCARD from Verizon because it wasn\xe2\x80\x99t 100% clear to me if I needed one or if I could instead use my Verizon box as a proxy until I was sure I wanted to stick with the TiVo.
fter I learned that I definitely needed a CableCARD, I needed to figure out what a cablecard actually was. TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s website said I would 
When the CableCARD arrived it was very easy to setup and the only issue I had was that for many channels, the Electronic Program Guide (EPG) data wasn\xe2\x80\x99t showing up - meaning that for many channels it wasn\xe2\x80\x99t showing me the names of the programs that were on. After some troubleshooting with TiVo support, I ran the setup again and it worked fine.
etting up my preferences, recorded shows and apps
fter the small hiccups in setting up the device I was a bit worried about other hurdles that I might face. Then I realized that the two small issues I had dealt with, confusion around a CableCARD and issues with the EPG data were simply cases of TiVo having to mold around old-school ways that the providers distribute TV.
From the moment I finished setting up the device, I felt as though I travelled into the future to a world where traditional TV had actually been innovated.
I was able to customize the guide so that only the channels I actually watched showed up - this took me two minutes at most.
here was no way to automatically have my Verizon DVRed shows show up on TiVo, but after making a list of all my DVRed shows it took me just an hour to set them all up under TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s 
If I happened to be watching a standard definition channel by accident, TiVo would ask me if I\xe2\x80\x99d rather watch it in HD instead. The entire user experience and design was amazing. Navigating through their software from apps, to TV, to my recorded shows felt like I was on a computer more than a TV. What would take me five minutes of frustratingly slow selecting on my DVR took a mere few seconds on the TiVo. After a day I was shocked anyone was still using the DVR their cable companies provided.
hey also had a trending section to show what most people were watching on TV right now. This is made possible based on the fact that you are watching traditional TV on a device that\xe2\x80\x99s actually connected to the internet. I was amazed.
he only thing that tripped me up was that I had the \xe2\x80\x9cSuggestions\xe2\x80\x9d setting turned on, which I didn\xe2\x80\x99t know and I didn\xe2\x80\x99t understand. I\xe2\x80\x99m a recorder who only wants new episodes recorded and even though I selected that option when I set up each of my OnePass shows there were still older episodes recording. This was because of the \xe2\x80\x9cSuggestions\xe2\x80\x9d 
, which seems well intentioned but ended up confusing me a lot. When I turned it off everything was back to normal.
My Verizon FiOS app had been okay. When it worked I was able to record shows remotely and check what was in my queue. Besides that I used it to pay my bill. The TiVo 
It can easily be used as a remote for your TiVo and you can access and watch anything you\xe2\x80\x99ve recorded from your iPhone as long as you are connected to the same wifi that your TiVo is connected to. Once watching on your iPhone you can then use Apple\xe2\x80\x99s AirPlay to stream what you\xe2\x80\x99re watching to another TV in your house that has an AppleTV. Further, if you want to watch something that\xe2\x80\x99s currently on the air, with one tap you can do that and TiVo will start recording it so you can access it from your device.
he best part is that accessing the content works seamlessly via their player. There\xe2\x80\x99s no delay, rewinding and skipping ahead is easy and it doesn\xe2\x80\x99t prevent someone from using the the TiVo with the main TV it\xe2\x80\x99s connected to.
iVo\xe2\x80\x99s VP of Product Management and Strategy 
fter a couple of weeks of experiencing TV through TiVo I started to realize how much amazing data they were sitting on top of. Over Thanksgiving I was catching up on Showtime\xe2\x80\x99s Homeland which I had recorded. Whenever I paused it an ad from HBO would show up at the bottom encouraging me to watch The Leftovers, making corny, but catchy references to Thanksgiving leftovers.
I\xe2\x80\x99m not sure how Showtime would feel about that but it was extremely clever and targeted advertising and did cause me to catch up on The Leftovers right after I finished Homeland. The potential for non-intrusive and addressable advertising is huge with TiVo.
he biggest disappointment was the fact that I could no longer access Verizon FiOS On-Demand using the CableCARD with my TiVo. Denney explained why Verizon and Time Warner aren\xe2\x80\x99t offering On-Demand to TiVo. \xe2\x80\x9cVoD in our retail offering is integrated on a case by case basis in cooperation with the operator,\xe2\x80\x9d Denney explained to Found Remote. \xe2\x80\x9cComcast and Cox are the two operators that have cooperated in this effort so far,\xe2\x80\x9d he added.
For a minute I thought this might be a deal breaker for me as I used On-Demand often to binge watch and access shows I had forgotten to record or was unable to because I was recording too many other shows.
It quickly became a non-issue for two reasons. With the TiVo I was able to record up to four shows at the same time, with my DVR only two. Also, every major network now has their own apps where you can watch their contact so On-Demand is quickly becoming a senior citizen along with DVDs and non-smartphones.
Using Netflix, Amazon Prime Video and Hulu
I\xe2\x80\x99m an Apple TV loyalist (the older one, I haven\xe2\x80\x99t purchased the newer more expensive one yet), using Roku mostly to access Amazon Prime Video which isn\xe2\x80\x99t available on the Apple TV. I didn\xe2\x80\x99t plan on using the streaming apps that TiVo made available, especially since they didn\xe2\x80\x99t include Hulu (only Netflix and Amazon when it came to the apps I cared about). In December, TiVo 
I decided to login to my Netflix, Hulu and Amazon accounts on TiVo and since then I\xe2\x80\x99ve only been using them via TiVo. The reason why is simple - there\xe2\x80\x99s now less of a need to switch inputs on my TV, those few seconds saved means more TV and less jumping around.
he ultimate question ends up being - do you actually save money using a TiVo over your provider\xe2\x80\x99s DVR. For myself the experience of using a TiVo was so exponentially better that I didn\xe2\x80\x99t care if I had to pay a bit more. In reality, that doesn\xe2\x80\x99t work when bills are piling up.
enney explained to Found Remote that \xe2\x80\x9cTiVo BOLT also saves you money compared to a cable DVR. Where cable providers charge you not only for channels, but also bill you rental fees, DVR fees, etc., TiVo allows you to pay a one-time price for the box and only one monthly service fee no matter how many TVs you\xe2\x80\x99ve connected to your BOLT.\xe2\x80\x9d
Here\xe2\x80\x99s my reality: After the one time fee for the device and a free year of their service, the cost per month is only $12.50 compared to the nearly $16.99/month Verizon had been charging me to rent my DVR. The cable card only costs $4.99/month - so after a year I will end up paying about $.50 more for an extremely better experience. I never had a second box in my apartment but the fact that I can now access my shows on my iPhone is giving me an added value that\xe2\x80\x99s way worth the $.50. Also, my Verizon bill is often confusing with taxes and service charges, so one less item I have to worry about on it, is a savior.
iVo, the company, which is publicly traded on NASDAQ is going through some 
While their subscribers have traditionally gone down 
, the new F.C.C. regulations could change the game completely for them and the need for a CableCARD at all could be obsolete as software takes over.
In addition to acquiring Aereo\xe2\x80\x99s distribution lists and launching an antenna 
, they recently had a major presence at CES showing off the BOLT.
Why you should be using a TiVo to become a cord supplementer
enney told Found Remote that \xe2\x80\x9cTiVo BOLT brings all of your content together into one place for you to manage.  Features like OnePass, universal search and OTT application support mean that you get one point of control for all content, whether from a streaming service or cable provider.  The result is a much better viewing experience.\xe2\x80\x9d
I couldn\xe2\x80\x99t agree more. As a passionate TV viewer and fan, immediacy and convenience are of utmost importance. I want to watch my favorite shows the second they air, in one experience with as little tapping, clicking or selecting as possible. For awhile I was planning on cutting the cord and using a friend or family member\xe2\x80\x99s password to authenticate into TV everywhere apps.
Found Remote is giving the Tivo BOLT 4.8/5 Remotes for a near perfect experience. .1 Remotes was deducted for the confusion around setup, .05 for the lack of On-Demand integration, and .05 for the confusing Suggestions feature.
ow that I have a TiVo BOLT I feel like I\xe2\x80\x99ve reclaimed the traditional TV experience, combined it with my favorite streaming apps and a mobile experience, and created that 2016 TV viewing experience I was hoping for.
xplore the best jobs in Marketing and Media industries
I help run the Shorty Awards (http://shortyawards.com) and Muck Rack (http://muckrack.com). I also watch a lot of TV and write about it occasionally. http://linkd.in/nedelsburg
libaba-owned video site Youku strikes a deal with Netflix for its \xe2\x80\x98Day and Night\xe2\x80\x99 series
Header bidding and where it\xe2\x80\x99s going next year
Why Betsson Group is betting on a more transparent digital media model 
Global digital marketing software industry set to reach $74.96bn by 2022 
London buses could now be fuelled by your morning coffee
Why Saatchi & Saatchi\xe2\x80\x99s Mia Silverman collects KitKat wrappers | Creative Pursuits
"'None of it made sense at times': RYOT CMO on what makes a great story"
Botumentary: how media companies are using bots for personalisation
"\xe2\x80\x98Cute, but I didn\xe2\x80\x99t get the ending\xe2\x80\x99: Londoners\xe2\x80\x99 unfiltered reactions to John Lewis's Christmas..."
he future of health marketing and how brands can get involved
irecting the 80s in 2017: inside Vaughan & Anthea\xe2\x80\x99s Christmas reunion for House of Fraser
s it unveils A Christmas Love Story, Vodafone reveals how Martin Freeman is its gift of relevance
\n                        From Soho to Singapore, Scotland to San Francisco, discover the people, campaigns and tech transforming the marketing industry and the world at large. 
- Access to The Drum app with over a year of archives
- 800 pages of inspiring content every year
Marketers that invest in attributed reporting can influence the customer journey, new report...
Marketers can solve marketing and data silos with next generation marketing technology, according...
Festive campaigns pressure: a how-to-guide for marketers on better collaboration 
dapt or die: How technology is transforming in-store shopping experiences
\xc2\xa9 Carnyx Group Ltd 2017 | The Drum is a Registered Trademark and property of Carnyx Group Limited. All rights reserved.
Please use international format for Phone entry.
I have read and agree to the Pissed Consumer
\n            What was your experience with Tivo?\n        
\n            Tivo Roamio Plus Streaming Media Player        
"\n                                    Being a long term customer who has been happy with my service for the nearly 15 years I've had it, I read some of these reviews and laugh. Now don't get me wrong some of these are legitimate complaints but some are just the failure of the consumer to comprehend what...                            "
Many numerous & lengthy phone calls to service. Sometimes disconnected after waiting 10-15 minutes. Each rep has you repeat the same steps, which sound scripted. No fix or sol...
Long time Tivo customer extremely irate with lack of Customer Service
\n                                    I am a long time Tivo customer and have been swearing by Tivo for at least twelve years and have recommended it to numerous friends. But right now I am so angry at the lack of simple, common customer-oriented service that I could scream. There are currently three Tivo...                            
\n                                    Purchased a new TiVo Bolt and life time service package. Within 6 weeks began experiencing technical issues. Service tech fixed and it worked for about 4 weeks before the same issue arose. Second phone call again resolved the issue and stated that if it happened again...                            
\n                I live in Roswell New Mexico and every Tivo customer in Roswell is getting the wrong Guide from you. I work for the local cable company And hear the Tivo complaints all the time Your guide has been wrong for almost a year! I believe we are getting the east coast, but are supposed to get the mountain time zone. So please fix this problem as soon as possible.            
\n                Wow, and i though Comcast had bad customer service. I was about to buy the bolt with a lifetime membership. Will look elsewhere for dvr equipment. If this product is as good as Tivo claims their customer service would reflect it. A product is only as food as its customer service. Sam            
\n                                    My mini Tivo stopped talking to the main Tivo. They said I needed a new mini and could provide me with one for $39.00, But they would have to charge me an expedited fee to receive it right away, which would be refunded in one to two billing cycles...what? I paid full...                            
ivo - Green screen means you are screwed (out of a system and $$)
\n                                    i have been a loyal tivo customer for 12 years. i cant remember a time i have been more angry in my adult life. i purchased my roamio plus 3.5 years ago and purchased a lifetime subscription (close to $1,000 in total). two days ago in the middle of watching a show, my...                            
Way i felt devalued as a customer
ivo - Money paid for no service
\n                                    I cancelled my service last year and told them I had thrown out all my boxes. They kept charging me every month. When I called them today They told me I accepted a two month free service. Why would I do that when I have no boxes. They refused to give me a refund I...                            
"\n                                    I've been a loyal TIVO owner since the company's founding. When my #3 DVR broke down I replaced it with a BOLT. I won't detail the problems I had trying to repair the former DVR or ordering the BOLT -- suffice it to say customer service was subpar -- not at all what...                            "
crewed by Tivo .. took my money without my permission!
"\n                                    Bought new Tivo on eBay. Tivo just charged me for it again because their Seller did not pay Tivo. So I have paid twice! Don't buy Tivo .. they don't give a *** about their customers! Not only that .. they charged my credit card without my permission!! Don't buy Tivo .....                            "
ivo - Terrible service - no loyalty
\n                                    TiVo was purchased 9 yrs ago and worked well. It finally died a year ago so the monthly service was cancelled. The monthly service has a "continual care coverage" policy that states "if your TiVo BOLT or TiVo Roamio needs repair within the first 90 days from your date...                            
95002-2160
367-8486
ivo bolt stuck on accuiring channel info 89%\xc2\xa0
ivo - Review in Entertainment category  from Anacortes, Washington\xc2\xa0
ivo - BEWARE - They try to prevent you from cancelling!
\n                                    This is a copy of an email I sent to Tivo - You people will not let me CANCEL this account. I am posting compaints on the Consumer Affairs website, and as many feedback forums as I can find and am writing to the Florida Attorney General. I called (recorded) at 14:44...                            
everal phone calls later, FINALLY got them to cancel.  What a hassle!  And now my entire Tivo system is worthless.  A week after cancelling, not only did the TV Guide stuff s...
ttempts to prevent cancellation and bill for unused service
o you have something to say about Tivo?
What happened? What can we help\n            you with?
\n            Pissed Consumer \xc2\xa9 2017 All\n            Rights Reserved\n        
eviews submitted through "Contact Us" form will not get published on site or forwarded to Tivo. However, many companies do monitor reviews on our site.
Can one of TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s offerings make your DVR dreams come true?
he TiVo is a third-party DVR system that can be hooked up to nearly any cable provider\xe2\x80\x99s service, offering an alternative to the proprietary\xe2\x80\x94and sometimes clunky\xe2\x80\x94DVR systems that cable companies provide.
he company has been in the business for a long time, with the original TiVo coming to market in 1999, and it still offers one of the best values in the DVR business. In fact, we ranked the TiVo T6 third in our roundup of 
here are two ways to get a TiVo
, you can get a TiVo T6 as your HD DVR system.
You can also buy your own TiVo, either directly from the company or through a third-party seller like Amazon, and then use it with nearly any cable provider.
his compatibility with multiple providers is what makes TiVo stand out in a world where every cable company offers its own proprietary DVR system with different features and user interfaces.
Find out what RCN plans are available in your area.
First box is included; \nadditional boxes are $9.99 per month
First box is included; \nadditional boxes are $9.99 per month
2/14/2017
earches through your cable channels and streaming entertainment apps from one convenient interface
Provides suggestions for programming to watch based on what you like
Offers 1 TB of storage (150 hours of HD and 1,000 hours of SD)
ecords up to 6 shows at once
Uses built-in apps for several services, including Netflix and Facebook
Has whole-home DVR capabilities with TiVo Mini boxes
Here\xe2\x80\x99s an overview of the tech specs of the T6
16.5\xe2\x80\xb3
9.7\xe2\x80\xb3
2.4\xe2\x80\xb3
6.09\xe2\x80\xb3
6.09\xe2\x80\xb3
1.3\xe2\x80\xb3
If you want to go the DIY route and pick up your own TiVo without going through RCN, 
. The TiVo Mini boxes for your additional TVs cost $149.99 each.
here are a few different TiVo models available, including some branded versions offered through cable providers. The current lineup is as follows
ssentially, the OTA is a cord-cutter\xe2\x80\x99s dream that brings together free broadcast TV available to everyone with various TV-streaming and movie services into a single interface.
standard DVRs that work with cable TV services, but are only available through TiVo or a third-party seller
. They don\xe2\x80\x99t come bundled with cable subscriptions like the T6. Instead, you\xe2\x80\x99ll pay a subscription fee directly to TiVo that is roughly equivalent to the DVR fees you would pay to a cable provider. In terms of features, the BOLT is a newer version than the T6 used by RCN. The main difference is the size and shape\xe2\x80\x94the BOLT is much smaller and curved and can only record four programs at once. It does offer 4K output, though, 
. The BOLT+ triples the storage of the standard BOLT, from 1 TB to 3 TB.
 TiVo T6 from RCN will cost you $15 per month. Whole-Home Bundles start at $20 per month for two TVs and add an extra $5 for every additional box.
If you buy your own TiVo, you\xe2\x80\x99ll have to pay a $14.99 per month subscription fee to TiVo, like the DVR fee that cable providers charge. You can also opt to pay the fee annually for $149.99, saving $30, or go for the All-In Plan, which is a one-time fee of $549.99 that covers you for life. With the All-In Plan, you\xe2\x80\x99ll break even at about forty-two months (a little over three years), so if you think you\xe2\x80\x99ll be using TiVo longer than that, you could potentially save quite a bit of money.
s mentioned, the TiVo boxes can work with any cable provider. This means that you can buy your own TiVo and take the same DVR experience across multiple providers, which is great if you move. Plus, with more providers moving away from the contract model, you have the freedom to try out several different providers without learning a new DVR interface every time.
iVo does not currently work with other fiber services like 
\xe2\x80\x94if you want fiber, you\xe2\x80\x99ll have to stick with Fios. As far as satellite goes, you can use a TiVo box with 
, but not without some help\xe2\x80\x94you\xe2\x80\x99ll need a separate receiver from DIRECTV to use any of the current TiVo models. 
he TiVo T6 is a pretty standard-looking DVR box, but it\xe2\x80\x99s not a bad-looking box by any means. On the left side, you\xe2\x80\x99ll find your power button and indicator light. There are no ports on the front\xe2\x80\x94everything is nicely tucked away, giving the T6 a clean, sleek appearance. The TiVo BOLT models add some variety with a white option. The whole BOLT package is much smaller and generally more attractive looking.
Inside, you\xe2\x80\x99ll find the 1 TB hard drive with plenty of room for your recorded shows. In fact, for its size, the T6 can store more hours of SD programming than any other top DVRs. The HD storage falls a bit short, at only 150 hours, but only hardcore digital pack rats are likely to ever fill that up.
In terms of output, the T6 offers only 1080p HD resolution\xe2\x80\x94no 4K here. While there is still a relative lack of 4K content out there, it\xe2\x80\x99s becoming more common every year, and 4K TVs are seeing big price drops. TiVo does have the newer BOLT series boxes that support 4K, but as of right now, you can only get them directly from TiVo, which can get expensive. Hopefully RCN will upgrade to one of the newer BOLT options soon.
he remote is a standard size and shape with a clean look. The number pad sits near the bottom, while the middle is dominated by playback controls and a big on-demand button. At the top, you\xe2\x80\x99ll find buttons for various functions like the TV guide and the thumbs-up and thumbs-down buttons that TiVo uses to build your recommendation list.
iVo really excels here. The integration between your streaming services and provider programming is an outstanding idea that works well. You can search for a movie or show and receive results from not only live TV, but also the Netflix and Hulu apps, or any of the other included services you might use. This can save a lot of time since you won\xe2\x80\x99t have to jump in and out of different apps or the TV guide.
he TiVo will also recommend programming to you based on what it thinks you\xe2\x80\x99ll like. It learns your preferences based on your use of the thumbs-up and thumbs-down buttons on the remote. The suggestions work well, but if you find them lacking, TiVo suggests making more liberal use of the thumbs-up button, giving the same program two or three ratings rather than just one. In any case, it\xe2\x80\x99s a handy feature that can help dig up shows you may not have discovered otherwise.
he TiVo boxes have built-in apps for Netflix, Hulu, and Amazon Prime, which should cover most streaming needs. Add in RCN\xe2\x80\x99s on-demand library and you should never have a problem finding something to watch.
Whether you choose to get your TiVo through RCN or independently, it\xe2\x80\x99s hard to go wrong. All the TiVo boxes offer competitive specs, great user experiences, and convenient integration of streaming and cable TV services. Add in the ability to take it with you to new providers, and it\xe2\x80\x99s no wonder we named it the \xe2\x80\x9cBest Value\xe2\x80\x9d in 
2017\xe2\x80\x99s
o You Know Your State\xe2\x80\x99s Favorite Old-School Anime?
What Does Your State Google on Cinco de Mayo?
ave is a freelance writer with a passion for tech and how it improves our lives. His work has been published on a variety of sites around the web.
he 5 Best TV Mounts on the Market
he Best Sound Systems for Your TV
Your email address will not be published.
2010-2017
2015-12-16T17:14:00.349Z
"The TiVo Bolt integrates traditional cable and 4K streaming into a seamless, single system. It's lacking a bit in app variety, but if you're a serious TV enthusiast clinging on to cable, the Bolt is near unbeatable in what it offers."
In the early aughts, TiVo pioneered a new technology called digital video recording (DVR) that captured the spirit of watching television. It freed entertainment from the shackles of time, and gave viewers the ability to watch content on their own terms.
It would take nearly a decade for traditional cable operators to catch on and employ that technology in their own boxes, passing those development costs onto subscribers along the way. Then, when DVR finally went mainstream, the industry turned away from cable entirely, making all the work that those companies put into the DVR over the last few years moot.
It might not make much sense, then, for a company like TiVo to continue developing DVRs when the term "cord-cutter" has been on everyone\'s mind for the past five years. It might seem even more confusing to see a DVR \xe2\x80\x93 well, it\'s more than a DVR, but I\'ll get to that in a minute \xe2\x80\x93 cost $299 for a 500GB version or $399 for a 1TB system. (This specific system isn\'t available in the UK or Australia, however TiVo\'s technology can be found in set-top boxes made by Virgin.)
"But the beauty of TiVo's new Bolt system is that it's more than a DVR or a "
Put as succinctly as possible: the TiVo Bolt is your shows and movies, when you want them, where you want them.
"Most of us have anywhere between two and four black rectangular boxes sitting in our entertainment cabinet. They're usually perfectly flat, stack nicely and look like they were designed by the exact same engineer."
But instead of following in those footsteps, the TiVo Bolt has some pretty surprising design ideas, including a sloped top and an all-white shell that houses some seriously fast hardware.
"If you're looking for a size comparison to other DVRs, the TiVo Bolt is 33% smaller than TiVo's own Roamio and 65% smaller than the Roamio Plus and Pro. For non-TiVo owners, that translates to 11.4 x 7.3 x 1.8 inches (W x D x H), or roughly the size of a Sony PS4."
"The front, top and sides of the box are all smooth and, for the most part, completely blank. There's an indicator LED and a small TiVo logo on the front, but otherwise the Bolt is a brazenly blank slate."
"Spin it around to the back, and you'll find a Remote Finder button, cablecard slot, coax (Digital Cable, ATSC, MoCA) input, optical audio out, L/R audio, an HDMI 2.0a port for 24fps 4K or 60fps 1080p, a 10/100/1000 Mbps ethernet port, two USB 2.0 and an external storage port (eSATA)."
"(Note: You'll need to reach out to your cable company and obtain a cablecard if you want the TiVo Bolt to integrate with your cable service.)"
he big draws of the box itself are the external storage port (in case you decide to go for the smaller internal hard drive), and the equally fun and practical remote finder to help you track down your pad when it goes MIA. There are enough ports here to run an audio signal straight to your TV and soundbar or simply pass the signal through a receiver and let it do all the heavy audio lifting.
"Speaking of the remote, though, there's little to complain about regarding TiVo's pack-in controller. Most of the buttons will be familiar \xe2\x80\x93 you've surely seen a few dozen numerical pads in your life \xe2\x80\x93 but I found the thumbs-up and thumbs-down buttons a smart touch."
Features on the TiVo Bolt are premium in both senses of the word. They are both exceptional in their execution in creating one of the best TV-watching experiences on the market, but these features also cost more than you might want to shell out for.
"Let's cover the cost first. A brand-new Bolt comes with one year of TIVo's service for free. Considering one year of TiVo service costs $149, that's a pretty solid deal. After the trial runs out, you can either switch to a monthly plan to the tune of $14.99 per month or opt in to the annual plan for $149 plus tax."
o what does your investment net you? Access to services like OnePass, which intelligently scans the available channels and records any instance of a TV show or movie the next time it plays \xe2\x80\x93 without ever wasting space on duplicate content and prioritizing HD quality.
"If you've ever used universal search on a new "
", TiVo also has a similar function, called Smart Search, that finds every source for the content you're interested in and lists them by price. It currently searches Fox, PBS, AMC, CBS, Showtime, Hulu, Netflix, Vudu, NBC, Bravo, FX, Comedy Central and Amazon \xe2\x80\x93 as well as cable or over-the-air signals \xe2\x80\x93 for the cheapest source of whatever you want to watch."
"But the creme-de-la-creme of TiVo features are SkipMode, which enables you to completely skip over commercials with the press of a button when watching recorded shows, and QuickMode, which speeds up a recorded show by 30% without raising the pitch of the characters' voices."
"They're both tremendously helpful to traditional TV watchers that either use cable or an over-the-air antenna, and will radically change the way you view traditional television. Thirty-minute shows will be reduced to roughly 20 minutes and hour-long epics can be compressed into roughly 40-minute blocks. You can watch three episodes of a show in the time it used to take you to watch two. For binge-watchers, like myself, that's well worth the cost of admission."
"The Bolt is an increasingly competent 4K video player, too. It can currently power its way through Netflix's Ultra-HD library without breaking a sweat, and TiVo says it plans on rolling out Amazon 4K support in the near future. Admittedly, the TiVo Bolt doesn't have the same massive Ultra-HD library as, say, the "
"The biggest fault of the system is that, when it's compared to the other streaming video systems out there \xe2\x80\x93 game systems like "
, Apple TV and Roku \xe2\x80\x93 the TiVo comes in a little light on apps.
"The argument could be made, of course, that most TiVo owners will opt for traditional cable or an antenna, but being able to use apps like Showtime Anytime or HBO Now would allow for more of a customizable experience suited for today's market. (Do check out "
, though, which allows you to stream content you already own from a nearby home theater PC [HTPC] to your TV for free.)
"The TiVo Bolt is an unbridled binge-watching machine. It collects the shows you want to watch in an insanely easy-to-navigate interface and, through the beauty of OnePass, intelligently organizes your carefully managed recordings. Of course, once you do record a show, you'll be able to watch it faster, thanks to features like SkipMode and QuickMode. This means you'll spend more time enjoying your shows and less carefully fast-forwarding through commercial breaks."
etting up additional storage is simple, as is connecting it to a nearby HTPC for Plex.
"Finally, TiVo is finally boarding the 4K bandwagon to some surprising results. It tore through Netflix in Ultra-HD, and the company has plans to take on Amazon's 4K catalog in the coming months."
"The TiVo Bolt is definitely lacking when it comes to crucial video streaming apps. While it has Vudu, Amazon and Netflix, it's missing key services, like Showtime Anytime and HBO Now, that would allow cable reductionists to only pay for an antenna and then stream premium content through the apps instead of a paid cable package."
"Additionally, the TiVo Bolt box comes part and parcel with the monthly service. You'll get the first year of service free when you purchase your system. But payments to the tune of $150 a year, once the free period ends, makes this a tough sell for those looking to save money by cutting the cord."
"The TiVo Bolt does an admirable job in everything it sets out to do. Not only does it perform as one of the best DVRs on the planet by allowing you to record up to four shows at once, but it completely organizes them in one of the most easy-to-use interfaces. Plus, new features, like SkipMode and QuickMode, will make it so you don't waste hours of your life watching ads that you don't care about."
"On top of all that, the Bolt is a competent 4K streaming device, tackling Netflix's Ultra-HD library at launch and setting a course for Amazon's offerings next. It could use a few more apps, like HBO Now and Showtime Anytime, to round out the options for cable cutters trying to scale back their cable bill."
"One problem it can't shake is the monthly fee, though a one-year-free trial helps make the Bolt's $299 and $399 price tag a little more wallet-friendly."
"If you plan on cutting the cord completely, check out the excellent Roku 4. It lacks a cablecard slot, but offers thousands of channels of streaming content of its own. But ultimately, the Bolt is at the top of the table for TiVo, and it's easily one of the must-own products in the home entertainment category for anyone planning on sticking with cable."
Get the best tech deals, reviews, product advice, competitions, unmissable tech news and more!
"No spam, we promise. You can unsubscribe at any time and we'll never share your details without your permission."
macOS 10.13 High Sierra problems: how to fix them
esla owner uses free Supercharger power for pure Bitcoin-mining profit
he best phone of 2017: 15 top smartphones tested and ranked
amsung Galaxy S9 release date, news and price rumors
"This is why the iPhone X is Apple's first handset with an OLED display"
esla owner uses free Supercharger power for pure Bitcoin-mining profit
HDMI 2.1 is here to support 10K \xe2\x80\x93 now your TV just needs to
he PS4 Pro is now at its lowest price ever
Bag an absolute bargain on the Samsung Galaxy S8 with Tesco Mobile
echRadar is part of Future plc, an international media group and leading digital publisher. 
. All rights reserved. England and Wales company registration number 2008885. 
Cord-cutting is all the rage, but for many of us, it simply isn\xe2\x80\x99t an option: there are way too many members of the household that can\xe2\x80\x99t do without TV, you\xe2\x80\x99re too far from the transmitters to get over-the-air TV, the shows you really want to watch aren\xe2\x80\x99t available via streaming, or you really like watching live events you can\xe2\x80\x99t get over-the-air. Whatever the case, cutting the cord is a non-starter. 
might be the perfect device to do it.
Listen to millions of songs for free with a 30-day trial of Amazon Music Unlimited.
he TiVo Bolt is the sixth and latest generation of TiVo DVR products, and it represents the company\xe2\x80\x99s most comprehensive effort thus far in combining\xc2\xa0a user\xe2\x80\x99s content options into a single interface. TiVo has long approached the activity of watching television a bit differently, from being the first major player to bring\xc2\xa0live TV timeshifting to the mass consumer market to automating the process of recording shows with features like 
. Now with TiVo Bolt, the company\xe2\x80\x99s aim is to make finding and enjoying television content as\xc2\xa0simple\xc2\xa0as possible for the consumer, regardless of whether that content is recorded locally via cable or over-the-air, or streamed online via one of several supported video providers.
his isn\xe2\x80\x99t the first time that TiVo has offered users access to online content via the TiVo user interface but, as you\xe2\x80\x99ll see, it\xe2\x80\x99s the company\xe2\x80\x99s most seamless and ambitious push for a \xe2\x80\x9csource-agnostic\xe2\x80\x9d experience yet. As a result, TiVo refers to the Bolt with the marketing-friendly name of \xe2\x80\x9cUnified Entertainment Center.\xe2\x80\x9d
While the overall experience of the Bolt will be familiar to anyone who has used a TiVo in recent years, the latest device does sport some new and intriguing features.
? Your TiVo Bolt will let you know that you\xc2\xa0can catch it on HBO at the end of the week, or 
\xc2\xa0SkipMode takes commercial skipping to the next level, for TiVo at least. With SkipMode, users can instantly skip an entire commercial block with a single button press. Hoping to avoid 
From a technical specification standpoint, the TiVo Bolt supports both CableCard and over-the-air sources with four tuners and includes up to 4K video output via its HDMI 2.0 port. Other connectivity options include\xc2\xa0digital\xc2\xa0optical and stereo analog audio outputs for connecting older receivers, gigabit Ethernet, 802.11ac Wi-Fi, two USB 2.0 ports, and an eSATA port for connecting external storage drives.
here are two official storage capacities available \xe2\x80\x94 
\xc2\xa0\xe2\x80\x94 as well as additional internal and external options from the TiVo specialists over at WeaKnees, such as 
he entire TiVo Bolt package is relatively compact when compared to previous TiVo models, at 11.4 inches wide, 7.3-inches deep, 1.8-inches tall, and weighing in at 1.9 pounds.
he first thing you notice about using the TiVo Bolt is that it is fast. 
he TiVo Bolt can be purchased in three different options. The 
he big knock on TiVo as a cord-cutting device is that it isn\xe2\x80\x99t free. There is a monthly or annual subscription fee associated with each DVR. There is a new 
he saga of getting our TiVo Bolt up and running wasn\xe2\x80\x99t really anything to do with the device itself, but it was quite an ordeal, so we\xe2\x80\x99ll tell you everything we went through so you have an understanding for what you may be in for if you decide to go the TiVo route. Since Ara, my co-host on the\xc2\xa0
, and I are both\xc2\xa0Satellite TV customers, one of us had to get cable activated to do the review. So I\xc2\xa0stopped by a local Cox Solution Store, activated a basic cable package for about $40 per month, added a CableCard for an additional $2 per month and left the store quite satisfied. The whole process took about 15 minutes.
What is supposed to happen is you get home, plug the CableCard into the TiVo, connect the Bolt to coax for cable service and you\xe2\x80\x99re all set. If only that was the case. The first thing that happens is you call the cable provider to pair the CableCard with your account and activate it. This was easy, but it didn\xe2\x80\x99t work. The tuning adapter Cox provided couldn\xe2\x80\x99t lock on, so the Bolt couldn\xe2\x80\x99t pick up any channels. The phone representative suggested a visit from a technician, so we got that scheduled.
he technician arrived the following day and found the signal to the Bolt was both weak and dirty. He did some rewiring, added a signal booster and retested the line. All looked good, everything was green and should have been the perfect situation to get the Bolt working. The tuning adapter did lock on, but the Bolt was permanently stuck at 89% on the process of getting cable channels. A quick call to Cox\xc2\xa0to un-pair and re-pair the CableCard got us past that, and we could then access the program guide, but still received no video. Everything should have been working, but we just couldn\xe2\x80\x99t get it there.
he Cox technician admitted he wasn\xe2\x80\x99t a TiVo expert, but said there were others who were. He would leave for the day and get us connected with a different tech that could hopefully make everything work. That other techs came two days later and found that it was a 
Well, actually, sound was temporary. Not even ten minutes had passed after the second technician had left the house and sound stopped working on the TiVo Bolt. No audio whatsoever. No sound from TV programs, no sound from streaming apps, not sound effects from the TiVo menus. We rebooted the TiVo, unplugged the HDMI, tried a different HDMI input on the TV, nothing worked. 
bout four\xc2\xa0days, three cable\xc2\xa0technicians, several calls to tech support, and a ridiculous number of Google searches later, the TiVo Bolt was finally installed, working and ready for business.
he first thing you notice about using the Bolt is that it is fast. 
. The user interface doesn\xe2\x80\x99t lag. Searches are crazy fast, and everything just feels like it happens when you want it to. Most DVRs, even the 
Which leads us to the integration of channel content and streamed content. This functionality, like the\xc2\xa0
his unified approach to content is pretty awesome. No more searching through all your video apps to see who has which show. No more wondering if you can get it for free over here or if you\xe2\x80\x99ll have to pay for it over there. The only weirdness comes in when you set a OnePass for a show like Saturday Night Live, a show with over 40 seasons. For shows with a massive number of past episodes, you\xe2\x80\x99ll need to adjust the filters to narrow the OnePass results down in order to easily find your recently recorded episodes or a particular set of episodes you\xe2\x80\x99re interested in. It\xe2\x80\x99s two quick button presses, but a bit strange getting used to.
nytime you switch from one user interface that you\xe2\x80\x99re comfortable with to a new one, there\xe2\x80\x99s a bit of a learning curve to get used to it. The TiVo interface is no different, but it is quite intuitive. Everyone in the family picked it up pretty quickly and my\xc2\xa0wife even commented on how much better she thought the experience was than our prior DVR. Sure the guide works a little different, the searches are a bit different, setting recordings is a bit different, but it all makes sense once you get used to it. And what they say is true, TiVo does have the best DVR interface out there. Different, but different in a good way.
o more wondering if you can Watch an Episode\xc2\xa0for free over here or if you\xe2\x80\x99ll have to pay for it over there. OnePass on the TiVo Bolt is awesome.
he Bolt also lets you stream recorded content to your phone or tablet if you\xe2\x80\x99re on the same network. You can watch TV from the treadmill, or turn it on from the kitchen, without the need for another box or device. Yes, the Hopper can do that too, but not all DVRs can. And you can control the DVR\xc2\xa0to set and manage recordings\xc2\xa0from anywhere in the world. If you\xe2\x80\x99re outside the home you won\xe2\x80\x99t be able to stream content directly from your device, but the TiVo app will still helpfully\xc2\xa0tell you if the show you\xe2\x80\x99re looking for is available via any streaming services, information\xc2\xa0you can then use\xc2\xa0to catch up on your favorite shows via third party services in\xc2\xa0lieu of streaming the recordings directly from your home Bolt.
here are a couple nits about the TiVo Bolt, though. Parental controls on the Bolt are a bit weak. It feels like they threw something in to say they had it, not really designing the feature to match what parents would want to do. If you have a lot of kids all accessing the same DVR for content, it would be nice to have a bit more granularity on what you can do.
nother issue is that a lot of the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s menus don\xe2\x80\x99t wrap around. So if you\xe2\x80\x99re on the top option and want to get to the bottom, you have to scroll through all the options to get there, you can\xe2\x80\x99t just click the up button once. Same if you\xe2\x80\x99re at the bottom and want to get to the top. If you try to do it, the Bolt makes an error sound. Admittedly not a huge deal, but strange.
Like competing DVR services offered directly from the cable and satellite companies, TiVo offers a number of accessories to enhance or expand a user\xe2\x80\x99s TiVo experience at home and on the go.
. It doesn\xe2\x80\x99t require an additional subscription, just buy the box and away you go. It can be installed using wired Ethernet or 
. So if you have a coax cable but no ethernet, you\xe2\x80\x99re still good. If you have neither, you\xe2\x80\x99re stuck, as the TiVo Mini cannot be used via Wi-Fi. That\xe2\x80\x99s a huge bummer for those who like the wireless options from Dish or AT&T. But we were able to get one working using a pair of 
Most cable and satellite companies charge a monthly fee for the extender boxes. Dish calls them 
, and they can run from $8 to $12 per month. With the Mini there is no additional monthly cost at all. Using $10 per month as an average, you break even on the Mini after about 14 months. Keep in mind that the Bolt only has four tuners, so you have an upper bound on the number of Minis you can functionally add. Supposedly you can get two Bolts working at the same time to get 8 tuners in the home, but right now they manage recordings totally independently. Internet rumors claim Tivo is working on a unified view for multiple Bolts, but we don\xe2\x80\x99t have any information to corroborate that claim.
. If you have one, you really don\xe2\x80\x99t need the other. But if you don\xe2\x80\x99t have a Slingbox and want to watch TV from outside the home, TiVo Stream gets you that. There are some limitations, though. According to a Q&A at Amazon, \xe2\x80\x9cit allows out of home streaming, but only if the content provider allows it.\xe2\x80\x9d The major networks (ABC, CBS, NBC, and Fox), Viacom (Comedy Central, MTV), and Discovery (TLC, Science) all BLOCK streaming, so the TiVo Stream does not stream or allow the transfer of shows to another device.\xe2\x80\x9d
iVo is pretty freaking great. For those who want to cut and or 
Want news and tips from TekRevue delivered directly to your inbox? Sign up for the TekRevue Weekly Digest using the box below.
ign Up for the TekRevue Weekly Digest
YouTube TV Quick Look: Local Channels Come to IPTV
eview: The Oppo UDP-203 4K Ultra HD Blu-ray Player
he Search for Perfect Home Theater Seating
I\xe2\x80\x99ve profited 104,000 bucks previous year by doing an online job and I did it by w\xc2\xado\xc2\xadr\xc2\xadk\xc2\xadi\xc2\xadn\xc2\xadg part-time f\xc2\xad\xc2\xado\xc2\xad\xc2\xadr several h daily. I followed work opportunity I found on-line and I am so excited that i made so much money on the side. It\xe2\x80\x99s user friendly and I\xe2\x80\x99m just so thankful that i discovered this. Check out what I do\xe2\x80\xa6 STATICTAB.COM/r2tyhgi
Your email address will not be published.
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #739: Yamaha RX-A850 Review
eview: Ceton Takes HTPCs To a New Level With the InfiniTV 6 ETH
How to Get Cheap 4K iTunes Movies with Blu-ray and DVD Digital Codes
YouTube TV Quick Look: Local Channels Come to IPTV
eview: The Oppo UDP-203 4K Ultra HD Blu-ray Player
he Search for Perfect Home Theater Seating
How to Calculate the Optimal TV Screen Size Based on Resolution and Distance
amsung Announces a Trio of Quantum Dot Monitors
amsung\xe2\x80\x99s Dolby Atmos Soundbars: An Easy Way to Bring Atmos Sound to Your Home Theater
he HT Guys List of New TV Shows for Fall 2016
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #752: Connect with FireConnect
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #751: Format Wars
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #750: QLED Explained
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #749: TWICE VIP Award Nominations
he Best HDTV of 2016: Value Electronics Shootout
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #748: Value Electronics HDTV Shootout 2016
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #747: Samsung HW-K450 Soundbar
ViewSonic PJD5255 Review: The Perfect $370 Backyard Theater Projector
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #746: The THX Story
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #745: ViewSonic PJD5255 DLP Projector
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #744: Hi-Res Symposium 2016
HDTV & Home Theater Podcast #743: 2015-2016 TV Season Winners & Losers
How to Open Multiple Windows in OneNote for Mac
How to Factory Reset Your Kindle Before Selling or Giving It Away
Office 365 Tip: How to Download the Office Offline Installer
How to Change the Default View for PDFs in Adobe Acrobat
How to Manually Dim the Xbox One Screen
How to Browse Games by Genre in the Xbox One Store
How to Play Classic Windows XP Solitaire in Windows 10
How to Set Up and Game With an iOS Controller on Your iPhone or iPad
How to Disconnect and Troubleshoot Wi-Fi on Your Mac
pply Auto Enhance to Multiple Images in Photos for Mac
macOS: Edit Images With \xe2\x80\x9cInvert Selection\xe2\x80\x9d in Preview for Mac
macOS: Change From Swipe to Archive to Swipe to Delete in Mail
How to Use iPhone Screen Recording in iOS 11
How to Fix Siri Pronunciation on the iPhone and iPad
How to Use \xe2\x80\x9cDo Not Disturb While Driving\xe2\x80\x9d on Your iPhone
How to Enable Twitter Night Mode for iOS, Android, and the Web
How to Turn Off Gmail Events in Google Calendar
How to Turn Off Amazon Personalized Ads on the Web
How to Get Files From Anyone Using Dropbox File Request
Quick Tip: How to Turn Off Cortana Notifications in Windows 10
Quick Tip: Turn On Remote Desktop in Windows 10 Fall Creators Update
Quick Tip: How to Turn Off Snap in Windows 10
How to Show PSD Icon Previews in Windows 10 File Explorer
ign Up for the TekRevue Weekly Digest
519-9100
95002\n
367-8486\n
562-8400\n
08/04/1997
08/04/1997
"\n        This company's business is Data Communication Equipment Systems\n\n    "
1,500\n
\n        BBB rating is based on 13 factors: 
Get the details about the factors considered.
Our complaint history for this company shows that the company responded to and gave proper consideration to most complaints.  However, one complaint is unresolved meaning the company failed to properly address the complaint allegations or their response was inadequate. 
\n                        Licensing information is provided in the BBB Business Profiles to inform the public about industries that may require professional licensing, bonding, or registration. Better Business Bureau encourages you to check with the appropriate agency to be certain any requirements are currently being met.\n                    
\n                        BBB promotes truth in advertising by contacting advertisers whose claims conflict with the BBB Code of Advertising.  These claims come to our attention from our internal review of advertising, consumer complaints and competitor challenges.  BBB asks advertisers to substantiate their claims, change ads to make offers more clear to consumers, and remove misleading or deceptive statements.\n                    
"\n                        BBB reports on known significant government actions involving the business's marketplace conduct.\n                    "
\n                        BBB reports on a company that is out of business for one year from the date the company closes its doors or ceases to do business.\n                    
"\n                        BBB reports on unauthorized use of the Better Business Bureau's name and/or logo for as long as the business continues to use it in any advertising, or for one year after the business ceases any repeated unauthorized uses.\n                    "
\n                        BBB reports on a business\xe2\x80\x99s bankruptcy as long as the business remains in bankruptcy.\n                    
\n                        BBB reports when mail sent to the business was returned by the Postal Service.\n                    
"\n                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.\n                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,\n                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.\n                    "
\n                        Tivo, Inc. has received 3.68 out of 5 stars based on 4 Customer Reviews and a BBB Rating of A+.\n                        
\n                            Comprised of 67% BBB Rating and 33% Customer Review Rating.\n                        
"\n                            The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business. The Customer Review\n                            Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive, neutral, and negative reviews posted.\n                        "
"\n                            The BBB letter grade represents the BBB's opinion of how the business is likely to interact with its customers.\n                            The BBB grade is based on BBB file information about the business.\n                            In some cases, a business' grade may be lowered if the BBB does not have sufficient\n                            information about the business despite BBB's requests for that information from the business.\n                        "
"\n                            The BBB Customer Review Rating plus the BBB Rating is not a guarantee of a business'\n                            reliability or performance. BBB recommends that consumers consider a business'\n                            BBB Rating and Customer Review Rating in addition to all other available information\n                            about the business.\n                        "
\n                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.\n            
BBB Business Profiles may not be reproduced for sales or promotional purposes.
BBB Business Profiles are provided solely to assist you in exercising your own best judgment. Information in this BBB Business Profile is believed reliable, but not guaranteed as to accuracy.
"When considering complaint information, please take into account the company's size and volume of transactions, and understand that the nature of complaints and a firm's responses to them are often more important than the number of complaints."
BBB Business Profiles generally cover a three-year reporting period. BBB Business Profiles are subject to change at any time. If you choose to do business with this business, please let the business know that you contacted BBB for a BBB Business Profile.
\n                First, try refreshing the page and clicking Current Location again. Make sure you click 
t the top of your Chrome window, near the web address, click 
In the window that pops up, make sure 
"You're good to go! Reload this Yelp page and try your search again."
"\n                    If you're still having trouble, check out "
.\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
t the top of your Opera window, near the web address, you should see a 
In the window that pops up, click 
"You're good to go! Reload this Yelp page and try your search again."
"\n                    If you're still having trouble, check out "
.\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
Prompt for each website once each day
Prompt for each website one time only
MacOS may now prompt you to enable Location Services. If it does, follow its instructions to enable Location Services for Safari.
Close the Privacy menu and refresh the page. Try using Current Location search again. If it works, great! If not, read on for more instructions.
"You're good to go! Close the Settings tab, reload this Yelp page, and try your search again."
"\n                    If you're still having trouble, check out "
.\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
t the top of your Firefox window, to the left of the web address, you should see a 
In the window that pops up, you should see 
"You're good to go! Refresh this Yelp page and try your search again."
"\n                    If you're still having trouble, check out "
.\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
ever allow websites to request your physical location
, then refresh this Yelp page and try your search again.
\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
t the top-right hand corner of the window, click the 
, then make sure only the box labeled 
"You're good to go! Refresh this Yelp page and try your search again."
\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                
"\n                    Oops! We don't recognize the web browser you're currently using. Try checking the browser's help menu, or searching the Web for instructions to turn on HTML5 Geolocation for your browser.\n                    You can also search near a city, place, or address instead.\n                "
"\n            Something broke and we're not sure what. Try again later, or search near a city, place, or address instead.\n        "
"\n            We couldn't find you quickly enough! Try again later, or search near a city, place, or address instead.\n        "
"\n            We couldn't find an accurate position. If you're using a laptop or tablet, try moving it somewhere else and give it another go. Or, search near a city, place, or address instead.\n        "
519-9100\n
I just called Tivo and got my replacement Tivo Remote Control for FREE! Woohoo!\n\nI have an old Tivo HD box that I have for years. My old HD Tivo still works great, but I can\'t say the same for the remote control. I probably dropped it on the floor too many times and it finally died. I thought I would have to buy it on ebay and see how much I need to spend for the replacement (looks to be about $25-$30). But before I made the purchase online, I begin to wonder if any Tivo remote will even work for my old TiVo Box so I went online to Tivo.com and chat an online support. I was told the new remotes that they have for sale will not work on my old Tivo box and that I should call TiVo sales for further assistance. I\'m so glad I didn\'t make any purchase right away before checking to be sure.\n\nI was thinking, why not, let me call and see how much it will cost for a replacement Tivo remote control, then compare the price from online. After talking to the sales agent and answer some secure questions so that they can look up what Tivo box I have. He then said he will mail the remote to me. I was surprised, confirming with the agent, "for FREE?", and got a reply, "Yes, no charge". I was so thrill to hear it, I saved $25-30 that can go toward foods!\n\nThank you Tivo! You made me a fan again!
hey are having a launch event for their new VOX remote, but made us all wait outside in the pouring rain.
"About a month ago a Tivo sales rep told me they had a Promo upgrading me from my Tivo premiere with life time to a new Tivo Bolt with lifetime transferring my lifetime service, so I said great sign me up and paid for the promo.  The Tivo Bolts were back ordered so I waited and a few days ago I got the Bolt in and went to hook it up today, but it's asked me activate it. It was asking for a service plan, wait what so I called Tivo and this is what I was told.. Yes we see notes on your account that the rep sold you a unit with those terms, but we can't honor it since no promo exists like that for upgrading a Tivo premiere with service transfer to a Bolt. So I said but that not my fault your rep told me about the promo and now your not honoring it, instead they offered to reduce the life time service to 350.00 on top of what I paid for the bolt. I have been a customer since Tivo started as a customer, so there was no misunderstanding and the notes on my account even states the deal and my email reciept and now I am told they won't honor the deal to transfer lifetime to my bolt which I am now returning..\n\nIt was asking for a service plan, wait what so I called Tivo and this is what I was told..\n\nYes we see notes on your account that the rep sold you a unit with those terms, but we can't honor it since no promo exists like that for upgrading a Tivo premiere with service transfer to a Bolt. So I said but that not my fault your rep told me about the promo and now your not honoring it, instead they offered to reduce the life time service to 350.00 on top of what I paid for the bolt.\n\nI have been a customer since Tivo started as a customer, so there was no misunderstanding and the notes on my account even states the deal and now I am told they won't honor the deal."
"TiVo.. What happened to you? You used to be the greatest thing. I started with you in 2000 and your product was great. 10 days ago I opened a support ticket. Zero response other than the automated reply.\n\nFirst, opening a ticket when I am logged into your support site should not require me to enter data that you already have. Allow me to choose from data you already have such as my name, address, etc. Please, make it easy for those of us paying for your service, your salary and your shareholders.\n\nSecond, today I contacted support... again, having to enter a lot of data just to get to a support person. When I do reach the person, she (Jennifer) asked me to enter info that I had already entered. And then didn't believe me and had me go to the TiVo box to tell her a third time. Same Data. Really?\n\nVery long waits between her responses. Very poor response. I strongly recommend you go to Amazon.com, order a Tivo device, find a problem with it, try to get support from your own site, and then return it to Amazon and tell me which support experience is 1,000 times easier and customer-focused. Then tell me which company you want to do business with.\n\nAt the end of the support chat, the dialog box offered a customer survey. I clicked to start the survey and the box closed... no survey and no way for me to communicate my experience. I am left with no other option than to stop buying TiVo equipment (planning to upgrade to a TiVo Bolt in January) and search for another solution for my TV needs.\n\nIf we want to discuss User Experience, let's look at the interface. I've paid for my TiVo and I pay for your monthly guide (yes, I still pay monthly). You have added more apps (iheart radio? don't need it) and they push the apps I do use further down making it more time consuming each time I want to use the device. Less fun. I just ordered Apple TV and Amazon Fire TV devices and both allow me to adjust apps to where I want them...\n\nIt's sad for me to say, but the TiVos that I have loved are in the past, and as a line of products and as a support organization, you are getting way behind. Not only are you losing the TVs in my home, but in the homes of the family members and friends that I support and have directed towards your products in recent years.\n\nThank you, it was fun while it lasted... if you want to fix these issues, I'd be willing to consider returning, but you'll now have competition for my $$."
"Have had lineup issues since moving to San Diego 6 months ago.  I have mad over 30 calls to TiVo tech support and their executive resolution team.  At one point I had someone following up with me regularly but no corrections were ever made and then they just stopped calling.  I have called in several more times to re-open the case but I just get an overseas tech support rep who wants to follow their script and start with resetting my box.  The customer service staff are just robots, you explain what you need help with and they repeat it back to you...and thats about it...they don't use what you explained to troubleshoot the problem...they just repeat what you said and then start their script.  I have asked for a refund and been told no, I have tried to cancel and I go around and around with he rep trying to talk me out of cancelling but will not listen that the lineup is broken so I won't pay for something that does not work.  Three attempts to cancel and I was on the phone for 40 minutes each time, finally I just hang up because I can't stand arguing any more.  Such awful service and it didn't use to be this way.  When their agents were U.S. based it was excellent service."
"TiVo is turning out to be just like all the Cable providers!  Rotten!  I spoke with Dina yesterday to renew a contract with TiVo and we worked for 30 minutes to restore service.  Gave her my cc info-told me it would take 24 hours to reset.  24 hours later nothing!  Called TiVo and spoke to Will who was so nice and so sorry this happened.  He went to a mgr to get help and he told me he was sorry but Dina didn't complete the work she said she'd do.  Will told me it would take another 24 hours to restore and I asked him to speak to his manager again to escalate the issue.  He came back and told me it would now take an hour.  One hour later...of course it didn't get restored.  By now they are closed for the night and I have to wait another day to speak to someone that probably won't help me!  My confidence in TiVo has plunged!  Please help me TiVo!"
"Long long time customer and I was thinking of adding another unit to my home. Called today and after a long wait finally got ahold of one of the sales guys. He really did not give me very much info to go on, so after a frustrating conversation I gave up. \n   Later I thought lets call tech support and they will surly be able to help with my more techy questions. But to my surprise, I was talking to an Over seas operator. TIVO has NEVER has off shore call centers. but I guess they do now. It to for ever to get transfered back to the USA And when I finally did, I was so upset as I just was always so proud of TIVO for not bailing and sending jobs off shore. And when I tried to call the corporate office the receptionest told me that I had not called Corporate but later said that I had. Please whoever bought out this company please fix it back to what it was in the past. I can't keep supporting this bad customer service."
We have used TiVo for over a decade. Service and customer service used to be great! That is no longer the case.  We are on our 3rd TiVo since August- as our unit we bought a year and a half ago died and the unit sent after that did not work. During this time we have been without consistent service and TiVo has been double charging us in the meantime. Customer service calls and surveys and even emails are not responded to and the reps that we do speak to are not sympathetic and powerless to resolve our problem. \n\nHow something so great has gone so horribly wrong is a mystery but in the meantime we are going to discontinue service.
"A year ago, I disconnected from satellite, for good.  \n\nTivo's product and especially their service has been amazing:\n*purchase the lifetime service, totally worth every penny, no monthly service charges for the life of your box?  WOW.\n*don't purchase the warranty, they desire to retain their customer, call them and they will probably make it happen and keep you satisfied \n\nHATE the remote, but I paid a ONE time fee for years of entertainment.  Just a year of satellite is DOUBLE the price of the equipment and lifetime service.  \n\nLove my streaming shows.  Who has time to watch all that TV?  I realized, I sure don't."
I purchased a TIVO with a lifetime subscription, so no further payments are required. But TIVO insists that I give them a credit card number. There explanation is that we want it.  I love the tiro system but the company sucks.  there is no reason to require a credit card except to invade people privacy. If you do not have a credit card their suggestion is " get someone else to let them use theirs"  What a great (idiotic) idea.
My wife and I recently moved into a new home with her elderly parents.  Our goal was to minimize expenses for all of us while giving them a sense of security for their near future.\n\nThis home is in Time Warner/ Verizon Fios territory and we had the choice of either.  As past customer\'s of DirectTV, we knew we had that choice as well.  Our past experience with Time Warner was not *awesome* and our past experience with DirectTV was good but expensive.\n\nNone of us had ever owned Tivo\'s.\n\nWhen comparing the Time Warner/ DirectTV / Verizon Fios pricing packages for the stations we consider most essential, we were quickly floored by the sticker shock cost of lighting up 5 TVs with DVR service.  Across the board, we were looking at ~$250 per month with the internet service I need for my work.\n\nSo we looked into Tivo.  Tivo had just released their new Bolt DVR, and they have remote devices called "Minis" that can use the tuners in the Bolts.  Bolts have four tuners each for both watching TV and recording it.\n\nVerizon had the best internet packages and we ultimately decided to get their 150MB/150MB internet service plus TV programming that suited our needs.  \n\nUsing the Tivo\'s requires getting Cable Cards (slide in encryption devices) to access cable channels.  At Verizon, these are about $5 per month.  We ordered three for two Tivo Bolt\'s and one for a Silicon Dust HD Homerun Prime streamer for our computers and laptops.\n\nSo now we had 8 tuners to distribute to 5 TVs from the Tivos (I am the only one that ever uses the three Silicon Dust tuners.)  This saved us almost $100 in Verizon set top box rental and DVR service charges.  This is somewhat offset by the Tivo $150 per year ($30 per month) subscription charges for the two Bolts and the $15 in monthly Cable Card rental.\n\nIn the end, we were able to calculate a 23 month ROI on the Tivo box purchases over renting set top boxes and DVR service from Verizon.\n\nBut this is not for the technically faint hearted.  We worked through multiple problems mostly related to the speed of our local ethernet network (1GB, but local cables that were less than CAT6 posed problems), and the speed of our coaxial network (less than RG6 local cables posed problems).  I also found we needed to terminate unused coaxial cable connections with appropriate 75 ohm terminators.\n\nOne of our original Bolt\'s had a tuning problem, which took about two weeks to work out with Tivo support.  Tivo support was great, but could not grasp that with two Bolts, one had tuning problems and the other did not on the same cables and in the same location.  I had to replace the Cable Card to prove to them that the Bolt was having problems.\n\nAs to the Tivo experience, it is without peer.  We love the streaming apps + TV tuner capabilities and the Minis expand to our 5 TVs in an economical way that just makes sense.  We have the in-laws sharing their own Bolt for the Living room and their bedroom and sharing that Bolt with the guest bedroom.  My wife and I share the other Bolt between the Family Room and our bedroom.\n\nAfter some hiccups with getting speeds to their maximums on our Ethernet, WiFi, and Coaxial networks, we now have a very accommodating system for all involved.  It is amazing to see my father in law binging on TV show marathons in Hulu, Amazon, and Netflix. On the plus side, Tivo\'s support remote streaming from Sources like Youtube making it possible to share family videos on your TVs.  \n\nThe search feature is the killer, it will search from both TV programs in your scheduled programming and streaming apps you have subscribed to.  I have never seen better except perhaps in my Roku which is less convenient and out of the current input channel when using the TV tuner.\n\nSo mission accomplished but make sure you are ready for getting all networks, local cables, and required terminations up to speed.  It has been worth it, but it required more work than I expected.  Also, know that Tivo support is real slow to assign fault to their own equipment.  If you need replacements, you may be in for a long haul.
"Bought a new TIVO Bolt 2 months ago because one of my TIVO boxes was tiling premium channels.  Guess what the new TIVO BOLT was even worse.  Fast forward 2 months, after countless calls to TIVO and Comcast it still doesn't work.  Comcast came out 3 times, 2 times with a supervisor and ran every diagnostic in the world on the TIVO and cable system.. All new cables were put it.  We even ran the working TIVO cable to the defective TIVO and it still didn't  work.  TIVO finally agreed to send a new TIVO Bolt.  Today I got a notice saying that it would be a refurbished BOLT.  I have now been on the phone with a TIVO supervisor for over an hour with no budging on their part.  I have been a TIVO customer for eight years.  It is time to junk the whole system.  Worst customer service ever, agent who don't what they are doing."
I had Tivo DVR a dozen years ago and loved it!  In the meantime, I have had to deal with mediocre DVR\'s and associated software with U-verse, Dish & Direct TV.  With an anticipated move to a new house, I decided to purchase a Tivo DVR directly from them and get back to the user friendly system I use to love.\n\nUnfortunately, this is a story about a dysfunctional order/sales system.  I tried to purchase a Roamio Plus DVR, lifetime subscription service & a mini box for around $1,000.  When they placed the order, something went wrong with their order software system, which authorized a charge to my debit card, but the order "died" internally giving the customer service representation an "error message".  I was asked if I would be willing to allow a second authorization of my debit card, but this too failed.  I had been on the phone for about an hour, being put on hold on and off, when I was cut off.\n\nI assumed that the order was somehow placed and all was good.  The next day two more charge authorizations came through on my debit card, now totally some $4,000 in pending charges.  I only found out about the additional charges by looking at my account on-line.  These charges overdrew my account and I had to transfer $2,000 to cover this amount.  It took me another 3 hours on the phone talking to Tivo and my bank to resolve this $4,000 debacle, finally removing all these charges, which had no orders behind them.\n\nThe Tivo customer  service representative I was working with on day 3 of the mess, a Friday, suggested I use another account, which I did, but the error on their order system occurred for the 5th time.  She told me that she would manually enter the order and that I would receive an e-mail confirmation.\n\nOn Monday, I still had not received an e-mail conformation, so I called Tivo, to find that the same thing happened as on all the other orders; an error message occurred, but nobody followed up on it, nobody "manually" entered an order and I have a pending $1,000 charge on my other debit card.  Very poor customer service.\n\nThe last customer service supervisor I talked with, finally suggested I buy a Tivo from "Best Buy" and then Tivo would reimburse any price difference to me, so that I would have my unit in time for the cable guy visit on the upcoming Friday.  I\'m off to "Best Buy".  Wish me luck.\n\nAll through these six days of trying to buy something, I was explained to, told about and reasoned with how their "order system" was not working.  At the very end, I had to explain to the supervisor that we as customers don\'t care what their order software problems are.  We just want to buy their stuff.  I cannot believe that they cannot manually place an order, but they could take my money.\n\nIf it was me, having been in manufacturing, production & quality assurance for 25 years, I would have personally packaged the hardware and personally walked it to FedEx and have it shipped "next day".  Then I\'d get back to the customer as to paying for the equipment.  I mean I was a good risk.  I had committed $5,000 of my money towards the purchase of $1,000 worth of goods from Tivo.  Customer loyalty is a very tenuous thing.  Hopefully, I will love my new Tivo, otherwise .....
BUYER BEWARE!!!  When I called TIVO to set up service, I said I "want to try you out." The rep answered, "Then you\'ll want our month-to-month service."  THIS IS MISLEADING AND A DOWNRIGHT LIE. I cancelled after 4 months and was slapped with a $75 cancellation fee and was told that the "month-to-month is actually a one-year contract," something that was not told to me when I started service. \n\nBOO. HISS.
I was a longtime TIVO subscriber and happy with their service.  In July, 2015 we had a house fire.  We were displaced for a year and our TIVO box was a casualty of the fire.  I called TIVO and explained the situation and cancelled our service as the box was destroyed.  In October 2015, without notice, TIVO resumed billing for the destroyed box.  The box that I told them no longer existed.  I just recently noticed the charge.  OK, human error on their part - I\'ll call and fix this.  Well, their response was that this problem was a "shared responsibility."  Essentially, even though I called, told them the box was destroyed and cancelled my TIVO service - that I should be on the lookout for TIVO just deciding to start billing me again.  While I agree that I should check my credit card bills more carefully - I also believe that I should be able to trust a company when I call and cancel a service.  After the fire I canceled many home-related services (cable, phone, garbage, etc.) and none of them resumed billing prematurely.  Sheesh - even Comcast was more ethical than TIVO.  Thumbs down.  No ethics.
ervice over the 5-6 years that I had tivo stagnated and cable companies eclipsed Tivo..  \n\nWhen time came to cancel the service, they offered to "suspend" my billing so I can try and sell the Series 3 HD equipment... \n\nI tired, but I could not even give it away for FREE!\nI cancelled the service in July of 2015, But, Tivo conveniently kept on billing me every month automatically against my checking account..\n\n8 Months later, I am realizing they are still stealing my money after cancellation AND confirmation emails stating it was cancelled..  \n\nSo, I called them today explaining that they have been fraudently charging my account for 8 months..  The "specalist" on the case said, sorry, they can only refund me 90 days... \n\nI\'m like, WHAT??  You have been stealing money from my bank account systematicaly for 8 MONTHS!!! And you claim I can only get 90 days worth???\n\nThis company is beyond corrupt..\n\nAfter 15 minutes of transferring and talking to more "specialists" and supervisors, eventually the agent, after threathing them with reporting fraud and theft, she goes: "Ok, looks like we forgot to click the cancel button when you called in March.. we\'ll refund your money"\n\nRUN..RUN AS FAR AND AS FAST AS YOU CAN AWAY FROM THEM!!!!!
"Tivo used to have reasonable customer service.  Now it sucks.  Called and was told the wait time was approximately 20 minutes.  After 2 HOURS on hold I gave up.  Their website was not only NOT helpful with my issue but it provided ABSOLUTELY WRONG information/solution.  However, the hardware/product remains great . . . Just hope and pray you don't need customer support because you might die of old age before you get it."
I have a TIVO device that I rent via my cable company for $20/month (plus $10 for the mini). The system seems to work very well though it has a few things I do not enjoy like having to delete each and every program one at a time twice. Some of the menus take time to learn. \n\nMy complaint and low rating is based on the potential purchasing of a TIVO.\nI would advise anyone who wants to purchase one to make sure you understand what you are paying for prior to purchase.. \n\n1. The $500 lifetime service agreement only applies to the actual unit you purchase.\nIf the unit goes into service and it is deemed by them it needs to be replaced the service agreement ends! This means you have to purchase another service agreement for the replacement unit if you want one.\n\n2. Even if you purchase a warranty it does not cover all labor and parts in certain circumstances and you must pay for a replacement. You also have to pay for transportation costs.\n\nAfter speaking to the TIVO agents I came to the conclusion if TIVO will not fix their equipment at no cost under warranty due to component failures 100% and will not make the service agreement continue to units they replace at no additional fee it is best to not purchase the device and service.
nyone with the series III TiVo received an on screen message on Friday, April 3. The message in your TiVo display said "the Amazon and YouTube applications will not be available on this DVR as of April 16, 2015. You will not be able to purchase or download titles from Amazon on this DVR. However, you will be able to continue to watch the movies/TV episodes you purchased an already downloaded within the now playing list."\n\n I contacted TiVo and was told that this was a decision mutually agreed upon by Amazon and TiVo.  TiVo stated that both Amazon and TiVo I had upgraded their software and elected to leave  thousands of series III tiVo customers behind. \n\n As a TiVo subscriber with a lifetime subscription and also as an Amazon prime customer this truly sucks.
"I would give 0 stars if I could.  I bought a romeo box from tivo that didn't work from day one.  Was suppose to be new but I think it was refurbished.  When I called to return box for credit.  They told me they would not do that.  Their customer service sucks.  Better ways to cut the cord than using tivo.  Table or magna vox new 1tb machine with no monthly fees."
his business has not yet been claimed by the owner or a representative.
\n        2160 Gold St, San Jose, CA 95002\n    
95002\n
519-9100\n
"\n                Wow didn't know TIVO still existed\n            "
\n            \xe2\x80\x9cTivo had just released their new Bolt DVR, and they have remote devices called "Minis" that can use the tuners in the 
"\n            \xe2\x80\x9cI've had a few times where I got termination notices but that was my fault for expired "
\n            \xe2\x80\x9cI just called Tivo and got my replacement Tivo Remote Control for 
\n                Yelp users haven\xe2\x80\x99t asked any questions yet about 
5 (Woohoo! As good as it gets!)
3/7/2016\n
I just called Tivo and got my replacement Tivo Remote Control for FREE! Woohoo!
"I have an old Tivo HD box that I have for years. My old HD Tivo still works great, but I can't say the same for the remote control. I probably dropped it on the floor too many times and it finally died. I thought I would have to buy it on ebay and see how much I need to spend for the replacement (looks to be about $25-$30). But before I made the purchase online, I begin to wonder if any Tivo remote will even work for my old TiVo Box so I went online to "
I was thinking, why not, let me call and see how much it will cost for a replacement Tivo remote control, then compare the price from online. After talking to the sales agent and answer some secure questions so that they can look up what Tivo box I have. He then said he will mail the remote to me. I was surprised, confirming with the agent, "for FREE?", and got a reply, "Yes, no charge". I was so thrill to hear it, I saved $25-30 that can go toward foods!
hank you Tivo! You made me a fan again!
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
11/4/2017\n
hey are having a launch event for their new VOX remote, but made us all wait outside in the pouring rain.
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
5/24/2017\n
"About a month ago a Tivo sales rep told me they had a Promo upgrading me from my Tivo premiere with life time to a new Tivo Bolt with lifetime transferring my lifetime service, so I said great sign me up and paid for the promo. \xc2\xa0The Tivo Bolts were back ordered so I waited and a few days ago I got the Bolt in and went to hook it up today, but it's asked me activate it. It was asking for a service plan, wait what so I called Tivo and this is what I was told.. Yes we see notes on your account that the rep sold you a unit with those terms, but we can't honor it since no promo exists like that for upgrading a Tivo premiere with service transfer to a Bolt. So I said but that not my fault your rep told me about the promo and now your not honoring it, instead they offered to reduce the life time service to 350.00 on top of what I paid for the bolt. I have been a customer since Tivo started as a customer, so there was no misunderstanding and the notes on my account even states the deal and my email reciept and now I am told they won't honor the deal to transfer lifetime to my bolt which I am now returning.."
It was asking for a service plan, wait what so I called Tivo and this is what I was told..
"Yes we see notes on your account that the rep sold you a unit with those terms, but we can't honor it since no promo exists like that for upgrading a Tivo premiere with service transfer to a Bolt. So I said but that not my fault your rep told me about the promo and now your not honoring it, instead they offered to reduce the life time service to 350.00 on top of what I paid for the bolt."
"I have been a customer since Tivo started as a customer, so there was no misunderstanding and the notes on my account even states the deal and now I am told they won't honor the deal."
\n            1 person voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
12/29/2016\n
iVo.. What happened to you? You used to be the greatest thing. I started with you in 2000 and your product was great. 10 days ago I opened a support ticket. Zero response other than the automated reply.
First, opening a ticket when I am logged into your support site should not require me to enter data that you already have. Allow me to choose from data you already have such as my name, address, etc. Please, make it easy for those of us paying for your service, your salary and your shareholders.
"Second, today I contacted support... again, having to enter a lot of data just to get to a support person. When I do reach the person, she (Jennifer) asked me to enter info that I had already entered. And then didn't believe me and had me go to the TiVo box to tell her a third time. Same Data. Really?"
Very long waits between her responses. Very poor response. I strongly recommend you go to 
, order a Tivo device, find a problem with it, try to get support from your own site, and then return it to Amazon and tell me which support experience is 1,000 times easier and customer-focused. Then tell me which company you want to do business with.
t the end of the support chat, the dialog box offered a customer survey. I clicked to start the survey and the box closed... no survey and no way for me to communicate my experience. I am left with no other option than to stop buying TiVo equipment (planning to upgrade to a TiVo Bolt in January) and search for another solution for my TV needs.
"If we want to discuss User Experience, let's look at the interface. I've paid for my TiVo and I pay for your monthly guide (yes, I still pay monthly). You have added more apps (iheart radio? don't need it) and they push the apps I do use further down making it more time consuming each time I want to use the device. Less fun. I just ordered Apple TV and Amazon Fire TV devices and both allow me to adjust apps to where I want them..."
"It's sad for me to say, but the TiVos that I have loved are in the past, and as a line of products and as a support organization, you are getting way behind. Not only are you losing the TVs in my home, but in the homes of the family members and friends that I support and have directed towards your products in recent years."
"Thank you, it was fun while it lasted... if you want to fix these issues, I'd be willing to consider returning, but you'll now have competition for my $$."
\n            2 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
7/3/2017\n
"Have had lineup issues since moving to San Diego 6 months ago. \xc2\xa0I have mad over 30 calls to TiVo tech support and their executive resolution team. \xc2\xa0At one point I had someone following up with me regularly but no corrections were ever made and then they just stopped calling. \xc2\xa0I have called in several more times to re-open the case but I just get an overseas tech support rep who wants to follow their script and start with resetting my box. \xc2\xa0The customer service staff are just robots, you explain what you need help with and they repeat it back to you...and thats about it...they don't use what you explained to troubleshoot the problem...they just repeat what you said and then start their script. \xc2\xa0I have asked for a refund and been told no, I have tried to cancel and I go around and around with he rep trying to talk me out of cancelling but will not listen that the lineup is broken so I won't pay for something that does not work. \xc2\xa0Three attempts to cancel and I was on the phone for 40 minutes each time, finally I just hang up because I can't stand arguing any more. \xc2\xa0Such awful service and it didn't use to be this way. \xc2\xa0When their agents were U.S. based it was excellent service."
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
3/22/2017\n
"TiVo is turning out to be just like all the Cable providers! \xc2\xa0Rotten! \xc2\xa0I spoke with Dina yesterday to renew a contract with TiVo and we worked for 30 minutes to restore service. \xc2\xa0Gave her my cc info-told me it would take 24 hours to reset. \xc2\xa024 hours later nothing! \xc2\xa0Called TiVo and spoke to Will who was so nice and so sorry this happened. \xc2\xa0He went to a mgr to get help and he told me he was sorry but Dina didn't complete the work she said she'd do. \xc2\xa0Will told me it would take another 24 hours to restore and I asked him to speak to his manager again to escalate the issue. \xc2\xa0He came back and told me it would now take an hour. \xc2\xa0One hour later...of course it didn't get restored. \xc2\xa0By now they are closed for the night and I have to wait another day to speak to someone that probably won't help me! \xc2\xa0My confidence in TiVo has plunged! \xc2\xa0Please help me TiVo!"
\n            2 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
\n            Stop following Sutherland Diesel Performance S.\n        
4/4/2017\n
Long long time customer and I was thinking of adding another unit to my home. Called today and after a long wait finally got ahold of one of the sales guys. He really did not give me very much info to go on, so after a frustrating conversation I gave up. 
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
11/4/2015\n
We have used TiVo for over a decade. Service and customer service used to be great! That is no longer the case. \xc2\xa0We are on our 3rd TiVo since August- as our unit we bought a year and a half ago died and the unit sent after that did not work. During this time we have been without consistent service and TiVo has been double charging us in the meantime. Customer service calls and surveys and even emails are not responded to and the reps that we do speak to are not sympathetic and powerless to resolve our problem. 
How something so great has gone so horribly wrong is a mystery but in the meantime we are going to discontinue service.
\n            2 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
10/24/2014\n
 year ago, I disconnected from satellite, for good. \xc2\xa0
"Tivo's product and especially their service has been amazing:"
HATE the remote, but I paid a ONE time fee for years of entertainment. \xc2\xa0Just a year of satellite is DOUBLE the price of the equipment and lifetime service. \xc2\xa0
"Love my streaming shows. \xc2\xa0Who has time to watch all that TV? \xc2\xa0I realized, I sure don't."
\n            1 person voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
6/3/2016\n
I purchased a TIVO with a lifetime subscription, so no further payments are required. But TIVO insists that I give them a credit card number. There explanation is that we want it. \xc2\xa0I love the tiro system but the company sucks. \xc2\xa0there is no reason to require a credit card except to invade people privacy. If you do not have a credit card their suggestion is " get someone else to let them use theirs" \xc2\xa0What a great (idiotic) idea.
\n            1 person voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
2/1/2016\n
My wife and I recently moved into a new home with her elderly parents. \xc2\xa0Our goal was to minimize expenses for all of us while giving them a sense of security for their near future.
"This home is in Time Warner/ Verizon Fios territory and we had the choice of either. \xc2\xa0As past customer's of DirectTV, we knew we had that choice as well. \xc2\xa0Our past experience with Time Warner was not *awesome* and our past experience with DirectTV was good but expensive."
"None of us had ever owned Tivo's."
When comparing the Time Warner/ DirectTV / Verizon Fios pricing packages for the stations we consider most essential, we were quickly floored by the sticker shock cost of lighting up 5 TVs with DVR service. \xc2\xa0Across the board, we were looking at ~$250 per month with the internet service I need for my work.
o we looked into Tivo. \xc2\xa0Tivo had just released their new Bolt DVR, and they have remote devices called "Minis" that can use the tuners in the Bolts. \xc2\xa0Bolts have four tuners each for both watching TV and recording it.
Verizon had the best internet packages and we ultimately decided to get their 150MB/150MB internet service plus TV programming that suited our needs. \xc2\xa0
"Using the Tivo's requires getting Cable Cards (slide in encryption devices) to access cable channels. \xc2\xa0At Verizon, these are about $5 per month. \xc2\xa0We ordered three for two Tivo Bolt's and one for a Silicon Dust HD Homerun Prime streamer for our computers and laptops."
o now we had 8 tuners to distribute to 5 TVs from the Tivos (I am the only one that ever uses the three Silicon Dust tuners.) \xc2\xa0This saved us almost $100 in Verizon set top box rental and DVR service charges. \xc2\xa0This is somewhat offset by the Tivo $150 per year ($30 per month) subscription charges for the two Bolts and the $15 in monthly Cable Card rental.
In the end, we were able to calculate a 23 month ROI on the Tivo box purchases over renting set top boxes and DVR service from Verizon.
But this is not for the technically faint hearted. \xc2\xa0We worked through multiple problems mostly related to the speed of our local ethernet network (1GB, but local cables that were less than CAT6 posed problems), and the speed of our coaxial network (less than RG6 local cables posed problems). \xc2\xa0I also found we needed to terminate unused coaxial cable connections with appropriate 75 ohm terminators.
"One of our original Bolt's had a tuning problem, which took about two weeks to work out with Tivo support. \xc2\xa0Tivo support was great, but could not grasp that with two Bolts, one had tuning problems and the other did not on the same cables and in the same location. \xc2\xa0I had to replace the Cable Card to prove to them that the Bolt was having problems."
s to the Tivo experience, it is without peer. \xc2\xa0We love the streaming apps + TV tuner capabilities and the Minis expand to our 5 TVs in an economical way that just makes sense. \xc2\xa0We have the in-laws sharing their own Bolt for the Living room and their bedroom and sharing that Bolt with the guest bedroom. \xc2\xa0My wife and I share the other Bolt between the Family Room and our bedroom.
"After some hiccups with getting speeds to their maximums on our Ethernet, WiFi, and Coaxial networks, we now have a very accommodating system for all involved. \xc2\xa0It is amazing to see my father in law binging on TV show marathons in Hulu, Amazon, and Netflix. On the plus side, Tivo's support remote streaming from Sources like Youtube making it possible to share family videos on your TVs. \xc2\xa0"
he search feature is the killer, it will search from both TV programs in your scheduled programming and streaming apps you have subscribed to. \xc2\xa0I have never seen better except perhaps in my Roku which is less convenient and out of the current input channel when using the TV tuner.
o mission accomplished but make sure you are ready for getting all networks, local cables, and required terminations up to speed. \xc2\xa0It has been worth it, but it required more work than I expected. \xc2\xa0Also, know that Tivo support is real slow to assign fault to their own equipment. \xc2\xa0If you need replacements, you may be in for a long haul.
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
1/20/2017\n
"Bought a new TIVO Bolt 2 months ago because one of my TIVO boxes was tiling premium channels. \xc2\xa0Guess what the new TIVO BOLT was even worse. \xc2\xa0Fast forward 2 months, after countless calls to TIVO and Comcast it still doesn't work. \xc2\xa0Comcast came out 3 times, 2 times with a supervisor and ran every diagnostic in the world on the TIVO and cable system.. All new cables were put it. \xc2\xa0We even ran the working TIVO cable to the defective TIVO and it still didn't \xc2\xa0work. \xc2\xa0TIVO finally agreed to send a new TIVO Bolt. \xc2\xa0Today I got a notice saying that it would be a refurbished BOLT. \xc2\xa0I have now been on the phone with a TIVO supervisor for over an hour with no budging on their part. \xc2\xa0I have been a TIVO customer for eight years. \xc2\xa0It is time to junk the whole system. \xc2\xa0Worst customer service ever, agent who don't what they are doing."
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
6/22/2015\n
"I had Tivo DVR a dozen years ago and loved it! \xc2\xa0In the meantime, I have had to deal with mediocre DVR's and associated software with U-verse, Dish & Direct TV. \xc2\xa0With an anticipated move to a new house, I decided to purchase a Tivo DVR directly from them and get back to the user friendly system I use to love."
Unfortunately, this is a story about a dysfunctional order/sales system. \xc2\xa0I tried to purchase a Roamio Plus DVR, lifetime subscription service & a mini box for around $1,000. \xc2\xa0When they placed the order, something went wrong with their order software system, which authorized a charge to my debit card, but the order "died" internally giving the customer service representation an "error message". \xc2\xa0I was asked if I would be willing to allow a second authorization of my debit card, but this too failed. \xc2\xa0I had been on the phone for about an hour, being put on hold on and off, when I was cut off.
I assumed that the order was somehow placed and all was good. \xc2\xa0The next day two more charge authorizations came through on my debit card, now totally some $4,000 in pending charges. \xc2\xa0I only found out about the additional charges by looking at my account on-line. \xc2\xa0These charges overdrew my account and I had to transfer $2,000 to cover this amount. \xc2\xa0It took me another 3 hours on the phone talking to Tivo and my bank to resolve this $4,000 debacle, finally removing all these charges, which had no orders behind them.
he Tivo customer \xc2\xa0service representative I was working with on day 3 of the mess, a Friday, suggested I use another account, which I did, but the error on their order system occurred for the 5th time. \xc2\xa0She told me that she would manually enter the order and that I would receive an e-mail confirmation.
On Monday, I still had not received an e-mail conformation, so I called Tivo, to find that the same thing happened as on all the other orders; an error message occurred, but nobody followed up on it, nobody "manually" entered an order and I have a pending $1,000 charge on my other debit card. \xc2\xa0Very poor customer service.
he last customer service supervisor I talked with, finally suggested I buy a Tivo from "Best Buy" and then Tivo would reimburse any price difference to me, so that I would have my unit in time for the cable guy visit on the upcoming Friday. \xc2\xa0I\'m off to "Best Buy". \xc2\xa0Wish me luck.
ll through these six days of trying to buy something, I was explained to, told about and reasoned with how their "order system" was not working. \xc2\xa0At the very end, I had to explain to the supervisor that we as customers don\'t care what their order software problems are. \xc2\xa0We just want to buy their stuff. \xc2\xa0I cannot believe that they cannot manually place an order, but they could take my money.
If it was me, having been in manufacturing, production & quality assurance for 25 years, I would have personally packaged the hardware and personally walked it to FedEx and have it shipped "next day". \xc2\xa0Then I\'d get back to the customer as to paying for the equipment. \xc2\xa0I mean I was a good risk. \xc2\xa0I had committed $5,000 of my money towards the purchase of $1,000 worth of goods from Tivo. \xc2\xa0Customer loyalty is a very tenuous thing. \xc2\xa0Hopefully, I will love my new Tivo, otherwise .....
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
11/7/2015\n
BUYER BEWARE!!! \xc2\xa0When I called TIVO to set up service, I said I "want to try you out." The rep answered, "Then you\'ll want our month-to-month service." \xc2\xa0THIS IS MISLEADING AND A DOWNRIGHT LIE. I cancelled after 4 months and was slapped with a $75 cancellation fee and was told that the "month-to-month is actually a one-year contract," something that was not told to me when I started service. 
\n            2 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
12/15/2016\n
I was a longtime TIVO subscriber and happy with their service. \xc2\xa0In July, 2015 we had a house fire. \xc2\xa0We were displaced for a year and our TIVO box was a casualty of the fire. \xc2\xa0I called TIVO and explained the situation and cancelled our service as the box was destroyed. \xc2\xa0In October 2015, without notice, TIVO resumed billing for the destroyed box. \xc2\xa0The box that I told them no longer existed. \xc2\xa0I just recently noticed the charge. \xc2\xa0OK, human error on their part - I\'ll call and fix this. \xc2\xa0Well, their response was that this problem was a "shared responsibility." \xc2\xa0Essentially, even though I called, told them the box was destroyed and cancelled my TIVO service - that I should be on the lookout for TIVO just deciding to start billing me again. \xc2\xa0While I agree that I should check my credit card bills more carefully - I also believe that I should be able to trust a company when I call and cancel a service. \xc2\xa0After the fire I canceled many home-related services (cable, phone, garbage, etc.) and none of them resumed billing prematurely. \xc2\xa0Sheesh - even Comcast was more ethical than TIVO. \xc2\xa0Thumbs down. \xc2\xa0No ethics.
\n            1 person voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
1/14/2016\n
ervice over the 5-6 years that I had tivo stagnated and cable companies eclipsed Tivo.. \xc2\xa0
When time came to cancel the service, they offered to "suspend" my billing so I can try and sell the Series 3 HD equipment... 
I tired, but I could not even give it away for FREE!
I cancelled the service in July of 2015, But, Tivo conveniently kept on billing me every month automatically against my checking account..
8 Months later, I am realizing they are still stealing my money after cancellation AND confirmation emails stating it was cancelled.. \xc2\xa0
o, I called them today explaining that they have been fraudently charging my account for 8 months.. \xc2\xa0The "specalist" on the case said, sorry, they can only refund me 90 days... 
"I'm like, WHAT?? \xc2\xa0You have been stealing money from my bank account systematicaly for 8 MONTHS!!! And you claim I can only get 90 days worth???"
fter 15 minutes of transferring and talking to more "specialists" and supervisors, eventually the agent, after threathing them with reporting fraud and theft, she goes: "Ok, looks like we forgot to click the cancel button when you called in March.. we\'ll refund your money"
UN..RUN AS FAR AND AS FAST AS YOU CAN AWAY FROM THEM!!!!!
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
12/15/2015\n
"Tivo used to have reasonable customer service. \xc2\xa0Now it sucks. \xc2\xa0Called and was told the wait time was approximately 20 minutes. \xc2\xa0After 2 HOURS on hold I gave up. \xc2\xa0Their website was not only NOT helpful with my issue but it provided ABSOLUTELY WRONG information/solution. \xc2\xa0However, the hardware/product remains great . . . Just hope and pray you don't need customer support because you might die of old age before you get it."
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
3/4/2015\n
I have a TIVO device that I rent via my cable company for $20/month (plus $10 for the mini). The system seems to work very well though it has a few things I do not enjoy like having to delete each and every program one at a time twice. Some of the menus take time to learn. 
My complaint and low rating is based on the potential purchasing of a TIVO.
I would advise anyone who wants to purchase one to make sure you understand what you are paying for prior to purchase.. 
1. The $500 lifetime service agreement only applies to the actual unit you purchase.
If the unit goes into service and it is deemed by them it needs to be replaced the service agreement ends! This means you have to purchase another service agreement for the replacement unit if you want one.
2. Even if you purchase a warranty it does not cover all labor and parts in certain circumstances and you must pay for a replacement. You also have to pay for transportation costs.
fter speaking to the TIVO agents I came to the conclusion if TIVO will not fix their equipment at no cost under warranty due to component failures 100% and will not make the service agreement continue to units they replace at no additional fee it is best to not purchase the device and service.
\n            4 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
4/9/2015\n
nyone with the series III TiVo received an on screen message on Friday, April 3. The message in your TiVo display said "the Amazon and YouTube applications will not be available on this DVR as of April 16, 2015. You will not be able to purchase or download titles from Amazon on this DVR. However, you will be able to continue to watch the movies/TV episodes you purchased an already downloaded within the now playing list."
\n            2 people voted for this review\n    
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
6/11/2015\n
"I would give 0 stars if I could. \xc2\xa0I bought a romeo box from tivo that didn't work from day one. \xc2\xa0Was suppose to be new but I think it was refurbished. \xc2\xa0When I called to return box for credit. \xc2\xa0They told me they would not do that. \xc2\xa0Their customer service sucks. \xc2\xa0Better ways to cut the cord than using tivo. \xc2\xa0Table or magna vox new 1tb machine with no monthly fees."
\n                    Heads up: From now on, other Yelpers will be able to see how you voted. Want to chime in?\n                
\n                    11 other reviews that are not currently recommended\n            
his provider has not enabled messaging on Yelp. Request a quote from other similar providers.
\n                    Yelps about services related to home and hearth in the Puget Sound Are\xe2\x80\xa6\n                
\n                            Find more Television Service Providers near Tivo\n                        
Claim your free business page to have your changes published immediately.
\n                        Understand how a business\xe2\x80\x99 rating changes month-to-month. 
We calculate the overall star rating using only reviews that our automated software currently recommends. 
\n                    Oops, looks like something\xe2\x80\x99s wrong. Try again!\n                
\n                    Are you a human? Please complete the bot challenge below.\n                
ext a link to your phone so you can quickly get directions, see photos, and read reviews on the go!
\n            Copyright \xc2\xa9 2004\xe2\x80\x932017 Yelp Inc. Yelp, 
ource: Freebase (https://www.freebase.com/), licensed under CC-BY (https://creativecommons.org/licenses/by/2.5/)
2001-2004\n
Blu-ray Movie Discussion, Expert Reviews & News
, and most of the ads you see will disappear. It only takes 30 seconds to sign up, so
\nWhen Tivo announced the introduction of their 
, which set the world on fire in 2013, with their ability to stream recorded content to mobile devices -- anytime -- anywhere.
\nSo, now, two years later, Tivo introduces the 
hould we be excited about an offering that offers new features yet downgrades others?
\nAs usual, I need to start off by saying that I am a huge fan of Tivo DVRs. I have freed myself from the chains of cable company set top boxes for more than a decade now since joining the Tivo family. 
\nWhen Tivo contacted me about reviewing their new 
Being a highly satisfied owner of their Roamio Plus
, and looking over the specs of the 
, I thought I would be downgrading by switching out units. 
adds 4k and commercial skipping to this new product, it drops the 6 tuners and 3TB storage features of its Roamio predecessor.
nd, while the BOLT costs less to own than the $599 Tivo Roamio Pro, the company has jacked up its Lifetime Service fee by $200
", making it more elective, for some, to stick with their cable box. I'll talk about these costs at the close of my review, as I am getting a little bit ahead of myself."
"\nThe biggest surprise for me was the delivery of the Bolt itself. The shipment box was tiny. This couldn't be a Tivo unit...or could it? "
\nJust to show you how much smaller and lighter the 
16.5" W x 9.7" D x 2.4" H (6.9 lbs.)
On the other hand, the Bolt adds support for 4k video and adds some nifty software features including 
, both which aim to save you time when watching your favorite programming. Additionally, the 
"\nThe back of the unit shows connections for cable or OTA antenna, optical and audio outputs, Ethernet port (10/100/1000 Mbps), HDMI output, 2 USB inputs and a eSATA connection for additional storage options. You'll also notice a remote finder button that upon being pressed, makes it easy to find your lost controller. Finally, and most notably, the cable card now gets loaded at the bottom of the unit, one of the ingenious ways Tivo was able to keep the "
\nEverything you need to get started comes in the box, including a quality HDMI cable that is perfect for 4k connection. 
"\nIf this will be your first Tivo product, you'll find setup to be quite intuitive. After plugging in your cable or antenna to the back of the unit and inserting a multi-stream (M-CARD) cable card underneath, the software walks you through the initial process. Basically, you enter your zip code, Tivo finds your cable provider, and within a few short minutes you are ready to start using your new "
. You can find a more detailed look at the setup process in my 
"\nThose of you who are already Tivo customers will be happy to know that you can transfer over all your existing Season Passes from one device to another by logging onto Tivo's website and selecting TIVO ONLINE -> MANAGE -> ONE PASS MANAGER. Don't expect the transfer of your shows to be flawless. This is the second new Tivo device I have owned where the transfer resulted in duplicate entries. By this, I mean that the new device recorded two versions of my shows both in SD and HD. It also did not properly port over my preferences for just recording new airings vs. all seasons. By the time all was said and done, I found myself manually re-entering every Season Pass myself."
"\nAnother problem, outside of Tivo's control, is the cable cards themselves. If you are dealing with Verizon, for instance, you'll find yourself on the phone with their support team in an effort to validate the card. Verizon won't let you simply take the card from one device to another, even if it's completely Tivo related. Once the card is inserted in a new device, permissions need to be sent in order to authorize all your subscribed channels. This may not be applicable to every provider, so your situation may vary."
has a faster processor and three times more memory than the Roamio models.
\nStarting with the Roamio series, Tivo has built-in wireless WiFi which means you no longer need to use their external adapter (which had to be purchased separately). 
he Tivo Bolt supports faster network speeds 802.11ac wireless, Gigabit Ethernet, MoCA 2.0
"\nAt the heart of the Tivo experience is its RF remote control that needs not to be in line-of-site for use. Over the years I have seen these remotes become smaller and more ergonomic friendly. I have always found the remotes very easy to use and appreciate the fact that they can be programmed to any brand of television to control its power, channel and volume features. It might not be able to control your entire home system like an all-in-one remote, but it's perfect for a single display. Speaking of all-in-one remotes, "
"the Logitech Harmony remotes sync perfectly with Tivo. You won't have any problems using one with this device."
, is a feature called SkipMode. It allows you to skip through commercials with the press of a single button on the remote.
\nThe good news is that, when you find a supported show, it works beautifully! 
\nAs you come to a commercial in a supported program, an indicator w/sound appears in the upper left corner of your screen, prompting you to press the small, green "D" button on your remote. 
When you press the button, the content flawlessly skips the commercials and takes you to the exact resuming point of the content you are watching.
"It's going to take a lot of cooperation between networks and advertisers to allow Tivo to simply skip through commercials."
For now, you may find yourself only able to use this feature occasionally.
, that has also found its way into the Roamio models through a recent update, is 
. It allows you to take any recorded content and speed it up by 30% while retaining perfectly pitched audio.
"It's just a good feature to have when one is in a hurry."
Best of all, like the Roamio series, search queries are executed across the entire device.
\nThe Tivo Roamio series was a revolutionary product for its ability to stream content to mobile phones and tablets. This has been carried over to the 
, and for me, it still remains the most important aspect of owning a DVR like this. 
, can be streamed to your portable device via the free Tivo app.
Poor WiFi will only result in constant buffering issues.
\nIncidentally, the iOS app provides support to mirror your Tivo to Apple TV. On Android, you can use Amazon Fire TV for the same purpose.
I use both the Tivo app and its own website to regularly schedule shows while I am on the road.
ll of this can be done remotely
"\nIn case you don't know exactly what to watch, "
ivo is constantly providing recommendations of the most popular shows.
ivo also puts together its own Collections based on particular themes or holidays
\nIf Apple were releasing this product it would most likely be named the Tivo Roamio "S"
\nIf you already own a Roamio, there really is no need to upgrade right now. In fact, I have been reading that Tivo is planning a newer, more powerful model (possibly this year) for us power users who want the additional tuners and the newer features.
\nHowever, if you own the older models prior to Roamio, or you are looking into buying a Tivo for the first time, the 
You really are getting the best DVR anywhere when you buy a Tivo.
\n* Hands down, the best DVR brand you can buy. Tivo continues to raise the bar.
\n* The new, handsome minimalistic design motivates moving this Tivo out of the A/V cabinet and out in the open
\n* Noticeably faster than previous Tivo models
"\n* SkipMode is amazing! Skips commercials without skipping a beat. Let's hope there is more network support for it"
\n* QuickMode also works impressively, allowing you to view content 3.5x faster with accurate audio playback
\n* Flawlessly streams content to your favorite portable device no matter where you are
\n* Still not an economical choice over cable boxes. Tivo needs to continue to bring down monthly fees
\n* Lifetime service ownership increased to $600. That is simply outrageous!
\n* Less storage space and less tuners than Roamio Pro
\n* Limited storage for recorded 4k content, even at 1TB
\n* Does not work with satellite television
ot familiar with Tivo? First Time buyer? Our Tivo Roamio review gives more insight into the Tivo interface and experience
"\nThe Bolt is not for me. I just manually upgraded my Roamio to 3TB. I won't buy another 1TB TiVo. and while I've not done the count, I see no value in going backwards to four tuners. There's no flaw or weakness in six tuners, and every mini 'costs' a tuner. It's purely cost savings to TiVo with no benefit or savings to the customer."
\n"You can immediately see, from the photo above, that it\'s a rather handsome device"
\nNo. I see an asymmetrically unattractive device that weirds me out. 
"\nThis is an equivocal upgrade. 4K and faster interface are an improvement. Four tuners, less storage, higher price are significant downgrades from the previous generation. It's like the iPhone 7 getting the new CPU but a camera from two years ago and a $200 price hike. "
"\nI think for a prospective customer, I'd consider finding a used roamio -- it has the new Quick Mode and is supposedly getting Skip Mode -- or waiting for the Bolt rev 2 or Roamio rev 2.\n"
"\nThe Roamio has had skip mode (zipping past the commercials) for a while now. I don't know if it has quick mode. At least it didn't jump out at me and I haven't looked for it yet."
"\nHonestly I can't remember when skip mode got put in, but I think it was back in December. It's definitely a feature that I've come to appreciate.\n"
"\nAre you certain of that? I know QuickMode was enabled for Roamio, but to date, I don't believe SkipMode. "
\nI am finding SkipMode is not always consistent when it comes to availability on TV shows. For instance, 
"The Roamio has had skip mode (zipping past the commercials) for a while now. I don't know if it has quick mode. At least it didn't jump out at me and I haven't looked for it yet."
"\nHonestly I can't remember when skip mode got put in, but I think it was back in December. It's definitely a feature that I've come to appreciate."
iVo has had the 30-sec skip forever. The new commercial-skipping feature is new to the Bolt, only in limited markets for testing, and available to only some Roamio owners for in test markets. The rollout was recently reported as having delays.. 
\nThe fast-play mode was released to all Roamio owners in a recent software update.\n
"\nDiscovered that skip mode is only available for the Roamio in Chicago (where I am) and San Francisco. Explains why I've been able to use it just fine while others can't. I have no idea why they did it this way or when it will be available for everyone.\n"
I am finding SkipMode is not always consistent when it comes to availability on TV shows. For instance, 
"I've noticed that as well. I haven't worried about it too much. When it's available, I use it. When it's not, I just fast forward like before.\n"
I am finding SkipMode is not always consistent when it comes to availability on TV shows. For instance, 
"I can't understand why producers of commercial supported content would have anything to do with skipmode. It's like opening a golf course and letting everyone play for free.\n"
\nBut a family cat is not replaceable like a wornout coat or a set of tires. Each new kitten becomes its own cat, and none is repeated. I am four cats old, measuring out my life in friends that have succeeded but not replaced one another.--Irving Townsend\n
"\n$600 is outrageous for a lifetime fee. That's what they charge to freeze your head. "
\nLimited 4K, what does that mean? Decreased storage from 3 to 1 TB. Decreased turners from 6 to 4. It\'s almost like they\'re saying "we dare you to buy this, we tried to make the purchase sting as much as we could."\n
\nBut a family cat is not replaceable like a wornout coat or a set of tires. Each new kitten becomes its own cat, and none is repeated. I am four cats old, measuring out my life in friends that have succeeded but not replaced one another.--Irving Townsend\n
"$600 is outrageous for a lifetime fee. That's what they charge to freeze your head. "
\nLimited 4K, what does that mean? Decreased storage from 3 to 1 TB. Decreased turners from 6 to 4. It\'s almost like they\'re saying "we dare you to buy this, we tried to make the purchase sting as much as we could."
\nVery easy to update the HD to 2 or 3TB -- drop in and turn on unit.
\nThe 4 Tuner Bolt is equivalent to original Roamio -- can operate in ANT or Cable mode, but not both simultaneously
\nBoltPlus is a Black 6 tuner variation with only Cable compatibility and 3TB HD so pretty much equivalent to Roamio Pro XL.
\nNothing to offer for Satellite as DirecTV seems to have eliminated anyone other than their own units.
\nThere are intermittent deals on Lifetime Contracts -- I think Black Friday week may have been the last widespread, but they did just run
"\na promo with a chance to exchange a lifetime on a Series 2 or 3 unit for a Bolt + $99. I had an old single tuner Series 2 (12 years into a Lifetime deal) which was pretty worthless, but luckily I had kept it updated with contacting TIVO service a couple times a year. My two series 3 with Lifetime are still working well (slow, but hard to fault), so for now I'll leave those in place since they are dual tuner, but cable card and antenna work simultaneously and are 5+ years into their Lifetime $100 contract.\n"
\nI must agree about the cost of the lifetime fee, though David does point out that discounts are sometimes offered.
\nTivo is obviously also not the most inexpensive DVR that one can purchase.
"\nHowever, as someone that has at least 4 Tivo units throughout my home, I am extremely happy with the features and performance of these units. I admit, I haven't looked at what the cable companies offer on their DVRs, but I am certain the software/platform is not as advanced as it is on these Tivo boxes.\n"
I must agree about the cost of the lifetime fee, though David does point out that discounts are sometimes offered.
\nTivo is obviously also not the most inexpensive DVR that one can purchase.
"\nHowever, as someone that has at least 4 Tivo units throughout my home, I am extremely happy with the features and performance of these units. I admit, I haven't looked at what the cable companies offer on their DVRs, but I am certain the software/platform is not as advanced as it is on these Tivo boxes."
"I've rarely read many people happy with switching from TIVO to CableCo equivalents. Part of it is the learning curve learning a new system, but it seems most people end up missing their TIVO and return to it. With some CableCo charging $20 or more a month for a DVR it doesn't help when you are missing your old friend."
"\nActually the DirecTV DVR I found worked pretty well -- not quite as flexible as TIVO, but much better than most non TIVO DVR I've messed with.\n"
\nI love my TiVo been a customer since 2005. I have not upgraded to the Bolt+ yet. Although I\'m considering it at some point. They have been rock solid and and the latest releases have been great. The "D" button is my new best friend.\n
\nCurrent Equipment: Samsung 85" 4K TV (UN85HU8550) + Samsung Evolution Kit (SEK-3500U/ZA), Oppo UHD Player (203), Roku Premiere+, Tivo Roamio Pro, Marantz SR7010 + Marantz MM7025, Xbox One S, Ray Remote, Definitive Technology Speakers and SVS PC-2000 Subwoofer. Xbox Live: DMILLER68\n
\nTwo things I cannot live without on my Tivo....
\nFirst is the QuickMode. I am always pressed for time. Many times, I watch my favorite series in QuickMode. As the video in my review shows, it allows the program to speed up and keep the dialogue distinguishable. So, I can watch an hour program in almost half the time and not miss anything.
\nOf course, the next best feature is SkipMode which allows me to bypass commercials. So far, it works on many CBS and AMC shows I record. Not sure of the other networks.\n
"\nWhat's the typical cost to rent a Comcast or Fios DVR? How's that compare to tivo?"
"\nTiVo has never been the cheapest solution. But they'd been a modest premium over a 3-4 duration compared to renting a cable co box. And if you sold your TiVo used when upgrading, they were even more attractive. "
"\nBut I don't know how they compare in the age of $80 streaming boxes.\n"
\nSkipMode works on all prime time shows we watch, spanning: ABC to CW to FX.\n
\nVery easy to update the HD to 2 or 3TB -- drop in and turn on unit.
\nThe 4 Tuner Bolt is equivalent to original Roamio -- can operate in ANT or Cable mode, but not both simultaneously
\nBoltPlus is a Black 6 tuner variation with only Cable compatibility and 3TB HD so pretty much equivalent to Roamio Pro XL.
\nNothing to offer for Satellite as DirecTV seems to have eliminated anyone other than their own units.
\nThere are intermittent deals on Lifetime Contracts -- I think Black Friday week may have been the last widespread, but they did just run
"\na promo with a chance to exchange a lifetime on a Series 2 or 3 unit for a Bolt + $99. I had an old single tuner Series 2 (12 years into a Lifetime deal) which was pretty worthless, but luckily I had kept it updated with contacting TIVO service a couple times a year. My two series 3 with Lifetime are still working well (slow, but hard to fault), so for now I'll leave those in place since they are dual tuner, but cable card and antenna work simultaneously and are 5+ years into their Lifetime $100 contract."
"I did a quick Google to check out prices. AT BB you can get a 1TB Bolt for $266. Assume $100 for a 3 TB HD and now it's $366. Add $600 for the lifetime fee and it's now $966. Assume you can get the lifetime service on sale for $300 and it's still $666. Seems pricey."
\nHow about OTA? Can it do cable and ota at the same time? DTV eliminated that from their receivers but I got an add on for the receiver that allows it to happen. What does limited 4K mean? How much extra space does 4K use over HD?
"\nThe 6 to 4 tuner downgrade still bugs me. It's happened a couple times that I've maxed out my 5 DTV tuners. Maybe this isn't a big deal, but why downgrade, does a tuner cost that much?\n"
\nBut a family cat is not replaceable like a wornout coat or a set of tires. Each new kitten becomes its own cat, and none is repeated. I am four cats old, measuring out my life in friends that have succeeded but not replaced one another.--Irving Townsend\n
"The 6 to 4 tuner downgrade still bugs me. It's happened a couple times that I've maxed out my 5 DTV tuners. Maybe this isn't a big deal, but why downgrade, does a tuner cost that much?"
"The Bolt+ has 6 tuners that is the reason I'm thinking about upgrading. Now that I'm using TiVo Mini in the bedroom.\n"
\nCurrent Equipment: Samsung 85" 4K TV (UN85HU8550) + Samsung Evolution Kit (SEK-3500U/ZA), Oppo UHD Player (203), Roku Premiere+, Tivo Roamio Pro, Marantz SR7010 + Marantz MM7025, Xbox One S, Ray Remote, Definitive Technology Speakers and SVS PC-2000 Subwoofer. Xbox Live: DMILLER68\n
"I did a quick Google to check out prices. AT BB you can get a 1TB Bolt for $266. Assume $100 for a 3 TB HD and now it's $366. Add $600 for the lifetime fee and it's now $966. Assume you can get the lifetime service on sale for $300 and it's still $666. Seems pricey."
\nHow about OTA? Can it do cable and ota at the same time? DTV eliminated that from their receivers but I got an add on for the receiver that allows it to happen. What does limited 4K mean? How much extra space does 4K use over HD?
"\nThe 6 to 4 tuner downgrade still bugs me. It's happened a couple times that I've maxed out my 5 DTV tuners. Maybe this isn't a big deal, but why downgrade, does a tuner cost that much?"
"If you're going to update the HDD you might as well get the 500GB Tivo for $130-150 off Amazon (or PM at BBY). I bought a cheap used Roamio Plus on Ebay a few months ago and moved my Cable Card from one of my Lifetime TIVOHD (series 3), now I have the TIVOHD set up for dual tuner OTA and Roamio 6tuner for Cable in the same room. If you have several units in service you can often get them to discount the monthly service to $6.95/month. If you want to try Tivo CSR Roulette, you can activate it it for a 6-12 months, then call in to d/c it and see if they offer you a Lifetime deal -- it's been more hit or miss with the current owners. At $70-80 a year the breakeven point for the Lifetime/All-In is 5+ years. "
"\nTIVO with the Roamio/Bolt removed the ability to do Cable and OTA at the same time. The Roamio and 4 tuner Bolts can be set-up to do one or the other. I'm not sure if there is something technical about the 4 tuners that makes simultaneous usage impossible or that makes 6 tuner units incompatible with OTA."
"\nThere is the 6 tuner premium 3TB Bolt+ for $499.99 though I've rarely seen much of a deal on them yet or you can stay with the Roamio Pro Line which are going to be cheaper and still offers most of the functionality except 4K."
"\nIf you have active Series 2 or 3 units there is hope they'll run the upgrade deals again down the line. The recent 199.99 (500GB Bolt) + 99.99 Lifetime transfer was such a screaming deal I had to jump esp with the obsolete Series 2 to use. Drop a $130 4TB Hard Drive in and I'm good to go. At worst, TIVO+Lifetime units still have nice re-sale value if I don't like the Bolt or decide to go other directions.\n"
"I did a quick Google to check out prices. AT BB you can get a 1TB Bolt for $266. Assume $100 for a 3 TB HD and now it's $366. Add $600 for the lifetime fee and it's now $966. Assume you can get the lifetime service on sale for $300 and it's still $666. Seems pricey."
\nHow about OTA? Can it do cable and ota at the same time? DTV eliminated that from their receivers but I got an add on for the receiver that allows it to happen. What does limited 4K mean? How much extra space does 4K use over HD?
"\nThe 6 to 4 tuner downgrade still bugs me. It's happened a couple times that I've maxed out my 5 DTV tuners. Maybe this isn't a big deal, but why downgrade, does a tuner cost that much?"
"If you're paying $15/mo for a cable co DVR, that's $540 over three years. A $100 premium for the TiVo, to me, is minor. If you can sell the TiVo later for $100+, it's break even. If the TiVo lasts you four years or more, you're actually saving money. "
"\nAs for the 4-tuner OTA TiVo...I don't know. What I takeaway is that people uninterested in spending money to watch TV are uninterested in spending money to watch TV. So that market is a lower priority, served by the lowest cost option.\n"
(You must log in or sign up to post here.)
333,367
4,370,739
132,447
Blu-ray Movie Discussion, Expert Reviews & News
\nHome Theater Forum Media & Studio Partners\n
1.5.11.0
Blu-ray Movie Discussion, Expert Reviews & News
Blu-ray Movie Discussion, Expert Reviews & News
iVo BOLT Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\tTiVo BOLT Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review\t\t\t\t\t\t
iVo BOLT Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review
his video recorder comes with four tuners that will let you record four shows at the same time. You can also buy the mini extenders from TiVO in order to get three extra tuners. This will let you view the live and recorded programs on all the other TVs in your home.
In case you\xe2\x80\x99re still wondering whether you should splurge on this product here\xe2\x80\x99s a complete insight on the 
ecords six shows at the same time- This is one of the main reasons why you should opt for the TiVO Bolt+. This recorder lets you record six shows at the same time. It offers 450+ hours of high definition programming which equates to about 3TB of recording capacity.
With this device, you no longer need your cable equipment and you can still use your old cable subscription to operate it.
High-quality UHD content- If you\xe2\x80\x99re someone who is particularly concerned about quality- this is one product that will never disappoint you. With the 
, you can now watch high-quality content in 4K UHD.
he device renders high-end picture quality and is also perfectly compatible with most cable connections. With this recorder, you can enjoy crisp picture quality, accurate color, and perfect details. In simpler words, you can enjoy the best of your 4K TV with this recorder.
Comes with your favorite streaming apps- This is another reason why the TiVo Bolt + is truly worth a shot. It comes integrated with all your favorite streaming apps.
Once you get this recorder home, you will no longer have to rely on the switching inputs, remotes and/or other devices. You can flawlessly access Netflix, Amazon Prime, Hulu, Vudu, HBO Go and Pandora with this recorder. In other words- all your streaming needs are met under one single roof.
njoy a commercial break free TV watching experience- This recorder comes with an exclusive Skipmode that lets you skip entire commercial breaks of the recorded shows. All you need to do is press a single button and you soon get the chance to watch your favorite shows minus the hassles of commercial breaks.
he recorder also comes with a quick mode that lets you watch your favorite recorded shows at 30% faster speed. The pitch corrected audio, further, enhances your experience and lets you enjoy the very best from your TV.
iVo Bolt Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review
xcellent storage space compared to many competitors.
In researching for the TiVo BOLT Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review. We found it offered excellent storage space compared to many competitors. Although most people have a minor issue with the $300 and $400 price tags of this recorder, we cannot just undermine the storage space it comes with.
he price is pretty reasonable for the 500GB, 1TB and 3TB memory space the device offers. This means you can watch at least 75 to 300 hours of high definition content on this device. Unlike the
Comes with the OnePass feature- OnePass is a newer version of the Season Pass option of TiVo. This lets you set your DVR to immediately record an episode of a show throughout a specific season.
lthough this feature has been imitated by other competitors of this DVR, yet the OnePass feature of TiVO happens to be a tad more accurate, effective and reliable than every other DVR and cable model. This is particularly relevant when it comes to recording new episodes of your favorite programs or adjusting when a specific show changes its time slot.
OnePass effectively builds on this by collecting all the episodes of a specific show in an individual folder
OnePass effectively builds on this by collecting all the episodes of a specific show in an individual folder. This is relevant both for live streaming and purchases. Each of these episodes is marked, thereby informing you about whether the recording is that of a repeat telecast or of a streaming-only telecast.
his, in turn, lets you search results that are cross-referenced according to all the relevant video sources- both TV and online. 
o, for instance, if you search for a show like "The Good Wife" , you will not only get the upcoming first run and the rerun episodes on the TV, but you will also get the episode by episode list, as organized according to the seasons on Netflix and other leading streaming portals if it is available there. 
In case it is available for a purchase- you will be informed about the same and also notified about the prices accordingly.
iVo Bolt Recorder and Streaming Media Player Review.
Lets you record six different shows at the same time
quipped with 3TB recording capacity that offers 450 hours of HD streaming
Lets you watch the best quality 4K UHD content
Comes integrated with all the leading live streaming apps like Netflix, Amazon Prime, and Hulu
quipped with a skip mode feature that lets you skip commercial breaks in the middle of the shows
Works flawlessly with your existing cable connecting
lthough there are no major cons, some people have a minor issue with the high subscription charges of the recorder. However, this price is quite viable considering the 3TB storage space it offers.
Works great for most people but for some having issues customer support needs improvement.
Considering the features, tweaks, and usability of the 
Here to provide you with info and reviews and just plain cool stuff. Electronic device advice.
mazon Fire TV Stick Basic Edition Review
Linksys WRT1900ACS Dual Band WiFi Router Review
If you are a human, do not fill in this field.
If you are a human, do not fill in this field.
o you need a media streaming device if you have a smart TV?
\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\tDo you need a media streaming device if you have a smart TV?Do you need a media streaming device if you have a smart TV? The best way to answer this question is by first asking ourselves what a smart TV is and then go ahead and find out what a streaming media player actually does. For starters, smart TVs, originally called \xe2\x80\x9cConnected TVs\xe2\x80\x9d, are sets\t\t\t\t\t\t\t...\n\t\t\t\t\t\t
"High I'm Pete you Can call me Streamingpete"
I am the guy behind Gear Gadgets and Gizmos. I am interested in cool new electronic gadgets, gear and gizmos. This site is a go-to resource for Streaming Media Players and other new and interesting electronic devices. 
mazon Fire TV Stick Basic Edition Review
mazon Fire TV Now Available in Canada
Gear Gadgets and Gizmos is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC Associates Program, an affiliate advertising program designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to www.geargadgetsandgizmos.com (amazon.com or amazon.ca) We are also part of other affiliate programs where we earn a small fee if someone makes a purchase.
\n                            \t                            Copyright Gear Gadgets and Gizmos.\r\n                            \t\t\t\t\t\t                        
\r\n<td>\r\n<map name="map" id="map">\r\n<area shape="rect" coords="725,9,900,31" href="/cart/cart.php" alt="WeaKnees Cart">\r\n<area shape="rect" coords="616,10,704,30" href="/cart/register.php" alt="My Account">\r\n</map></td>\r\n
"We receive a lot of great feedback from our TiVo, DirecTV, and repair customers. \n              We have listed some of those comments below. We hope that our customers' comments give you some insight into our \n              product quality and service."
lso see our reviews at these sites
2017-10-22
"We were bummed when the hard drive on our TiVo went kuput. We looked around for options and for a while settled for a cable box. When we learned that we could replace the hard drive ourselves and keep our lifetime service we were hopeful but apprehensive as we\'re far from being "techies." We ordered a replacement kit from you. It arrived in less than a week with clear and understandable instructions. In short order we had the cover off our unit, the old hard drive out, the new hard drive installed and the cover back in place. With fingers crossed we powered up the unit. Everything worked. We did it! (With your help! \xe2\x98\xba\xef\xb8\x8f\xf0\x9f\x91\x8d). We couldn\'t be happier to be back in TiVoland. If I was more of a techie I would have taken a selfie of us doing the happy dance in our living room in front of our fully operational TiVo. \r\nThank you. We\'re happy and completely satisfied customers. "
2017-08-10
"You guys are a godsend. Thank you for restoring my Tivo HDXL back to life. It had the dreaded \'blinking green light\' and no video/audio output. After two service repairs, it\'s all as good as new, giving my 9-year old Tivo an extended life. The repair was certainly cheaper than buying another Tivo and had the added benefit of retaining all my existing recordings. WeaKnees is the place to go for the solution to all Tivo troubles . . . . ."
2017-07-04
"Y\'all are insanely awesome. More than 15 calls with TiVo and they gave 5 different excuses why they couldn\'t activate service, plus charged my credit card 4 different times for things they\'ve had to refund. Yet 30 minutes and a simply series of emails, and here we are a few days later... got your replacement unit, spent an hour setting it up, and everything is perfect.\r\n\r\nYour customer service is second to none!"
2017-06-14
"Thank you for the fast shipment of the fan for my Tivio Roamio OTA. Thanks to your YouTube video it is up and running "Quietly" once again.\r\n\r\nThanks!"
2017-05-19
"Hello.\r\n\r\nA couple weeks ago, I replaced an older 1TB drive with a new 2TB drive from you guys. I was expecting half the recording time based on info from your website, but was pleased to see in fact I had doubled the total recording time. (too bad we really don\'t need all that space!)\r\n\r\nAnyway, I have the Premeire XL Tivo (with two channels) and it started to act goofy the past few months. The Tivo is around six years old, so no surprise the drive was getting tired. The new drive has been in use for the past couple weeks. Our Tivo works great now and performs perfectly again. Your instructions, Torx tools and drive all worked very well. My family and I are very satisfied.\r\n\r\nThanks for all you and your people do. It certainly allows us to continue enjoying TV the way we have for the past six years - for relatively low cost.\r\n\r\nSincerely"\r\n
2017-04-16
"Great service, install and set up was flawless."
2017-04-06
"I am sooo happy with you!\r\n\r\nMy Tivo froze and I googled the problem, which eventually led me to you. I read your website, found my tivo model, found the hard drive and ordered it.\r\n\r\nIt got it pretty quickly, followed the very clearly explained instructions. Within just a very short period, it was fixed and like new.\r\n\r\nYou are doing a great job and what you do. You deserve kudos and I will not only be a return customer but I will sing your praises to my friends and family.\r\n\r\nAtta boys and girls...all around! Thank you!!"
2017-03-16
"Hello. I wanted to thank you for the information that you provided to me. I just got the power supply installed and it appears to have solved my problem. I do not believe there is any damage to the hard drive that I purchased from you either.\r\n\r\nI am so happy I wrote to you to get your advice. Your instructions for installation of the hard drive and the power supply were superb. I really love your company. Thanks again!"
2017-02-24
"I LOVE HAVING MY TIVO BACK!!! It works great! We took your suggestion and added the UPS. God bless,"\r\n
2017-02-02
"THANK YOU , THANK YOU , THANK YOU  .... You guys rock ... I received my TiVo hard drive today ... Installed in less than 5 minutes ... Working great now ... Will have to get used to the new format but that will be easy ... Thank you again as I didn\'t want to buy a new unit  being a retire on a fixed income ... It wad cheaper to repair than to replace ... I am happy ... "
2017-01-29
"Super fast shipping! Very easy to replace I feel anyone can do it. Thank you so much Weaknees!"
2017-01-29
"What a resource you are! My TIVO is perfect again after replacing the disk.\r\n\r\nYour service was terrific."
2016-12-22
"Received it last night and installed. U totally ROCK!!!!!! Quadrupled my \r\nstorage and retained existing programs (recorded over last 8 years) \r\nThanks so much for preserving all the concerts I recorded. Worth every \r\npenny. I have another unit in my living room and will probably request the \r\nsame treatment after the holidays.\r\n\r\nMerry Christmas You made mine.........Ken"
2016-12-19
"Got this order very quickly! Packed well. Just installed the new hard drive. Being somewhat OCD, I meticulously read and followed the instructions provided. I kept thinking, "well, the next step must be trickier or something.." .  Then I was done and thought, "really, that\'s it?"  It could not have been simpler. Very concise and complete instructions. Almost a no brainer!  Literally, anyone should be able to do this.  The hardest part was getting the lid off. (Ha). When done, I plugged it back in, followed the prompts, and waalaa. Back in business.Absolutely love your service. Thanks so much! \r\n"
2016-12-10
"I just wanted to let you know that I hooked up my TiVo that you refurbished and it works like a charm. Thank you and have a very Merry Christmas."
2016-12-08
"You guys are the BEST! Thanks to your "toothpick test" I knew I only needed to swap out the fan in my Premiere. The new part arrived in 3 days and, with your tools and instructions, it took about 5 minutes to do the job. Don\'t know why anyone would take their TiVo problems anywhere else! Thanks."
2016-11-30
"Thanks so much!  I purchased a replacement hard drive for my HD Tivo from you.  It arrived at my door the next day and I got it installed that night!  Your directions were super clear and easy to follow.  The images were clearly labelled with arrows pointing to each important piece.  I was back up and running within 20 minutes.  Thanks for the heads-up about contacting my cable company about the Cable Cards.  I did need to do that.  But now everything is working again.   \r\nThanks!"
2016-11-05
"We recently bought your 500 GB hard drive kit, to replace the failed drive in our HD Series 3. Installation and start-up could not have been easier. I particularly liked that upon powering up, the system booted directly to TIVO\'s guided setup. (I had anticipated having to use TIVO\'s kickstart utility, to force the system to recognize the new drive\'s pre-loaded software. Glad that wasn\'t necessary.) Finally, shipping USPS Priority was a nice touch. (I\'ts my wife\'s TIVO, and she wanted it back, now!) You deliver a great product and great and thoughtful service, and I just wanted to say Thanks."
2016-07-16
"I just got my Series 3 HD XL connected back up. That blinking green light is back to a steady on. It works just like the day I first bought it - again. If it weren\'t for TiVo\'s dumb policy of lifetime service being attached forever to the box for which it was first purchased, I would\'ve upgraded to a newer model. Since that wasn\'t an option, I\'m so glad you guys are there. You provide an excellent service! Thanks so much for the repair."
2016-06-17
"I just wanted to let you know I got my tivo back on Wednesday. Thanks so much for doing a great job fixing both tuners and leaving our recordings intact. It\'s up and working great. I will definitely use you guys again if I ever need to, you\'re the best for these older units."
2016-03-31
"Thank you! Thank you! Thank you!\r\n\r\nMy TiVo froze up on me a few nights ago. When I went to reboot it, it just got stuck on the welcome loading screen. Did some research, found out my series 2 has issues with the power supply, and chances are that\'s my problem. Bought a new one from you awesome folks, and in five minutes pulled the old one out, plopped in the new one, and boom! My TiVo withdrawals disappeared. Thanks so much for offering this service. Switching from my satellite to cable wasn\'t an option, and without your website, i would be without my TiVo and probably spend forever grabbing at my remote trying to skip commercials.\r\n\r\nThanks again!"
2016-03-18
"\r\n\r\nYou probably don\xe2\x80\x99t get kudos very often for support but they did a great job of diagnosing and recommending solutions for my external drive problems. They suspected that my drives were ok but he case/power supply failed. I order a new case/power supply and once I replaced it I had another problem. They quickly diagnosed that I needed to press the reset button to re-flash the system. That did the trick and minimal expense to me and without losing any programs.\r\n\r\nThanks for the help!"\r\n\r\n
2016-02-18
"I received the Tivo and it works great !!\r\nThank You for great service, fast repair time, low cost and fast shipping. I thought all was lost when I broke my Tivo 2000.\r\n\r\nI would / will advise other to use this company for the repair of there Tivos\'.\r\n\r\nTHANKS,"\r\n
2016-02-01
"I want to thank you very much for your business. First for the great communication all the time and your fast answers. Then for how quick the order was processed and returned the same day, I couldn\'t believe it.\r\n\r\nAnd then when the hard drives arrived so carefully packaged and every single detail. I wish every business in this world runs like yours, The Tivo now has a 6TB hard drive (960 hours) and the shows recorded from the original 320 GB Tivo Premiere,everything works out of the box. Thank you very much.\r\n\r\nI was looking to post my comments on your review website."\r\n
2016-01-13
"My order arrived yesterday, just one day after being processed with free ground shipping.  Great service!  Thanks.\r\nIt was as easy to install as you advertised - took about 15 minutes.  And it worked perfectly right out of the box!  I did have to call my cable provider for them to update the cable card.  Thanks for the warning in the instructions about that.\r\nI wish you continued success and a long business life. \r\n\r\nThanks."
2016-01-08
"I received the hard drive for my TiVo RS-TX20 on Wednesday and installed it today. While I am very comfortable with computers and have taught teachers & other adults how to use computers and software programs for over 30 years, I have never swapped out a hard drive. I have written training manuals for years, & I compliment you on the excellent instructions you sent with the hard drive. They were so easy to follow, & I am delighted that my old Toshiba with dvr & DVD is up & humming. Even though it\'s 12 + years old, I am quite attached to it. I\'m of the generation that likes things to last!\r\nBest wishes for a successful new year."\r\n
2015-12-18
"\r\n\r\nYou sent me exactly what I needed and I set it up no problem! You guys ROCK! Let me know where I can leave positive feedback. Online site or Facebook?\r\n\r\nI love TIVO and WEAKKNEES!"
2015-12-15
"\r\n"Hi folks!\r\n\r\nI just want to say what a great experience I had with ordering and updating my Tivo. Everything was amazingly quick, clear and easy.\r\n\r\nThank you so much for a great product and great service."
2015-12-08
"You guys are fantastic!! Your site provides great troubleshooting tips, excellent instructions on how to remove and replace parts. I had a TiVo Series 4 that was malfunctioning, only fan would come on. Followed your troubleshooting steps to diagnosis problem as power supply. Took a chance and ordered a P/S from you guys. P/S arrived within two days. Popped new P/S in following your easy to follow instructions and 5 minutes later, my TiVo was as good as new. I only wished you guys either repaired or recycled the old P/S boards. I think the problem on my old one is transformer is bad. I have 5 TiVos with Lifetime service, so I will definitely be using your site to keep this machines operating for many years to come."
2015-06-20
"YOU FOLKS ARE THE BEST!!!!\r\n\r\nI ordered a replacement drive for a tivo that is over 12 years old and within 24 hours, i\'m back in business...\r\n\r\nIts great that you include absolutely everything needed to successfully replace the drive..\r\n\r\nThank you SOOOO much!\r\n\r\nThe Goldman Household\r\n"
2015-06-15
"I\'m really happy first with the way your site is designed which made it very clear which remote(s) were compatible with my TiVo. I opted for a less expensive one that didn\'t have the lighted keys. Also I was impressed at how fast you got it out the door. Also the how-to instructions you included allowed me to configure the remote for my A/V receiver in a couple of minutes.\r\nVery happy customer! Best wishes for your continued success, you deserve it!"
2015-05-18
"When the recordings on our Tivo started freezing, we dreaded having to replace it and lose our lifetime service. After doing some research, I came across the weaKnees website. Upon consulting with a weaKnees rep., we decided to order a new hard drive. It was amazingly simple to install; instructions were clear and even included two Torx wrenches necessary to make the swap. We are now enjoying viewing our favorite programs with no freezing, plus more recording space to boot. Thank you, weaKnees."
2015-05-11
"I just wanted to drop you a line, now that I\'ve finally started up my newly refurbished TiVo with 2tb of storage - wow!\r\n\r\nI was a little worried it wouldn\'t work here in NZ because I\'d seen something on your forums about you have to connect to DirectTV services to get channels, but in fact it works perfectly. I had bought a TiVo expander drive from Amazon in the past, and hooked it up and my TiVo wouldn\'t recognise it. Fortunately it has eSata and USB connections so can be used as an ordinary external hard drive. This was the only expander drive I could find in NZ, TiVo.co.nz and TiVo.com.au stopped selling them several years back, poor uptake of TiVo around here I think.\r\n\r\nI bought a spare secondhand TiVo so I could upgrade one while keeping the other going. Turns out this was a great idea, now I have the two running together, and I programmed the DVR switch on the remote so it only operates one at a time. This means I can now continue watching the stored programmes remaining on my old drive, and I have the aerial connected to the new TiVo to record any new programmes. This setup is working brilliantly."
2015-04-03
"Just a quick thanks for the wonderful service, and getting the orders out the day they came in. Turns out it was both the power board and the hard drive. Tried them in various combinations and with both new ones in, it is now working as it should, although losing a bunch of recorded stuff from the old hard drive. \r\n\r\nAgain my thanks"\r\n\r\n\r\n
2015-03-13
"I have used Weaknees many times to order DVRs, drives etc and been fully satisfied with your products and helpful instructions.\r\n\r\nWhen my phone line was updated to a digital line (U-verse) the installer from AT&T; told me that my Tivo DVRs would communicate with no problem. He was wrong. My newer unit was "no problem" since I could use the Internet to communicate but my 2 older Hughes DVRs could not dial out and they had no other connect-ability.\r\n\r\nI purchased an external modem from Weaknees that plugs into the serial port and changed the prefix in "setup" per your instructions. Now I\'m good to go. Five minutes, plug and play.\r\n\r\nThanks for the help...again..."\r\n
2015-03-08
"I received the 500GB upgrade kit for my series 3 Tivo. The entire experience with weakNees was seamless. The product was shipped, packed well and was delivered quickly. The instructions are very good and I was able to do the entire installation in about 20 minutes. I would definitely recommend this upgrade to anyone that is comfortable working with elementary electronic equipment. If not, send it in for an upgrade."
2015-02-03
"Thank you for your help, and for an overall excellent experience.  I ordered the upgrade disk and it arrived 2 days later, installed easily and brought my Tivo back to life!  You guys are awesome."\r\n
2014-12-25
"When my Tivo Series 4 hard-drive crashed, I knew it was just a matter of replacement.  I read all the articles about downloading tools, creating system images and creating a Tivo-compatible drive.  I also read reviews that suggested Weaknees was overpriced.  But my time is valuable, and I\'m not inclined to waste it figuring out a technical challenge.  So I ordered from your website on a Friday, paid a fair price, received the replacement drive on Monday (with standard/free shipping) and took 20 whole minutes to install it.  I was back up and running after doing the initial Tivo startup, and everything is working fantastically.  I\'m sure I could have saved a couple of bucks by futzing around, but as I said, my time is worth a lot, and I think your price was a BARGAIN!  No complaints, and I\'d recommend Weaknees to anyone!"
2014-11-06
"I\'ve got my HDD shipment, it installed easily and my TIVO works again, perfectly.  Thanks for your service."
2014-11-03
"I was so happy that I found you guys and your hard drive upgrade kit. I had a life time subscription and love my Tivo. I did not want to face the time that I would lose it and my Tivo. Thanks to you guys and your great and helpful team I still have my Tivo. I first changed the hard drive and the ribbon wasn\'t making a good contact so I went back and redid again and pluged it in and it works like a charm. Thanks weaknees but I don\'t have weaknees any more."
2014-10-27
"I received my TiVo Premiere HD Series4 replacement hard disk on Friday.  I replaced the 320GB disk with a 1 TB hard disk on Saturday.  The installation was simple, it took less than 1/2 hour.  I have tripled my recording space with minimal hassle.  Thanks for your great service."
2014-10-19
"Just a short note to thank you. My Tivo drive went out after 10 years of hard work and I ordered an upgrade on 10/15/14. Received it in the mail on 10/18/14. Took about 20 minutes to install the hardware. After Tivo did it\'s magic, we\'re back up and running and enjoying it! Thanks so much!"
2014-10-06
"THANK YOU for offering this.  \r\n\r\n\r\nMy Series 3 with the external DVR Expander had started experiencing problems, after replacing cables twice I couldn\'t confirm what was failing first (the cable or the drive), and the cost of replacing the external drive approached the cost of a new unit.  \r\n\r\n\r\nI had bought a Roamio Plus from Best Buy (the "Plus" because I need the additional storage space, the component connections, and streaming features would be nice to have too).  Then I found out the Roamio Plus doesn\'t have support for a digital antenna.  I could buy a Rovio and a DVR Expander, but after reformatting the DVR Expander a third time in less than a month, I just don\'t trust the DVR Expander.\r\n\r\n\r\nSo I was in a quandary about what to do.  Then Google gave me a weaKnees option, and I found I could get a Roamio, with the bigger hard drive I wanted, brand new, for about the same cost as a Roamio Plus.  Doesn\'t have the component outputs I wanted but I can work around that.\r\n\r\n\r\nAgain, thank you!"
2014-09-17
"Just wanted to say thanks for a quick turnaround on my DirecTV DVR HR24 upgrade. The unit is working flawlessly, of course, and I had it back in my possession in just a few days. Thanks!!"
2014-08-17
"Guys - thanks!  Tivo was stuttering and was no longer watchable - very frustrating .. was ready to get rid of it but the lifetime service can\'t transfer to a new unit as you know, so that really made me hesitate (even with the good specs on the new units). Ordered my hard drive, popped it into the tivo with your instructions and our beloved tivo is 100% again - family is happy again recording our favorites!! Took all of 15 mins. Was great! Thanks!!"
2014-08-14
"Received Hard drive today, installed and watching Tivo again.Did not expect \r\nit in two days.\r\n\r\nEXCELLENT SERVICE\r\n\r\nThank You"
2014-08-02
"I wish to thank you guys for the very prompt replies to any questions I have had. I received my 2tb upgrade within five working days and had no problem installing it myself. The longest part of the install was reading the instructions. I only have a basic electronic knowledge and found it very easy. I have family and friends who have TiVo here in Australia so will putting on to you. Thanks once again."
2014-06-29
"I received my TiVo upgrade/repair kit in good shape. The instructions\r\nwere voluminous and clear. Even though I am a software guy, I was able\r\nto replace the hardware."
2014-05-31
"Thanks for the great service and the new replacement drive arrived within a few days. It only took 15 minutes to remove the bad drive and replace it with the new drive! Several minutes later for some programming and we were back in business. This was definately the way to go. :)"
2014-05-21
"Good evening,\r\nThis is a complaint letter.\r\nYour service was despicably outstanding.\r\nNot only was your site easy to navigate/price & order but the Tivo upgrade arrived very quickly here in Crestmead Queensland Australia.\r\nIt was easy to instal and powered up perfectly.\r\nOUTSTANDING.\r\nI now have a very happy wife (she loves her Tivo) \r\nThank you team , a very happy Australian customer."
2014-04-08
"Hi, I wish to pass on my thanks to your company for your prompt service and delivery to Australia. I have installed my upgrade 2tb drive and new fan and all works fine."
2014-03-26
"I just wanted to thank everything over there for the great service I received concerning my repair.  If there\'s anything I can do to let other people know, let me know!"
2014-03-08
"After spinning for well over 10 years our original Lifetime TiVo Series2 hard drive gave us that endless "PoweringUp"/Green Screen of Death.\r\n\r\nOrdered your TiVo 24008A 500gb Upgrade Kit, received it two days later and after 30 minutes was up and running again!\r\n\r\nNicely packed, good instructions and torque wrenches - what\'s not to like?\r\n\r\nIf you can set up your TiVo, you likely will have no problem replacing the hard drive . . ."
2014-02-18
"Just wanted to say thanks for the quick delivery of my new TiVo HD hard drive! I installed it this past weekend and now I no longer have to worry about recording 3 or 4 movies without losing other programs I\'ve already recorded! Your service is awesome!"
2014-02-08
"Thanks guys.. My series 3 was rebooting constantly when I replaced my cablecards.. New power supply and I\'m back in business.. Very easy to swap in the new one.. Thanks for being in business to save my lifetime subscription. "
2014-02-03
"Dear Weaknees,\r\n\r\n\r\nI\'m just writing to let you know that, thanks to your excellent Tivo upgrade package and clear and accurate instructions, this upgrade went up without a hitch. We now have more recording capacity than we can possibly watch.  J\r\n\r\nThe upgrade package was perfect, including all necessary tools, cable, adapter, and excellent instructions with photographs. The instructions even warned me that I might lose local channels for a while, which I did, and what to do if they didn\'t return.\r\n\r\nGreat job, Weaknees."\r\n
2014-01-31
"Can\'t thank you guys enough! Ordered a new hard drive for my series 3 as a last hope of resurrecting it and it worked great! Couldn\'t have been easier to install and configure. I\'ll recommend you to everyone I know!"
2013-12-15
"Just wanted to say thanks! Ordered a replacement fan for my TiVo Premiere and your instructions made installation a snap! Best $20 I\'ve spent in a while!"
2013-12-08
"My Tivo Series 3 HD lost its hard drive last Saturday (a 160 GB drive). \r\nAfter a bit of testing (pulled the drive and popped it into my PC), I went \r\nand ordered a replacement (2 TB) late Saturday evening. The drive was \r\nhere Tuesday evening, and I had the box back in service in less than 45 \r\nminutes (mostly because I had misplaced the bloody USB wireless ethernet \r\nunit).\r\n\r\nThanks for a fantastic product and service - you guys rock."
2013-12-07
"I just received and installed a Tivo Series 3 HD Upgrade Kit and it has brought my Tivo back to life, just in time for the Pac 12 Championship game! Your website helped me understand that is was a failing hard drive causing the problem and the new HD was very easy to install -- thanks to your thorough instructions and the included tools. Thank you everyone at WeaKnees.\r\n\r\nBest regards"\r\n
2013-12-02
"To the WeaKnees Team,\r\n\r\nThank you for taking the time to replace DVD burner on RA 901312.\r\nThis device is the primary entertainment source for my sister, it is like her baby.\r\nNow, with the additional memory this Humax will provide years of joy.\r\nThis is the second Humax I have sent in for repairs, and I will continue to promote your services in the future.\r\n\r\nA Very satisfied customer"
2013-11-05
"Dear Weaknees,\r\nI received my DVR yesterday and hooked it up and it works as good as new. \r\nThank you so much, as I have lifetime service and my DVR has a new life\r\nI also want to thank you for the extremely quick turn around. I am 100% satisfied with your service.\r\nThis was my first of three Tivos, purchased since 2005. I\'m so glad that I didn\'t opt for month to month service.\r\nAbsolutely best regards," 
2013-11-05
"Dear Weaknees,\r\nI received my DVR yesterday and hooked it up and it works as good as new.\r\nThank you so much, as I have lifetime service and my DVR has a new life\r\nI also want to thank you for the extremely quick turn around. I am 100% satisfied with your service.\r\nThis was my first of three Tivos, purchased since 2005. I\'m so glad that I didn\'t opt for month to month service.\r\nAbsolutely best regards, Gilbert Tanner"
2013-10-02
"First I want to say that I suck and putting things together. I always seem to wonder what "this part" that was left out is after I\'ve completed the task. I was reluctant to order the replacement hard drive for my series 2 DT because I would have to replace it. It took me 20 minutes. Probably would have been sooner, but I have so little faith in myself, I couldn\'t believe I understood the instructions. Right away. Thank you. \r\n"
2013-10-02
"All I can say is Wow! I ordered this Sunday, had it Wednesday and 30 minutes later I had my TIVO up and running. I had the never ending "Powering Up" screen of death and a dead hard drive. Great instructions, tools and packaging. I am very impressed with your service. Keep up the great job. "
2013-09-04
"Many Thanks,\r\nHard drive arrived promptly, now installed and TiVo working perfectly.\r\nGreat service, will recommend to friends.\r\nCheers"\r\nJoe Capicchiano.\r\nAustralia.
2013-08-23
"Got the disk Wednesday night and installed it. TiVo is alive again. Thanks so much!!!"
2013-08-20
"You certainly provide amazing service!  We exchanged three emails Friday morning and I placed a HD order around noon. I received shipping information Friday afternoon and Monday after noon it arrived. By 4 PM it was installed and starting setup. Incredible service! Many thanks."
2013-07-20
"We rec\'d our new hard drive today and it\'s in and working 100%. Thank you SO much for the speedy delivery and your help! Tivo wasn\'t any help but you guys were! Thanks again"
2013-06-26
"Thank you for the great service on my order for a Tivo upgrade kit. You sent it the next day after my order and I received from Canada Post a week later. The product was everything I had hoped for and I now have my Tivo running better than ever. Thanks again."
2013-06-21
"My new upgraded hard drive was waiting for me when I returned from traveling, just as promised. The directions were very good and easy to follow (pictures are a big asset). I am a bit OCD about following them, so it probably took me longer than most to do the install. Then I had a problem with the phone line (definitely not your problem). Once that was taken care of, set up was a breeze. I am so relieved to have my TiVo back. We have had this TiVo for many years. It has lifetime service and I am SO relieved it is operational again and all for the cost of a hard drive! I will recommend you to anyone who asks! Thank you so much, you made my week!"
2013-06-17
"Hi. Just wanted to say thank you. Hard drive arrived today. Installed just as directions said. Almost done with TIVO setup. This is a much better (and cheaper) alternative to buying a new TIVO when my last hard drive got stuck at the reboot loop. Loosing the shows recorded on the old hard drive is a small price to pay. Check me off as another very satisfied customer."
2013-06-09
"A huge sigh of relief!!!\r\n\r\nHard drive arrived on Wednesday, I replaced my Tivo\'d failing drive \r\nWednesday night and it\'s been working flawlessly since.\r\n\r\nThanks!!!\r\n\r\nTelly"
2013-03-17
"Hello,I just want to tell you that my Tivo arrived safely,it is reinstalled and it works great,thank you very much for fixing it so fast,I just couldn\'t handle the Charter DVR.\r\nI also took your advice and hooked up the battery backup.\r\nAgain, thank you very much for your help, Christel."
2013-03-12
"WOW! WOW! WOW! Thank you so much for saving me 600.00+ by helping me figure out the problem with my Tivo. Purchased a new hard drive, followed your instructions, Presto!! my Tivo is better than new. Instructions where easy to follow, explained well, even to a non-tech person like myself. Shipping was also fast. Thank you, Thank you, Thank You!!!!"
2013-03-07
"Awesome experience. Called in to make an order....What can I say, perfect! Stunning performance (in the best way possible)! Thanks,"\r\n\r\n
2012-12-14
"[T]he only way easier would be if you came to my house and did it yourself.\r\nworked great. I ordered the replacement on\r\nThursday and it arrived Friday and it is up and running Friday evening THANK YOU!!!"
2012-12-01
"So glad I found you guys...my Replay TV lives on with the new hard drive! Fast shipping, great selection, couldn\'t ask for more! Please post this to your testimonials and have a cold holiday drink on me!\r\n\r\nThanks,\r\nTBone\r\nClarks Green, PA"
2012-11-19
"The HD in my HD Tivo was acting up so I ordered a replacement/upgrade. Installation was truly idiot proof and I was pleased that TIVO had more or less designed the unit with HD replacement in mind.\r\n\r\nYou might tell folks that after HD replacement "Cablecards are not recognized and in my case I had to contact Time Warner by phone to get the job done. TW was very helpful after it took me 45 minutes and three tries to get to the right person. Rehearse getting to the Cablecard info page on setup before you call."
2012-11-13
"I just want to convey my appreciation for the wealth of information and service provided by WeaKnees. My 7 year old Tivo would not get past the start up screen and I thought it might finally be time to put it out to pasture. After reading the troubleshooting information and running some tests on the Tivo I decided to try replacing the hard drive with a WeaKnees unit. Success! A few days later I had a Tivo that was better than new for just $99. Well worth it. Thanks WeakKnees, your guys rock!"
2012-10-27
"You guys are the best! I\'ve already received my TIVO back, and have it hooked up! It works like a charm!\r\nI will recommend you to anyone I know that has a TIVO!\r\n\r\nThank you! Thank you! Thank you!"
2012-10-15
"I ordered the 80GB upgrade for my semi-antiquated Panasonic Replay TV unit. The order was received promptly, the instructions you sent were explicit (most 7th graders could change the drive out), and my old skool replay unit is working like a charm again.\r\n\r\nThanks,"
2012-09-02
"I just installed your 80gb HD replacement on my Philips TiVo Series 1. The instructions were completely clear in describing the remove and replace. Everything worked as advertised on the first attempt. That is not normal for me. We were up and running very quickly. Shipping was prompt. Website was very instructive. Thanks for your great service!"
2012-07-27
"[Hard drive kit a]rrived, installed, simple, problem solved!\r\n\r\nYou guys are great!"\r\n\r\n
2012-06-26
"I just wanted to thank you for saving my Tivo. After just a minute on the phone with one of your customer service people he realized I had a bad power supply and did not need a replacement hard drive or new Tivo like I feared. I ordered it Friday and it arrived in Chicago on Monday. It took me under 10 minutes to install and works perfectly- I didn\'t lose a single program on my Tivo. More companies need to run like yours!"
2012-06-05
"Replacement drive instructions were absolutely perfect! I installed the new drive without difficulty.\r\nThank you!"
2012-05-23
"Hello,\r\n \r\nI am immensely surprised when I received the replacement hard drive for the wife\'s Humax 700 TiVo.  I ordered it Friday and it was here Monday.  Put it in , set it up and the wife was watching TiVo the same evening.  This is was service should be !   I am really grateful.\r\n \r\nBest Regards,"
2012-05-23
"I cannot tell you how pleased I am with your service! I expected my machine to be gone 4-6 weeks but the day you received it from me it was repaired and sent back to me...on the same day. I\'m very thankful to Tivo for recommending your company to me. I\'ve had my machine for 7 years on the lifetime time and thanks to you my plan is still intact. I highly recommend weaknees to everyone!"
2012-05-23
"Thanks for the new hardrive, the encouragement that I could replace it myself, 2 tools that I needed to do the work and the fact that my TIVO works again!!!!!!!!!!!!!Thank you, thank you, thank you!!!!!"
2012-04-28
"I promptly received an order that I placed and just wanted to say that everything about your WeaKnees including , web presentation, service, delivery, packaging, instruction demonstrated attention to detail and thorough planning.\r\n\r\nAs a service business owner, over 37 years, it has been our goal to deliver excellence above price. WeaKnees ,you have accomplished that in all respects. Aside from being inspiring in an age where incompetence is abundant , it is uplifting.\r\n\r\nI would highly recommend WeaKnees to the world.\r\n"
2012-03-30
"Finally got around to installing the HD upgrade kit (and replacement fan) today.  I ordered it because I was having a software (?) problem with my out of warranty TiVo after a power failure in conjunction with an external drive problem.  Anyway, I took it slow and in about 30 minutes I had the unit back in operation and started guided setup.  Everything went very smoothly and the cable card previously installed in the TiVo came up running with no contact required with the cable company (Knology-Auburn, AL).  Very pleased and my recording time went up to about 1300 hours SD and 180 hours HD.  My compliments to all at WeaKness and feel free to use this recomendation. "
2012-03-19
"I just wanted to express my gratitude on the service. I had a Tivo HD (Series 3) that has been showing green screen for months - and the cost that Tivo wanted to fix was outrageous (including a $250 transfer of Lifetime service)!\r\n\r\nAfter asking and getting a response from your team, I ordered a replacement and popped it in and it was good as new (actually better - much bigger drive).\r\n\r\nI just wanted to say thanks and I am very happy to have found you guys. Will be keeping reference for future issues for sure."
2012-03-19
"Thank you so much for your help!!  We received our package today and I was able to remove the old power source and install the new one without any difficulty!! J  Tivo powered up right away and we are back in business!  I was amazed at how much dust was in our Tivo box and thoroughly cleaned it out.  Works like new.  I will refer you all to everyone!!\r\nAll the best!"
2012-02-18
"I Received the new hard drive and all I have to say is wow ! It fired right up Perfectly and is much Quicker than the old hard drive ever was ! Your instructions were perfect and the hard drive adapter was very easy to install. My Wife is a very happy camper !\r\nI will have no trouble recommending you to anyone. If you need I florida contact , don\'t be afraid to let me know. Thanks for being so professional and courteous from phone support to email support."
2012-02-01
"I received the drive on schedule and it went it no worries.  Works great.  The torx wrenches were an appreciated touch and instructions were excellent.  Exceeded expectations.  You guys rock.\r\n\r\nUse me as a testimonial any time.\r\n\r\nThanks From Valparaiso, suburban Eglin AFB, Northwest Florida (KVPS)"
2012-01-16
"Just a note to verify how easy your kit made replacement of my Tivo drive. I have a series 2 with lifetime service - a few days ago, it began to miss updates. When I called Tivo, they diagnosed the issue as a failure of the device to communicate and download updates. However, I do have a 2nd Tivo, and it did not have the same problem. A quick Google search brought me to Weakness Forum, and there I quickly determined that the issue was a hard drive failure after following instructions to test the drive.\r\n\r\nI ordered a replacement and followed the included (very clear!) instructions. In 15 minutes, the Tivo was back online. After the program updates, the unit works flawlessly. And a great side benefit, the Tivo system information now shows that I can store up to 395 hours rather than the 40 hours maxiumum before the Weakness replacement.\r\n\r\nIn summary, this simple fix preserved my lifetime service and increased my recording capacity by nearly 10X. The pictures imbedded in the instructions were very clear and easy to follow - and included all the tools needed for the replacement. No need to hack the Tivo to format and replace a broken drive - it came ready-to-go out of the box. Great way to improve my investment!"
2012-01-05
"Just a quick note to say thank you.  I ordered two of your upgrade kits and installation was a breeze.  Your instructions were spot on as was your troubleshooting advice."
2012-01-04
"I received the replacement power supply today for my series 3 HD TiVo.   Popped it in and all my problems seem to be gone.  The old power supply is on its way back to you.  Once again than you for helping me keep my various TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s alive over these ten or so years."
2011-12-28
"Just wanted to let you know the replacement drive I bought from you went in PERFECTLY! The instructions were easy to understand and everything went off without a hitch. Looks to be working great and all I had to do was call DirecTV to get my local channels, which i figured I\'d have to do since it was mentioned on the instructions so that was expected. Thanks for your product and service! I will be telling everyone about Weaknees!"
2011-12-06
"I was able to put in my new drive before my coffee got cold. I am 68 and not a technical person but the instructions were very clear.\r\nThanks!"
2011-12-03
"I ended up just buying the replacement hard drive. It arrived today, I installed it in about 10-15 minutes, and now all works as expected. Thank you Weaknees. - duano!"
2011-12-02
"I just wanted to thank you so much! My TIVO was on but had no picture or lights! Fan and Hard Drive were still running. I read your troubleshooting and I thought no way would it be the power supply. Why would it be the power supply if the Hard Drive is still running? Well I was out of options so I figured I would give it a shot! Yep it worked! \r\nMy TIVO is lifetime and you saved it! :) \r\nSuper Fast Shipping too!\r\nThank you!"
2011-11-10
I want to think someone in your repair dept for helping me get my TIVO back up and working properly again. I am sorry I do not remember his name but he was very patient and helpful to a 77 yr old man who is not too savvy sometime. Thanks again. Today is USMC birthday. Semper Fi.
2011-11-09
"I want to thank you for your excellent troubleshooting guidance. I learned about burst capacitors. I ordered a new power supply for my TivoHD. It was shipped and received promptly. It was easy to follow the repair instructions. My TivoHD is running as expected and the family is happy."
2011-11-02
"Thank you, thank you, thank you! I thought my Tivo was done for and you walked me through exactly what I would need! The external modem I ordered came VERY quickly and was so simple to set up thanks to yuor directions. My Tivo is now working perfect and I am one happy and satisfied customer!"
2011-11-01
"Thank you, thank you, thank you! I thought my Tivo was done for and you walked me through exactly what I would need! The external modem I ordered cam e VERY quickly and was so simple to set up thanks to yuor directions. My Tivo is now working perfect and I am one happy and satisfied customer!"
2011-10-21
"I recently ordered a replacement drive for my TiVo. TiVo offered a replacement unit for $150 but required I renew my lifetime service for several hundred more. Instead I got a replacement hard drive from you, complete with instructions and tools. Now my TiVo is better than new with much more memory. Thanks for helping me keep my lifetime service on my older unit.\r\n"
2011-10-10
"Just received the new Power Supply you sent for my HD Tivo. It was VERY easy to install taking about 10 minutes. The power now stays on and the Tivo is working perfectly again. Thanks for the troubleshooting info on your website...including the easy to follow do-it-yourself repair instructions. "
2011-09-30
"I ordered a replacement drive for my tivo from you folks. It was so easy to install because of your detail sent along with the unit. You made my day. Thinking I needed to pay for a new Tivo, you guys helped me save a ton of money. Thank you. It is people like you that make this world fun. Thanks again."
2011-09-25
"My Tivo hard drive in my Toshiba RS-TX60 stopped working recently. After finding your website and doing some research I decided to buy a replacement hard drive. I was a bit anxious about installing it myself but thought I\'d give it a try. To my pleasant surprise replacing the drive was a snap! Your instructions were easy to understand and made the procedure effortless. Thank you WeaKnees for providing such great service and support for older machines like my Toshiba. It is nice to know you are out there if I ever need parts or service again. \r\n"
2011-09-13
"Just received the new Power Supply you sent. Excellent. took all of 8 min. to install, connected all cables and pluged the unit in. works like a champ. Started recording the programs as before. Thanks you guys are great!!!"
2011-09-12
"Drive arrived and installed with the utmost of ease.  My trusty lifetime TIVO is again alive and operating perfectly.  All TIVO clients with problems\xe2\x80\xa6use these guys!\r\n \r\nThanks for an excellent service. \r\n \r\nKindest regards ......Louis\r\n"
2011-08-18
"Last year I purchased a 160gb disk drive and my 7 yr old Tivo ran for 10 months. Recently it began freezing up and I had to wait several hours to reboot. It would only stay up for about 6 hours. I ordered and just replaced the power supply. It was a little difficult to get the old power supply off of those nylon stand offs. But after replacing the power supply, it is working again.\r\nThank You for providing reliable parts and Good Service. My Tivo is running A-OK now and I can use my iPhone Directv app again to review and schedule programs. I am looking forward to Directv coming out with the new Directv TIVO HDTV. They have been slipping the date on that for over a year."
2011-08-17
"Dear WeaKnees, I unboxed my repaired TiVo this evening, connected her up, and she\'s working perfectly. I was delighted to discover that the new hard drive you installed is ABSOLUTELY SILENT. It is a huge improvement over the noisy HDD I have been listening to for the last 4 and a half years. This is not a slam on TiVo; I bought my unit pre-upgraded with a larger drive. But boy, you could hear that thing clunking two rooms away. This (almost) makes up for the loss of the programs that had been recorded on the drive that failed!\r\n\r\nI also appreciated your speedy emailed responses to my questions during the repair process. I hope I won\'t be needing your services any time soon, but you can be sure that if my Series 3 breaks again I will be calling you first.\r\n\r\nThank you,"
2011-08-11
"I ordered an upgrade to replace a crashed disk, and I received it today, days sooner than I expected it. The instructions were clear and easy to follow, and I had the TiVo back in service within 30 minutes. Thanks very much."
2011-08-11
"My beloved 7-year-old lifetime-serviced Tivo\'s hard drive was failing. A friend recommended your site. I couldn\'t be more pleased. Your instructions were simple to understand and easy to execute. He\'s back up and running, and bigger and better than ever. Thank you, THANK YOU!\r\n"
2011-08-09
"That was just freaking awesome!!! I thought my Tivo 2/Toshiba hard drive died a few years ago when I ordered my new hard drive. For whatever reason, it pulled through by the time the hard drive arrived and I never bothered to replace it. Well, it acted up again - this time, it wouldn't pull through. Popped open the box and found super exact instructions along with tools. I needed nothing else to install this hard drive. I powered the unit back up, went through setup and it is back up and running with almost 3X the amount of space as the old drive. How awesome is THAT! \r\n\r\nGood job! Nay! FANTASTIC JOB!!! \r\n\r\nI hope I'm not a repeat customer, but won't hesitate when the time comes again.\r\n\r\nThank you!\r\n"
2011-08-09
"Thank you for your help in isolating the problem with my tivo unit. I was hesitant about whether it was the power supply and which one would be the right one I needed. Your diagnosis was right on. I am happy to inform you I am up and running and a real hero to my family. No need to reply just wanted to let you know you I will highly recommend your company to all my family and friends.\r\n"
2011-07-25
"Dear Weaknees People;\r\n\r\nI wanted to write to you to say how happy my family is with the quality of your service. My father\'s 10+ year old TiVo recently "died", and you received it on a Friday afternoon. It was returned to us 3 days later, and we\'re pleased to report that the unit is working like new again. This is by far the fastest turn-around for an electronic repair that we\'ve ever seen, and I will gladly recommend your company to others who own TiVos.\r\n\r\nThanks for such a fantastic repair job!"
2011-06-28
"Hello,\r\nI just wanted to say thank you!  I thought my Tivo was dead and really didn\'t want to pay for another lifetime subscription.  I was able to diagnose the problem, order the replacement part and get directions on how to repair my Tivo from your website.  It took less than 5 minutes to replace the part and my Tivo is back up and running!  Thank you so much! I\'ve told everyone I know who has Tivo about your company!\r\nSincerely,\r\nMaryjo "
2011-06-20
"Dear WeaKnees, I just wanted to let you know that I installed the RS-TX60 TIVO upgrade kit with no problems, thanks to your well written instructions. It is so nice to read well written instructions for a change. My compliments to your people responsible for them. It was a pleasure doing business with you and thank you for the information I received over the phone. I look forward to future business.\r\nThank you"
2011-06-14
"Thank you for prompt resolution of my Tivo\xe2\x80\x99s issues & the timely return of my recorder. The recorder is in very good working condition."
2011-06-12
"It had been about a year since my 5yr old TiVO w/ lifetime TiVO service began freezing before it froze up for good and sat there unused since gathering dust. I had just finally gotten around to pulling it from the cabinet under the TV and was all set to throw it away as I was under the assumption it couldn\'t be repaired and keep the lifetime plan it came with intact but thankfully before I did I gave it a google and wound up on the WeaKnees website. Fast forward a few days, I\'m sitting here in amazement at how easy it was to get it going again good as new. The upgrade kit included the HDD, all tools needed & idiot-proof step-by-step instructions w/ pictures. It took less than 15 minutes before I had it hooked back up to the TV & was navigating TiVO\'s guided setup once again just like when it was new just out of the box. Sweeeeeeeet! I will forever love WeaKnees for ressurecting my TiVO!"
2011-05-26
"My beloved 6- or 7-year-old TiVo 2 started having the picture drop out and freezing last week and I was cussing Verizon FiOS until I connected the TV directly to the cable box....then I knew it was the TiVo. Googled "TiVo problems" and the 3rd listing was your "TiVo Repair and Troubleshooting Guide". Since it looked like my hard drive was a goner, I was thrilled to see I could replace it and keep the lifetime service we paid $249 for years ago. Got it within days and, since my husband was taking too long getting it installed, I decided to do it. Took me about an hour, which most of the time I spent unscrewing the lid...with the small side of the tool...but when I discovered I could use the other end, it went much faster! :-) The directions (which I was afraid hubby wouldn\'t even look at!) were absolutely spot on! Had it up and running first time...and I\'m a girl!! Can\'t thank you enough for tripling my storage space and making it so easy to do at a great price! Have already bragged on you on Facebook! Keep up the great work...I have bookmarked our page and I\'ll be back with any other needs!"
2011-05-24
"The old drive didn\'t work. We bought and replaced the drive with the \r\none from weaknees, and it worked great and we LOVE the extra storage \r\ncapacity.\r\n"
2011-05-13
"Hello -\r\n\r\nI just purchased a replacement drive from you for my older TiVo and want to let you know it arrived in good shape, was not difficult to install and works just great.  I really appreciate being able to keep my old TiVo going.  \r\n\r\nI\'d like a more advanced TiVo with an output at a higher level than just "S" but I don\'t want to give up the two tuner Directv receiver in it."\r\n
2011-05-04
"Dear Weaknees,\r\n\r\nJust wanted to let you know that you saved the day or should I say you saved my TiVo.\r\n\r\nLast week my 5 1/2 year old TiVo started running hot. After some research, I was 99.9% sure the fan had died. Luckily, I had found out about Weaknees a few years ago and I knew you would have exactly what I needed. I ordered a new fan and received it today as promised. I put in the fan and now my beloved TiVo is working perfectly again.\r\n\r\nI have a Humax DRT-400 and I have absolutely no desire to buy a newer model. This TiVo is perfect for me and suits all of my needs. I might be mistaken but I have not seen any of the newer TiVos with a DVD player or the ability to save programs to DVD. \r\n\r\nMy TiVo has sentimental value to me because it was one of the last gifts my Dad gave to me before he passed away. I know eventually the day will come when I will have to replace my TiVo but thanks Weaknees I get to keep my old friend a little while longer and for that I am truly grateful to you.\r\n\r\nSincerely,\r\n\r\nChristine Petruzzelli\r\nExtremely Satisfied Customer"
2011-04-23
"The modem in my series 1 TIVO failed. I emailed WeaKnees several times for help and each time I got a prompt response, not in days, but in hours, even one on a Saturday afternoon. That\'s unheard of these days. I sent in my TIVO for the flat fee repair. The website said they would fix it in 3 days, and 2 days after it got there, I got an email saying it was fixed and on its way back to me. It now works perfectly. This is by far the best service I have ever gotten from any on-line company. Wow!"
2011-03-16
"I should have done this a long time ago!.. Fast service, works perfectly, awesome upgrade! I will be sending my apple tv to be upgraded, and PS3 you guys rock!"
2011-03-12
"Just a quick thank you for delivering on everything, as advertised. Merchandise arrived in two days, (CA to NH) everything was exactly what I expected, and worked perfectly! What more could you ask for? \r\n"
2011-03-03
"Thanks! I ordered the power supply on your recommendation (after Tivo said the machine was dead) and was able to easily install it and now everything is working fine again. No loss of my recorded shows, no loss of my lifetime subscription, no need to pay for another unit - very much appreciated!"
2011-02-26
"Want to thank you for your excellent service on my recent Tivo upgrade. The installation instructions are excellent and I had the "old Tivo" up and running, including setup, in one hour. I highly recommend WeakKnees......."
2011-02-21
" I just upgraded my TIVO hd with your 1tb HD.  The instructions were great, and the upgrade came off without a hitch.\r\n    I\xe2\x80\x99d recommend your service to anyone. I have 2 more TIVO\xe2\x80\x99s and will probably upgrade when funds are available."
2011-02-19
"I wanted to let you know how pleased I was with your service. I\'m happy that I can keep my life time TIVO service and have it working smoothly again! The receiver was returned to us within a week. I made a phone call and sent an email for some technical assistance needed due to my technical inaptness and both were handled competently and  my problems were fixed. Thank you very much, I will certainly recommend your service."
2011-01-18
"I\'m glad I found you. When my hard drive on my Toshiba "free TiVo" box was on its last legs, I noted with fear that an adventurous group were replacing their hard drives. "That\'s not for me," I thought, and almost threw away my machine. Then I found a link to WeaKnees and your excellent instructions and decided to give it a try. Huzzah! The instructions were clear, simple, and helpful as promised. The installation was done in a half hour without a hitch, and I\'m back in business, with 10 times the capacity, a faster drive, and years ahead of more free TiVo. Thank you, WeaKnees.\r\n"
2011-01-13
"I received my replacement hard drive today right on schedule.  Your included instructions were perfect.  It couldn\'t have been easier to install the new hard drive.  The only slightly difficult part was removing the drive power cable (hard to get off).  The tools you sent worked perfectly to remove the screws.\r\n \r\nYour website provided lots of information on troubleshooting TiVos.  Finding the right hard drive was a snap.  Your prices are very reasonable for what you offer.  You certainly do a fantastic job and it is appreciated!\r\n \r\nThank you very much."
2010-12-29
"Thank you!  Job well done!  Received unit this afternoon and got it hooked up and reconnected with TiVo account info, programing, etc.  All working good.  Add me to your success stories.  :-)  Will recommend WeaKnees to anyone I know with aging TiVo problem(s).\r\n\r\n   Thank you,"
2010-12-10
"Really senior old lady - I replaced the hard drive myself. Excellent instructions - though those teeny screws were harder to replace than to remove!\r\n"
2010-11-25
"Thank you so much for the hard drive & incredibly great instructions that came with it.  I was able to install it in a very short time & my\r\nTivo is up and running great.  Thanks again for your help."
2010-11-15
"I am delighted with Weaknees hard drive and clear installation instructions which took about 30 min. I doubled my TiVo capacity for less than a refurbished unit of same capacity. I expected to have costly shipping to send my TiVoHD back to TiVo for repair or replacement with refurbished unit, but your rep convinced me I most likely only needed to replace the drive. He was right and arranged cheap USPS shipping to HI for me. I had the brand new drive in a few days and am now back in service with my TiVo at double the capacity. Thanks!"
2010-11-15
"Hey guys,\r\nJust wanted to thank you for the great service.  I appreciate the guidance on this.  I was able to replace the drive, great directions!  Our tivo is back to normal and better than ever.\r\nThanks so much!\r\n-Jonas\r\n"
2010-11-15
"Just wanted to say "thanks" for replacing the power unit on my Tivo HD unit. It\'s working as good as new. \r\n\r\nYou guys are awesome. Love the quick turnaround time.\r\n\r\nThanks again."
2010-11-12
"Received my hard drive upgrade kit. Took all of ten minutes to install. Thanks for good instructions and all the necessary tools."
2010-11-08
"Today I was surprised at the simplicity and ease of your instructions for replacing my Tivo hard drive. Everything looks great now."
2010-10-21
"Thank you, it worked perfectly and your directions were easy and simple. A breeze. Thanks."\r\n
2010-10-05
"Just wanted to drop you a line and commend you on your great service - needed a replacement power supply for my TIVO s2 and placed an order on Thursday 9/30 - you shipped on 10/1 - I received on Monday 10/4 - 15 minutes later the TIVO is back on the shelf doing its job - Thanks - will recommend you guys to all my TIVO friends\r\n"
2010-09-27
"Just received my new hard drive today. It took only 15 minutes to install. Great directions. \r\nThe Tivo is up and running."
2010-09-25
"Thank you!  My TiVo was failing.  I googled the symptoms and suspected power supply.  I checked with TiVo customer support and they thought hard drive.  I emailed you and you thought power supply.  I bought a power supply from you.  Installation was incredibly easy.  I went from opening the package you\'d shipped to reconnecting my TiVo in 10 minutes, and I spent half that time trying to wiggle the TiVo cover off.  Let\'s hope this power supply lasts longer than the two years the original did."
2010-09-15
"I have finally had time to perform the upgrade of my second TIVO and look at the details of the work you performed on my first unit and I wanted to express my gratitude for what you have provided me. I was not expecting the added upgrade to the first TIVO sent and I wish to thank you for that work. The second TIVO is working perfectly after I performed the upgrade following the documentation provided. I have let my friends, who own TIVOs, know about your service and will be ordering further upgrades for my series one TIVO. \r\n\r\nThank you again for providing this necessary and useful service. I look forward to working with you in the future."
2010-08-26
"I received the new hard drive and installed it - unit is up and running\r\nagain. Thank you for your assistance!! You guys are the best!!\r\n"
2010-08-16
"I ordered and received my new hard drive (750GB) for my Series 2 Tivo. I read the directions and then installed it a week later. It took 7 minutes from start to end.\r\n\r\nI plugged the Tivo in and it came up with a welcome screen. I went through the Tivo startup process and it is working great! Now I have 6 times the capacity. \r\n\r\nWOW! It was so easy to do. I will definitely reccomend you guys to my friends with Tivos.\r\n\r\nThanks again for a great product and service.\r\n\r\nHoward"
2010-08-13
"I must say. AWESOME AWESOME AWESOME!!!!!!!  I don\'t leave comments but this was worth it mentioning. Great company. I am thrilled with my new hard drive for my RS TX20 I bought from you. I did what the paper you sent. And yes it was the hard drive. It was very easy to install. It took awhile for setup but it was worth it. Thanks for bringing it back to life. I thought I had to buy another one.\r\nPlease stay in business!!!!!!!!"
2010-07-30
"I want to tell you how satisfied I am with my new 1 tb Tivo drive, the amazingly well prepared instructions, and the help on your web site. After wasting hours with Tivo\'s hot line where they never mentioned the possibility of a hard drive problem (they kept talking about signal strength, attenuators, etc.) you immediately knew of my problem (pixilation, freezing and rebooting)and had solutions. You were such a welcome breath of fresh air after all their @$#%@#!. Thank you.\r\nRon Cullum"
2010-07-27
"Another satisfied return customer.\r\nI just upgraded an old R10 from a replace drive with you guys. I just moved from a Series 1 to a Series 2, what a speed increase, now I\'m TiVoing in dog years!\r\nYou guys are the best!\r\nThank You for doing what you do."
2010-07-26
"I normally don\'t leave comments about past purchases, but I am so pleased with your product and mailing service that I just had to let you guy\'s know about. In this day and time it seems hard to come by.It only took me about 30 min. to install the new hard drive and the cooling fan, and WHA LA! as good as new. Again, a \'BIG THANK YOU\' to Weaknees."\r\n\r\nVery Happy Customer!
2010-07-09
"Thank you, thank you! I suspected it was the hard drive -- you confirmed it. Tivo wanted $150 to replace our Tivo, and another $199 to transfer service to the new unit. For $100 less than that I was not only able to fix my Tivo, but I doubled the hard drive capacity! And that was including overnight shipping and the extended warranty (woohoo).\r\n\r\nI popped the new drive in in about 10 minutes with your excellent tools and instructions, and our long, dark domestic nightmare was over. Thank you for making it all so easy."\r\n
2010-06-09
"I kept meaning to email you about how satisfied I am with the upgrade kit I purchased in February. Your instructions were easy to follow and my once "dying" Tivo is like new. Thank You!"
2010-05-26
"Everything could not have gone smoother. Got the parts I needed quickly. Your technicians walked me through the process. Tivo is up & running again. Thanks for making this such a pain free experience!"
2010-05-18
"I ordered a power supply unit for my Tivo on Wed 5/12 around 6:00 pm EST. It arrived in my office on thursday morning 5/13. I have never had faster shipping. I followed your instructions and installed the unit. My son and I waited as the unit powered up. We gave each other high 5\'s when the picture appeared. It works perfectly . thank you."
2010-05-16
"After suffering for several months with my TIVO S3 having a\r\nvery slow response to the remote control of the program selection, I decided to\r\nupgrade to the 1 TB replacement kit. \r\nAfter reading through the instructions, clearing some space on the\r\nkitchen table for the S3, the upgrade was done in less than 20 minutes.\r\n After running through the TIVO guided\r\nsetup (no problems whatever), my S3 is now behaving like a new machine, no\r\nreboots, and a quick response to program remote control requests.\r\nThank you for providing excellent\r\nservice, not only in the quality of the kit, but in the tech support rapid and\r\nknowledgeable response to my phone call.\r\n"
2010-05-15
"Thanks for offering a solution to repair my TiVo/DirecTv deocder and keep my lifetime subscription intact. The hard drive replacement kit repaired my unit quickly, and doubled my storage space to boot! The pre-formatted drive has saved me a lot of money since I do not need to replace my hardware, or start paying monthly DVR fees. Thanks again."
2010-04-23
"Thanks for being fantastic - new drive and fan shipped immediately, the instructions were perfect, and I got everything replaced and up and running in minutes. Performance has drastically improved and I look forward to my extra hours and no more broken video and odd grinding noises."
2010-04-22
"Was having major freeaing and stuttering problems with my Series 3 TIVO. Contacted TIVO and they wanted me to buy refurb for $150 and pay again for another Lifetime Subscription, they werent even willing to transfer to new box. I contacted Weaknees, was told how to pinpoint issue. Within an hour I knew I had bad hard drive. Bought a replacement drive, replaced bad drive in about 20 mintues with the easy to fllow directions. Weaknees is the best, Im telling all my friends !!! Thanks John from MI"
2010-04-18
"I just wanted to pass along my sincere thanks to your technical team for fixing my TiVo HD so promptly but in particular for their taking the time to ghost my old hard-drive to the new hard-drive replacement as requested.\r\n\r\nIt saved me hours of set-up time and is going to allow me to enjoy the programs that I thought I was going to lose since I could not back them all up. It is greatly appreciated that they made the extra effort when they didn\'t have to. \r\n\r\nThanks again!!!"
2010-04-12
"Thank God there is a company like Weaknees! This was the first time I\'ve ever attempted to purchase a replacement internal component for my TiVo Series 3 HD. Honestly I don\'t really know what possessed me to even open up my TiVo box but after the crappy treatment I received from TiVo customer service and the crappy "discount" they offered for a refurbished Series 3 for $150, I figured I\'d take a chance and try and fix it myself. Turns out after I opened up the TiVo, I figured out that there was no power to the hard drive, fan or lights so why not just buy a whole new power supply board.\r\n\r\nI Googled a couple of things and found WeaKnees...within 5 minutes I found the exact part I needed from your website...incredibly easy and $50 cheaper than the TiVo refurb option. Got the part in 2 business days and within 10 minutes I replaced the power board, closed it up and plugged it back in and voila! My TiVo was alive again! Thank you so much WeaKnees for an easy process and quick no-hassle delivery of my order. FOR SURE I will recommend people to your site!"
2010-04-06
"While waiting on DirecTV to sell TiVo HD units we decided to upgrade our seven year old Hughes DVR due to some skipping during playback. Quick delivery of my new drive from your company and 15 minutes to install it, including cleaning the interior of dust, made us very pleased with our purchase. For little more than the price of a barebones drive we have rejuvenated our old TiVo and doubled its storage. THANKS!\r\n"
2010-04-06
"Thanks for the prompt delivery and great product. Everything worked great. The instructions were easy to follow. Anyone considering buying a cheaper hard drive and formatting themselves should forget about it. Weaknees delivers a great product, saves you time and it works out of the box. Thanks again.\r\n"
2010-04-05
"Thanks Weaknees for saving me a lot of money. When my Tivo Series 3 hard drive crashed, I was going to have to spend over $350 with Tivo to replace it with a refurbished unit and a new service plan. I purchased a replacment hard drive from you and installed it myself in a short time. I was up and running for less than $200 with over 2x the storage space! My lifetime service plan is still intact. I would not hesitate to recommend you to all my Tivo friends....in fact, I have already started. Thanks again."\r\n\r\n
2010-04-02
"You guys are the greatest thing since sliced bread. My Tivo series two died and I googled "Tivo Repair". Your website came up. I ordered a new Power supply which I received in less than a week. Your instructions for installing it were very simple and complete. I now have a TIVO as good as new and the greatest part is that I still have my lifetime subscription. Keep up the good work. You have a customer and supporter for life!!!"
2010-03-30
"I\'ve just received and set up our new TiVo Premiere for Verizon FIOS. First, this new TiVo is a rocket ship-much better than previous TiVo boxes for either Cable or DirecTV! Second, Weaknees sales, service and support came through perfectly for us again. We have been doing business with you for years now, and you have capably supported and/or repaired seven different TiVo models for us, all without a hitch. And, Max and Nick are impossible to stump with even the most \'out there\' technical question, including those which TiVo\'s own company guys can\'t answer.\r\n\r\nWe like our new Premiere and Weaknees so much, I just ordered a second TiVo Premiere this evening. Thanks, guys. You\'re the best!"
2010-03-27
"I just wanted to say thank you. I ordered a replacement hard drive and cooling fan for my SAT-T60 DVR. \r\n\r\nThe products arrived quickly, and the installation went very smoothly. My unit is back up and running and I still have my lifetime subscription to Tivo intact.\r\n\r\nIt was a pleasure working with you!"
2010-03-16
"The hard drive upgrade could not have been easier. My TiVo Series 3 HD was off the TV stand, on the work bench and back on the TV stand in half an hour with three times the recording capacity. Thank you for a well-though-out product."
2010-03-05
"Thanks for your great service. I ordered my replacement hard drive for my Humax T800 on March 2 and received it on March 4. It took no more than 20 minutes to install and works great. I am very happy and will use your company again when the need arises."
2010-02-19
"My 10 year old Series I Tivo failed suddenly. Found you guys through a Google search, ordered a replacement drive, and now I\'m back up and running in no time. I\'m good for another 10 years! Thanks for the great product and customer service."
2010-01-31
"To the Weaknees Staff:\r\nI shipped my TiVo series 2 to you for repair, actually replacement of the \r\nhard drive. On the day, it was received, it was repaired and put back into \r\nUPS for return shipment. The TiVo works very well and you preserved my \r\nlifetime subscription. THANK YOU.\r\n\r\nPaul Harrington\r\n\r\nPS: May be the best $149 I ever spent."
2010-01-20
"I just installed a Weaknees HD in my 3 year old Series 2 TiVo.\xc2\xa0 My old hard drive bit the dust projecting only a fatal \'Green Screen.\' Once I opened the new HD box, it took me less than half an hour to install the new HD and put my TiVo back in service. The instructions were clear and made the entire job a piece of cake. Great product to salvage a broken TiVo. Thanks!"
2010-01-14
"You guys are my heroes! We were having trouble with our original TiVo -- seven years old. TiVo couldn\'t help, although they did try. Their only answer was to replace the machine. I got in touch with you, described the issues and you diagnosed a need for a new power supply....I questioned you, you answered that you really thought that was the problem, so I gave it a shot. Your directions for removing the old power supply and installing the new one were great and voila! Our TiVo is working again! Thanks!"
2010-01-10
"A few weeks ago when my directv tivo stopped working I thought I would not get to watch tivo again. Directv was not interested in helping me they just wanted me to take one of their dvr\'s. Desperate for help I checked out the net and found Weaknees and you guys have been a blessing. You helped me figure out what was wrong with my tivo by checking out all the information on your website. I got the part I needed right away and felt confident with the directions I was provided that I could put it in. Now my tivo works better then ever. Thank you for everything we\'ve grown to love our tivo and thanks to you we are able to enjoy it again."
2010-01-09
"I rarely take the time to review a product or service received online (I know, shame on me), but in this case I had to. I can\'t thank you enough for the fantastic experience I had. My new hard drive was shipped less than 24 hours after ordering and I received it very soon after. I was hoping it would arrive before all of my favorite shows started airing new episodes and it did! The instructions were clear and simple and we had the new drive installed and running in less than a half hour. I\'m sure you hear this often, but I really appreciate the service you provide and the alternative to buying a low-quality product and lack of clear instruction. I hope you are still here the next time I need/want to upgrade my TiVo!"
2009-12-24
"The 500 gig drive arrived in 2 days. Installed in less than 1 hour.\r\nUpdated Tivo information. 663 hours standard and 72 hours HD\r\navailable. Very easy repair, good work!\r\n"
2009-12-22
"You Guys are the BEST!! You saved my TiVo (with the lifetime membership) The Hard Drive was Very EASY to change out with your great instructions. Now I\'m up and recording all my shows again. And Bonus: I quadrupled my recording space!!!"
2009-12-18
"[Y]ou folks get a AAA+! I\'ve done quite a bit of basic electronics & PC fiddling -- memory, accessory cards, power supplies, drives, etc. But this was so straightforward and simple, it was shocking (figuratively speaking!). Given that this was a UPS package in Minnesota, I did have to let the drive thaw, literally, before I opened the case of my unit. Once things had warmed up, though, the whole hardware process took less than 10 minutes, with no fuss or ambiguity -- great instructions and all the gear fit perfectly. Then I reconnected the dvr and its wireless adapter and it immediately fired up perfectly and shook hands with Tivo Central and we were back in business. Replacing the drive was exactly the answer to the mysterious, frustrating problems we\'d been having. And going from 40 to to 320 gigs capacity is quite a bonus.\r\n\r\nAll in all, congrats on your services and user-friendly documentation; nice going!"\r\n
2009-12-09
"Hey, I just wanted to say thanks for the service you provide. I own an older DirecTV/TIVO that went out. I found out I either had to lease a new one for $20/month or get a new one that wouldn\'t record 2 programs at once. I ordered a new power supply from you and my unit was up and running within minutes of UPS leaving my door!"
2009-12-01
"I got my 1Tb replacement drive for my tivo series 2 today. Packaging was excellent and everything I needed to perform the upgrade was in the box. The entire process took about 10 minutes till I had the unit plugged back in and running guided setup. Great service guys. Thanks."
2009-11-21
"You are to be commended for the quality of your upgrade kits. I added a 2nd drive to a TCD649080 unit, and was very impressed with the quality of the documentation, as well as the quality of the kit parts. As a 25-year IT guy, I know my way around the inside of most things with circuit boards, but your documentation was so excellent that a total neophyte could get through the installation.\r\n\r\nThanks, and I\'ll be recommending you to others."
2009-11-19
"I have a TIVO with lifetime service that I didn\'t want to throw away when it got annoyingly noisey. I bought a new drive and fan. 20 minutes after opening the box, my TIVO was downloading programming information, quietly. Thanks Weaknees for fast service and easy install."
2009-11-18
"100% positive feedback! Got the new hard drive with more space, and everything is installed and working like a charm! So happy."\r\n
2009-11-11
"My HR10-250 Tivo went belly up telling me the hardware had\r\nbeen shut down due to excessive heat. It just would not start\xe2\x80\xa6 A little\r\nbit of online research got me to your website for a replacement power supply. I\r\ngot the part today and thanks to your great (and clear) instructions it took\r\nless than 10 minutes to replace the power supply. I\xe2\x80\x99m back to watching\r\nTV!\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\n\r\n\r\nThanks for a great website, clearly marked products, easy\r\ncheckout, INCREDIBLY EXPEDIENT shipping, and excellent installation\r\ninstructions."
2009-11-03
"Just installed a new hard drive in my tivo from you folks. Wanted to let you know that your instructions are super! I am the type of person that asks" now what did they mean " I had no problems with the install and your instructions were the clearest I have seen in a long time.\r\nGREAT JOB!!!!!!!!"
2009-11-02
"I just wanted to write you guys to say THANKS! I got my replacement TiVo hard drive less than a week after I ordered it. Thanks to your instructions, I was able to swap out the drives all by myself. The now drive works perfectly. I really can\'t thank you guys enough for all the money I would have spent on monthly DVR service OR a whole new TiVo box/service plan. You guys rock."
2009-11-01
"Thank you for the excellent work repairing my TiVo. Since the problem was somewhat intermittent (diplays only in black and white after a period of time), I was concerned that you may not be able to diagnose and fix it. But the service was fast and the TiVo is working great now!\r\n\r\nThanks for your help!"
2009-10-30
"I had a flaky TiVo - intermittent pixellation and some recordings would stop part way through. Google pointed me to your site where the indication was a bad drive. I got a new bigger drive from you and installed it (about 10 minutes). My TiVo now works perfectly - and the additional storage is great. Thank you. You guys are the best."
2009-10-19
"Got my replacement drive from you last Friday as expected, installed it on Saturday, and TiVo Series3 now works as if it were new! The new drive resolved the problems I was having with my TiVo not responding to the remote and not booting up properly. Installation was straightforward, very well documented, and quite easy. Thank you for the support."
2009-10-17
"Installed my replacement power supply in ten minutes and my TiVo is alive now. I was reluctant to put $75 into a six-year old piece of electronics but your customer service rep reminded me that buying a new box would cost me much, much more to get my lifetime service back!\r\n\r\nthanks for rescuing my TiVo"
2009-10-12
"Unbelievable response time. Asked for help on a Sunday and received a response on a Sunday. How great is that. I thought it was one of my drives but your diagnosis was right on. The power supply. I ordered and picked it up the same day. Back up in minutes. I can\'t say more. Your the best."
2009-10-08
"Great Hard Disk replacement kit. I didn\'t even have to go to my tool box! The hardest process of replacement was actually reprogramming of timer recording after replacement! And time of rebooting!!! I replaced in just 15min! I should have purchased Weak Knee 1TB hard Disk kit with extended warranty instead of WD My DVR Expander in first place! Thank you guys!!!!! "
2009-10-08
"I just wanted to let you know that I am really happy with my recent order. You shipped my item quickly and it came with very easy to follow instructions and all the necessary tools. I appreciate you offering such a high quality service."
2009-10-08
"I just wanted to take a moment and thank you for the service you\'ve provided\r\nhere. While I made a mistake in the original ordering, Weak Knees has been\r\nvery accommodating and managed to get my replacement drive turned around and\r\nsent back out in a day. It is gratifying to find a company today that will\r\ntake a moment to send a personal note back to a customer with a question and\r\nthen provide further excellent customer service in quickly processing the\r\nreplacement. Good job!"
2009-10-07
"Wow, I can\'t express enough gratitude to all of you at weaknees. I researched my problem, received your suggestion within the hour, ordered the part and replaced it myself all within 4 days of my tivo crashing. I have a lifetime subscription and was just sick of the thought that I would have to order a new unit and pay another subscription (I can\'t live without my tivo). Plus, after replacing the power source, I still have all of my programs saved from before. I didn\'t lose one thing!! You saved me so much $$$$!! I can\'t thank you enough!!"
2009-10-03
"Two old retirees, plenty of college degrees, and the new hard drive was installed in less than a half an hour. If YOU wrote the instructions, I think we might be able to consider brain surgery OR cleaning out the \'stuff\' in the basement. Thanks!"
2009-09-29
"All,\r\n\r\nI just wanted to thank you for your help with this. I really do appreciate good customer service and support, and you guys know how to do that.\r\n\r\nThe drive arrived, it\'s installed and my Tivo lives again!\r\n\r\nGreat product, great service & great price!\r\n\r\nThank you,"
2009-09-25
"My Series 2 with a Life Time Sub has been resurrected with a new Power Supply! 1st I thought it was the HD, replaced (with larger of course :) ), but when it didn\'t work, some one suggested the PS and ........ voila! Today, it\'s up and running!\r\nMy wife thanks you the most (she uses it). I thank you \'cause I don\'t have to hear about it being broken anymore. :)\r\n\r\nCheers! Excellent job folks!!"
2009-09-23
"I just wanted to thank you for your excellent customer service. I ordered a replacement hard drive for my TIVO Series 3 DVR Tuesday around noon. I was willing to pay for over night delivery but was told by your agent it would get there in the same time as standard because of how close I am to California. The hard drive arrived as promised Wednesday morning. After the easiest install I have ever had the TIVO is back up and running. \r\n\r\nThank you for your help"
2009-09-21
"WOW - thank you so much for your quick and reasonable service. I just replaced my Directv R10 with your 320 gb hard drive. I read the instructions over quite a few times and then decided to tackle it. I feel sooo pleased with myself and the results. I don\'t usually tell my age, but I\'m a retired Delta Airlines employee, absolutely not electronically wise, a 71 year old grandma and I did it all by myself.\r\nTivo Community. com was so right, you\'re the one to come to. Thank you, thank you, thank you !!!!"
2009-09-18
"Hi, I just wanted to thank you for your professional excellence. I can\'t believe how fast you upgraded my Apple TV and sent it back to me. The Apple TV drive upgrade is very tricky and I\'m recommending Weaknees to my brother and friend who are also looking to upgrade their 40GB Apple TVs\'. You guys are awesome! Thank you, M.M."
2009-09-12
"I am just finishing up the replacement of a failed hard drive in my vintage 2001 AT&T; TIVO DVR2 and just wanted to say that without a doubt that was the easiest replacement and upgrade that I have ever done to a piece of equipment. The order shipped in less time than it said, the instructions were clear, and as a result I am up and running again on a box that has served us very well considering that it has run pretty much non-stop since we bought it. Your company has this down pat and I will recommend you to my TIVO friends in the future without hesitation.\r\nThanks"
2009-09-12
"I just finished upgrading my drive space and I have nothing but positive feedback. Very easy to order and ship the parts, very easy to understand instructions, and things just went flawlessly.\r\n\r\nThanks very much!"
2009-09-09
"I just had an emotional breakdown when I realized my TIVO had died. My prayers were answered when I found your website. My TIVO (with a lifetime subscription) went from a dust colletor to an new improved DVR!!! I am not a technical person but with your great instructions and the tork screwdriver provided... I went from 40 hours of TIVO magic to 120!!!! UNBELIEVEABLE. THANK YOU!!!!"
2009-08-22
"I just wanted to say THANK YOU for your website and products! My TiVo just stopped working one night after four years. I called TiVo support and they wanted $267 to repair the hard drive! I was devastated because I couldn\'t afford that and I\'m addicted to my TiVo! The TiVo rep referred me to your site...Thank God for that! Within a few days I got my new hard drive by mail, within 15 minutes I installed it myself, and it took a half hour for the guided setup. YOU guys TURNED my NIGHTMARE into a DREAM COME TRUE! You Rock."
2009-08-20
"I just wanted to thank you guys so much for your great website and hardware! My TiVo was on the fritz and your site gave me quick and easy troubleshooting so that I could figure out that the hard drive was the problem. Instead of buying a new TiVo which would have been $500 including service, I was able to save the one that I have had for 5 years with lifetime service for only $109! That is all thanks to you guys. On top of that, this allowed me the chance to upgrade the space so that I now have double the space and a fully functional TiVo. Thank you!"
2009-07-29
"Hi, I installed my twin hard drive kit on 7/16/09. I don\'t know how you can improve the instructions or kit. It\'s as easy it can get. Thanks,"
2009-07-21
"Thank you so much! Your online troubleshooting helped me correctly diagnose the problem with my Tivo, your shipping was fast, and your instructions for replacing the power source were simple to follow. I had my Tivo up and running less than an hour after I received my replacement parts."
2009-07-17
"I just wanted to commend you guys!!! I thought my Tivo was broken for good. I just installed my new hard drive... can it get any easier!!! I was up and running in under an hour. Thanks!!!"
2009-07-15
"THANK YOU! How refreshing to find life for my two non working Tivo\'s. The WeaKnees external modem arrived yesterday and in minutes both my tivo\'s were communicating with the outside world! I can now pause live television and enjoy all my favorite shows again. Here is 3 thumbs up WeaKnees!!"
2009-07-09
"After a very fast reponse to my inquiry and diagnosis of my Tivo burner problem, I had a new drive in my hands in 48 hours.  The self installation was a breeze with the instructions provided, and I almost couldn\'t believe that within 30 minutes of receiving the drive my Tivo was up and running better than original (speed and memory upgrades).  This diagnosis/fix saved me loss of $800 unit, $399 lifetime Tivo service contract, and/or at least significant unit shipping costs and time if I had to ship item to service center.\r\nI\'m a brand new, but now loyal, WeaKnees customer.\r\nThanks!\r\n"
2009-07-02
"Wow!! That was sooo easy! Thank you so much! I just replaced my dead hard drive on my old 80 hour series 2 TiVo, and it works like a charm!! I don\'t usually write such glowing reviews with so many exclaimation points!! Now, I get to keep my lifetime service, and, record everything in "best" mode, and can keep whole seasons of shows all season long. You guys rock!"
2009-07-01
"I replaced my hard drive using your kit and wanted to let you know how much I appreciated your detailed instructions. The instructions could not have been more clear and easy to follow, and my beloved TiVo has come back to life! I am also impressed by your website; particularly the troubleshooting information. Thank you."
2009-06-25
"I just received my HDD order and installed the HDD and it works great, I will be spreading the word from now on."
2009-06-20
"Just wanted to give you guys a big THANKS for the harddrive I recently purchased from you. I ordered it as an upgrade to my Tivo HD. The drive came quickly and well packaged. Installation could not possibly have been easier. I had the drives swapped and my Tivo back up and running in under 10 minutes. Thanks for your great products and customer service!"
2009-06-18
"Just a quick note to say thanks for a great product. I was one of the people who are a little uneasy opening up my Tivo. But after reading the instructions I dove in and my Tivo is working. And with more room for my tv shows. Thanks for making this product so easy to install."
2009-06-16
"Your directions for installation and the ease of installation were the best we have ever experienced. Thank you so much. The new hard drive is working better than the original hard drive did when it was new. Thank you."
2009-06-05
"Thank you all @ weaknees! My order was shipped quickly and as requested. The instructions with the new hard drive were simple and easy to follow. The guided setup procedure @ tivo took longer than the installation of the drive. Thanks again."
2009-05-22
"Just great how simple the replacement hard drive was. This box may out live me if you stay in business."
2009-05-15
"I have a TiVo that I\'ve had since 2001. This TiVo has seen better days. It skipped, stalled, and made watching tv a real PAIN! Then in a white hat comes Weaknees! Not only did you sell me a new hard drive, one of your workers put up with my whining to help me get it DONE! And let\'s not talk about the get price I paid! THANK YOU SO MUCH! BASICALLY, WEAKNEES ROCKS!"
2009-05-02
"Just wanted to thank you for a super product...\r\n\r\nI\'m an old dog that learned a new trick.\r\n\r\nReplaced my drive in 15 minutes, and believe\r\nme I\'m all thumbs. Top drawer service instructions.\r\n\r\nMany thanks from a very happy customer."
2009-04-27
"Seriously... I\'d started to hate watching my tivo. I would think about it on the way home from work... thinking Star Trek or whatever is probably being semi-recorded right now.\r\n\r\nRebooting... freezing... severe skipping and digitizing... it could not have been worse. \r\n\r\nA coworker recommended you a long time ago, but only recently did I visit the site and see how surprising the prices were. \r\n\r\nI ordered, then I looked at my Tivo and thought, crap, these are special screws. Even when my new drive gets here, I\'ll have to borrow something from the engineers at work. \r\n\r\nNope. The kit comes with everything including special screwdrivers for the Tivo model you enter. \r\n\r\nThe instructions were easy, the surgery was WAY easier than I expected, and like I said... Tivo is a joy to watch again. \r\n\r\nThanks to weakness.com!\r\n\r\n-Sebastian Kunz, news anchor\r\n910 KNEW / Green 960 KKGN\r\nSan Francisco, California"\r\n
2009-04-10
"Gentlemen,\r\n \r\nI can\'t tell you how nice it is to do business with you folks.\r\nBut I can try.  I previously bought a power supply from you\r\nfor my TiVo, and recently bought a new 80gb hard drive.\r\nInstallation on both was a breeze. \r\nYour notes on how a hard drive can go bad over time led\r\nme to believe that mine was going.  For over a year it had\r\nbeen "digitizing", halting, freezing up, etc.  It is SOOO nice\r\nto be able to watch TV again.\r\nTHANKS A MILLION.  You guys are the best."
2009-04-01
"Just a note to let you know that I am very pleased with the upgrade you guys did.  Just hooked it up and was ready to go, no problems.   Thanks so much for taking the extra time to transfer all my programs to the new drive.  I can access all the programs without any of the problems I had before the upgrade.  Looks like my unit had one drive, not two as I had thought.  I\'m going to be needing a new remote and will be ordering that from you in the very near future.  Thanks again..\r\n"
2009-03-25
"My TiVo died; it would freeze uncontrollably (randomly at first, and then to the breaking point). After reading many TiVo forums online, I was convinced it was a drive problem; almost all of them directed me to weaKnees.\r\n\r\nI am a skeptic by heart until I try any service personally, and this time I was desperate. I am so glad I came here.\r\n\r\nI ordered a replacement drive, and it came by UPS exactly when I expected it. The instructions were actually clear and easy to follow (I bet my mom could follow them). Starting up and being able to go through the TiVo guided setup was a relief, and so far, everything has been great (it\'s only been a few days).\r\n\r\nSo far, I am so thankful I found your service. TiVo users are lucky for this.\r\n\r\nThanks again!"
2009-03-21
"I just installed a replacement HD for my Humax DRT800 and it could not have been any easier. The 1TB upgrade took less than 15 minutes and when I reconnected everything, it came to life without a hitch. Thanks Weaknees!"
2009-03-11
"I just wanted to take a moment to thank you. I have had the need to use your products twice for my Series One Phillips TIVO. A modem and just last week a new hard drive. I both cases your directions were excellent and very easy to follow.\r\nI also had a need to contact, by email, your tech support with a question. As advertised, the response came in just minutes.\r\nKeep you again for quality and professional work."
2009-02-16
"I ordered the power supply based on your recommendation about my (Internal temperature too hot screen).  I installed the new power supply this weekend and everything works just great.  I just wanted to thank you for your advice and the great service I got from your company.  You have a repeat customer for my future TIVO needs. \r\n\xef\xbf\xbdJune--"
2009-02-13
"I just received my new hard drive, and I installed it myself (it was as easy as promised). I am so excited to have my TiVo back! Thanks, I will be a fan for life!"
2009-02-11
"Hey, I received my disk drive and installed it today.  I have to compliment WeaKnees on its high quality, lucid and easy to follow instructions.  One gets so used to coping with instructions written by non-English speakers, so it is refreshing to get a set of instructions that is totally understandable.  Thanks."
2009-02-09
"Thanks to your replacement hard drive and thorough instructions, my Tivo is operational again!!!  Oh the Joy!  I\'m a hero with my wife - but I confess, you guys deserve 99 % of the credit!  I also appreciated your fast shipping - I could not be more satisfied.  Keep up the great work!"
2009-02-06
"Once again, you\'ve made me love you. Years ago, with your help, I put in my first hard drive ever into anything. Now, I put in hard drives all the time BUT none ever as smoothly and easily and painlessly or with more satisfaction than the WeaKnees hard drive into my TiVo. The hardest part was getting the cat out of the shelf so I could put the TiVo back in. You\'ve brought my aged Toshiba (w/ that basic lifetime!) back to life. Thank you. Thank you. I am, once again, your very happy customer."
2009-01-21
"Thank you guys so much! I sent my baby to you for a tuner repair on both tuners. Your techs help in diagnosing the problem, shipping instructions, turnaround time- everything was wonderful. When I got it back, I installed the hard drive replacement kit I had ordered from you. So easy, I was done in about 15 minutes. Now my precious is running perfectly, and it would not have been possible without your help. You are a fantastic company that I will recommend forever. Thank you so much for all your help!"
2009-01-21
"I just wanted to say that the installation kit (additional 320gig for a tivo series 2) I ordered was perfect. The instructions left nothing to the imagination, and as a result the installation was simple and quick. I enjoy tackling projects myself, and products like yours truly make it a pleasure.\r\n\r\nThanks for a great product"
2009-01-08
"My Tivo Series 3 started acting flaky about a month ago and finally died last week. I found your website and after a bit of trepidation, ordered a new replacement hard drive. Well, it came last night and I had it installed in about 30 minutes. The hardest part was getting the cover off the unit! I ran guided setup and am back in business with 3 times the storage. Couldn\'t have been easier. Thank you, Weaknees!!"
2009-01-05
"I just wanted to thank you for the incredible service you provided. I just found and ordered the exact thing i needed- super easy! I then called with a question and was helped by an extremely courteous  person. Thank you for a great experience...I\'ll recommend your site to ANYONE! "
2009-01-01
"Thanks for the prompt service, the product works great!!\r\nInstall could not be any easier, you guy operate your\r\nbusiness the same as I try to do mine.\r\n\r\nAgain, great job, keep up the good work,\r\nI will be doing more business with you and\r\ngiving referrals as well."
2008-12-30
"So when I got home from my last business trip the 13 year old informed\r\nme that the Tivo "had died", I assumed someone had pressed a key on a\r\nremote to misdirect the video feed. The 13 year old has a four year\r\nold sister, so this is not an uncommon occurrence for us.\r\n\r\nAs this particular Tivo is one of those lifetime subscription units\r\nfrom the late Clinton administration, there\'s no way I\'m giving it up\r\nwithout a fight. When I checked it out I discovered that yes, indeed\r\nthere was no video signal coming off the RF port of our Tivo Series 1\r\n(Serial # 348). After unhooking it from its wiring harness and\r\nreconnecting it to what amounts to my video test bench, I discovered I\r\ncould get it to output component video, but not reboot. Thanks to your\r\nwonderful diagnostic message boards I concluded I probably had a hard\r\ndrive failure...after 7-8 years of constant use WHO would have\r\nthought ;-)\r\n\r\nSo, I ordered a replacement drive from your very efficient (if not\r\nterribly pretty) website.\r\n\r\nCover off to cover on took 20 minutes which included almost 10 minutes\r\nof finding a vacuum cleaner to suck dust bunnies the size of small\r\nrats off the motherboard. After reconnecting it to the test harness\r\nand then the family room "production" harness everything worked\r\nwonderfully...AND it has FIVE TIMES the capacity it did when it left\r\nwhatever contract manufacturing plant that gave birth to it.\r\n\r\nAs I said...you guys rock."
2008-12-28
"I just wanted to tell you how pleased I am with your services. Our Tivo stopped downloading program data a few weeks ago, and we thought we were going to have to replace the unit. We have a 180 hour Tivo series 2 and were very disappointed to discover that you can only buy the Tivo series 2 80 hour box, so we\'d have to downgrade. Upgrading to the HD wasn\'t an option either, since we have satellite and that system evidently doesn\'t work with satellite TV. I\'d resigned myself to buying an 80 hour box when I discovered that I could get a replacement modem from your website. I was actually skeptical of your claim that the new modem would "install in minutes" (nothing is ever THAT easy) or that it would even solve our problem, but the price was much better than a downgraded box and far preferable to giving up our 180 hour box and having to reprogram all our season passes, etc. So I bought the modem and was thrilled to discover that it really did solve the problem, and that it really did install in less than 5 minutes! Thank you!!!! I can\'t live without my Tivo, you guys really saved the day."
2008-12-26
"Thanks!  My Tivo is now working again. The power supply was a snap to install.  I\'m so grateful for your company."
2008-12-25
"That was the easiest harddrive replacement kit ever. Smooth and fast no problems. Thanks for the fast shipping. The updated drive even seems to make the Tivo respond faster \r\nThnks again"
2008-12-06
"thank you. unit works great with upgraded hard drive plus old shows were preserved. great service and will continue to use your company for all tivo purchases , upgrades and repairs\r\n\r\nall the best"\r\n\r\n
2008-12-05
"Hi All,\r\n\r\nI opened the box that came the other day with the new high capacity\r\nhard drive and replacement fan for my satellite receiver/Tivo\r\nrecorder. After a quick look over the instructions, I was quickly at\r\nwork replacing the components and it seemed I was finished in almost\r\nno time. After connecting all the cables and powering the unit back\r\nup, the set-up went without a hitch and I was back in business. I couldn\'t believe how quietly the unit operated after living with a noisy fan and hard drive for so long. Bet it took only 10 or 15 minutes from start to finish....Thanks for helping put new life in my Tivo receiver.
2008-12-01
"Through your website, I was able to find out that the problem with my TIVO, was the Hard Drive. I ordered a hard drive, which arrived this AM. Your directions for removing the old hard drive and installing the new one were superb. The color version from your website made it even easier (#32). The Harddrive was replaced quickly, and what I feared would be an intimidating chore was actuallyquite easy.\r\nThank you again for your expertise and excellent step by step directions."
2008-11-26
"Thank You! After a disappointing call to Humax, I thought my DVR was kaput. I googled, hoping to find a local repair service. I was so happy to find your very easy to use website. After on quick phone call to WeaKnees technical service, I was hopeful that I could replace and upgrade the hard drive. The package arrived within 3 days and my husband installed the new hard drive within minutes. He was very complimentary of the easy to follow instructions. We are up and running again with a much improved DVR. Great job!"
2008-11-24
"Hello, I just could not let this experience go un told. First I google to find a place where I can have my Tivo serviced. Next..I find Weakness.com..a masterful website. Most websites will try to take your money first before either giving you alternatives or other options to resolve your problem. not Weakness.com. This site was remarkable. Not only was the site easy to navigate, but it was also very informative. I was able to narrow down my search to resolve my specific issue and as a result I ordered a power supply pack.\r\n\r\nI followed the instructions on how to remove my power supply in my Tivo and it was a simple as ABC. I believe a cave man could have followed those instructions they were so simple. Usually very technical issues you find that the people who are specialized in it find it difficult to simplify instructions for the average Jane and Joe, not Weakness.com the website and those that are responsible for it are masters of their trade.\r\n\r\nI am not savy with electronics but I walked away from this experience actually feeling like I learned something. I also emailed prior to my purchace and the response time was similar to a micro minute (lol) im kidding but it was so fast I almost thought it was an automated response until I emailed again and the email had more specific details to my question that only a human could have composed. I called the customer service sales department and spoke with a gentlemen (sorry I didnt get his name) who processed my order and he too was very polite, professional, efficient and knowlegeable as I asked him a few questions and he anwered them as he could without having the device in front of him. I want to thank him as well for adding to my wonderful experience. I hope there is a place where I can add my experience to a feedback or blog area. People should know about your website and I am sure they will have the same if not better (if thats possible-lol) experience.\r\n\r\nI will be sure to email back the results of the purchased power supply pack.\r\n\r\nYour company has a terrific team of web designers, instruction writers, and customer service (phone and email) representatives. Keep up the great work. I will definitly spread the word.\r\n\r\nP.S. The multiple pay options is also fantastic.\r\n\r\nThank You.\r\n\r\nHave a safe and pleasant holiday."
2008-11-20
"Hi!\r\nJust wanted to let you know how once again I\'m thrilled with Weaknees!  I received the remote right on time and it works great!  You are the GREATEST!!!!"
2008-11-20
"Guys/Gals\r\nJust wanted to say that I was completely skeptical about ordering a hard drive over the internal and actually getting it to work. I\'m psyched to say..it worked. Your instructions were incredible. Thanks you. Thank you. Thank you. \r\n\r\nScott"
2008-11-19
"Received it yesterday. It took less then 15 minutes to\r\nUpgrade. I went from 67 hours to 300 hours. Sweet!!!!\r\nNo problems at all. Thanks very much. I plan to recommend\r\nYou to my friends who have Tivo.\r\n\r\nthanks"
2008-11-13
"Thank you ,my order was received on time and when installed in the tivo per your upgrade instructions worked. I will recommend Weaknees to all my friends, you are a great company."\r\n
2008-11-06
"Thank you so much for the drive upgrade ! Half the price of a new Tivo, with double the capacity that I had. A couple of minutes, and up and running ! Thank you again !"
2008-10-27
"Just wanted to let you know I changed out the fan in my Tivo and it works great.  I printed out the directions from your website and completed the job.  Thanks especially for instructions in removing the cover.  I don\'t think I would have been able to do that without your instructions."\r\n
2008-10-15
"One of the easiest upgrades I have ever done. We received the drive on time as promised, and within a half hour, plus the guided setup time, we were sitting and watching TV again. Excellent!!!!"
2008-10-10
"I just want to say that I rec\'d the product the next day (Tuesday) and had it operational in minutes.\r\n\r\nWhat a positive experience with a company! You go on the GREEN side of my board of good and bad vendors!!!"
2008-10-07
"Just replaced my hard drive (15 Mins) with one of your units. I went from 35 hours to 231 hours. It is great! Thank you so much for Out Standing Service! and super fast deliver[]y. You have a life long customer."
2008-10-06
"Thank you so much for giving us our Tivo back. I was afraid that I would\r\nhave to purchase a DirecTv DVR, but we would rather continue watching "old\r\nfashioned" TV than HD on an inferior platform.\r\n\r\nEverything worked well, and we are very grateful that you saved us from the\r\nDirecTv DVR route. We are waiting for the Tivo HD DVR that is promised from\r\nDirecTv next year."
2008-09-29
"Just some comments:\r\nThe service was awesome! I got the product in just a few days to the Atlanta area.\r\nThe instructions were clear and very precise!\r\nThe Tivo/DirecTV HD 10-250 is now functional again and upgraded and works fine! I\'ll definitely use your company\'s products the next time one of my Tivo units go bad.\r\nThanks! Kin\r\n"
2008-09-17
"Just wanted to drop you guys a quick line telling you how much I appreciate your excellent service.  I ordered a power supply for a Series 2 DVR and it turned out that the power supply was not the problem with my unit.  Once I realized this I dreaded having to email or call and 1) try to explain what happened and 2) get info on how to return part and get credit.  My "dread" was unfounded as I went back to my original digital receipt and sent customer service an email.  I was shocked when I had an answer and an RMA in under an hour!  You have a loyal customer for life and I will continue to recommend you to friends and family."
2008-09-09
"We just wanted to write you to say a hug[e] Thank You! We ordered a new hard drive and fan to revive our no longer available Sony DirectTV Tivo combo box. Your product was exactly what you advertised, works perfectly and your installation instructions were superb. (My husband says using the lid as a platform to put the drive bay on was a stroke of genius).\r\n\r\nIt sounds so simple, but with a technology product, especially one that could be considered obsolete this could have been an ordeal. Your web site helped us diagnose the problem correctly the first time and the replacement went without a hitch. Not only that - now we have almost 3 times the storage space!\r\n\r\nWe cheered when we saw the little Tivo guy again! Thanks for doing a great job!"\r\n\r\n
2008-09-04
"Hi. Just wanted to say I\'m a 65 year old male and I just finished installing my Tivo upgrade kit. It took me about a half hour from start to finish. I guess I\'m not as fast as those younger guys who say they can do it in 20 minutes.\r\nAnyways, thanks for coming up with such a simple system. Hopefuly I will have room to record some of my programs now instead of all those programs for my 3 year old grandson. Thanks again it was a breeze and would recommend it to anyone."
2008-08-30
"A*M*A*Z*I*N*G!!!  That\'s all I say!  Our Directv TiVo "died"... looking at your website and emailing you, it was pretty clear the diagnosis was "bad hard drive".... the replacement with tools and instructions arrived within the week... and VOILA! in under 20 minutes we "non-techies" had it up and running... the hardest part?... disconnecting the TiVo from its nook in the entertainment unit!\r\nYou guys ROCK!  What a joy to deal with such a wonderful company/fabulous product!"
2008-08-29
"I just wanted to thank you for the information and service that you provide. I bought a new power supply for my Tivo it took about 20 mins to get my tivo was as good as new. Thank you"
2008-08-22
"My Series 2 TIVO recently stopped displaying video, the light on the front didn\'t come on, but the fan turned. I have lifetime service on it. I was pretty sure I was going to have to chuck it, along with the programs stored on the HD AND the lifetime service. Then a friend told me about you. I looked around, decided that maybe my power supply had died, and ordered one from you. It arrived in a couple of days, was even BETTER than the one I had picked out, and I was able to install it myself in about a half hour - and 15 minutes of THAT was trying to find the compressed air to blow out the dust bunnies! Voila, I fixed my TIVO, and saved my lifetime service (not to mention the Dodgers game where my friends were caught singing during the 7th inning stretch) - thanks to you, and your terrific website! Thank you so much! You really provide a great service.\r\n"
2008-07-24
"I wanted to thank you for producing such a great product. The service that we received when I called to find out if the item had shipped was helpful, efficient and professional. We received the new TiVo hard drive this afternoon and the installation was easy and quick. Overall, awesome service and product. Thanks. "
2008-07-21
"Thank you, Thank you!!! You saved me about $300. I was ready to throw out my Tivo unit because it stopped working. I found your website and you diagnosed the problem. I ordered a new and better hard drive, followed your easy to follow directions, and now I have a new Tivo unit. It was like changing a light bulb. Thanks again. You guys are responsive and helpful. Every Tivo owner should have your website handy.\r\n"
2008-07-19
" Hello,\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\nI just wanted to report that i ordered the replacement drive for my t2500, awesome. It worked just like you said it did. And the new disk is nice and quiet. The best buy I have made in some time. you guys sell a great product. thanks."
2008-07-18
"My tivo is back in excellent working order thanks for your external modem kit! Installation was a snap and took me only a couple of minutes. Works without a hitch. Highly recommended. Also, super fast shipping! Thank you."
2008-07-17
"You guys are great. Yet again you have saved the day and preserved my lifetime service. My modem went out and three days later everything is back up and running thanks to the replacement modem. A year or two ago I bought a hard drive whick worked perfectly (and still does)\r\n\r\nThank you."
2008-07-16
"Dear Friends,\r\n \r\nYou are the best.  From start to finish the entire experience was superb.  My TiVo works great again. Thanks,"\r\n 
2008-07-02
" Just wanted to say thanks for the super quick ddelivery and incredibly easy installation of my new hard drive for my Pioneer DVR/DVD. I appreciate the super clear instructions. I had the new hard drive installed within 10 minutes. If you can operate a screw driver, you can perform your own installation! Again, thanks!"
2008-06-29
"THANK YOU, for making it something in life so much easier to fix. My Tivo HD died, I ordered your replacement harddrive, a 10 minute swap and it was back up and running. Phenominal work! (you...not me...your the ones that did all the work...I mean I only spent 10 minutes doing simple step by step instructions a chimp without opposable thumbs could have done...so it was all you which is why it was so easy for me...a chimp with opposable thumbs and why I am now thanking you). Typing this email required more thought than your HD fix. Rock on! "\r\n
2008-06-20
"WOW!!! Thanks so much!!! Almost a heart attack!!! I ordered a new power\r\nsupply from you and 15 minutes later I am back in business!!! I had a bunch\r\nof stuff on the hard drive that I wanted to save to my pc that I thought was\r\nlost forever!!! About 6 screws later my Tivo is as good as new!! Now if I\r\ncan keep my wife from eyeing those expansion drives!!!\r\n\r\nYour service was A++++++++!!! Thanks so much!!\r\n"\r\n\r\n
2008-06-18
"My TiVo is back up and running, thanks! I was able to use the \r\ninformation on your site to determine that its power supply had probably \r\nfailed. I ordered a new one from you, put it in, and it\'s good as new."\r\n
2008-06-08
"Bravo! I installed a replacement HDD in my Humax Series 2 DVR and it worked\r\nperfectly the first time in all respects. Thanks for your great service,\r\nclear instructions and fairly priced product."\r\n
2008-05-27
"I received my new hard drive in the mail today and had my Series 1 \r\nTiVo up and running in 15 minutes- including the 7 minutes it took to \r\nget the case top off.\r\n\r\nYou guys are the best.\r\n\r\nThanks!"
2008-05-13
"I just received my new hard drive for a Toshiba TiVo/DVD recorder. Only 3 yrs old and the drive died. I ordered a new drive from Weaknees and it arrived overnight. I spent all of 20 minutes installing it, and my TiVo was up and running like old. I am VERY impressed, and love that I was able to increase my recording capacity. Your insturctions were crystal clear, and it couldn\'t have been simpler. Keep up the good work...."
2008-05-10
"Thank you very much.\r\nGot the Tivo from you. Went on line to Tivo.com. They presented me with the Lifetime option. I signed up for the Lifetime.\r\nEverything is working fine at this point.\r\nThanks again for the info."
2008-04-30
"Just wanted to thank you for all your assistance\r\nin replacing my Tivo HD. In less than 30 minutes I was up and running again. I will be a repeat customer and recommend you to all my friends."
2008-04-26
" I wanted to tell you about my experience. I ordered the hard drive kit for my toshiba sd-h400\r\nordering was easy, recieved it in 2 days as promised. Installed it in 15 minutes, was up and running in 40 minutes which included setup and down loading program info from tive.\r\n\r\nWhat a life saver no more blocks when watching tv. records fine, and I didn\'t even realize when I ordered it, that it had twice the capacity as my old one..What a deal....\r\nand I still have my free basic from tv which Is why I didn\'t want to just buy a new tivo.\r\n\r\nAgain thank you for such good service."\r\n\r\nWill definitly tell other about your company."
2008-04-18
" Got you replacement kit for my TIVO today and am enjoying my service once again. Thanks to you for your detailed instructions and for really making a new customer truly satisified."
2008-04-12
"I just wanted to write and say thanks for providing great service. Your web site is so well-organized that I was able to figure out which power supply to order for our Series 2 DVR while my wife and 2 kids were whining at me about the TiVo not working!\r\n\r\nI placed the order Sunday night, the part shipped Monday, and we had a working DVR on Wednesday. \r\n\r\nHappy family == good\r\n\r\nThanks"
2008-03-31
"Just wanted you to know how pleased I am with the upgrade hard drive you \r\nprovided for my TIVO which had stopped working. Installation took all of \r\n15 minutes, and the most time consuming part of the process was running \r\nthrough the start-up procedures with TIVO when I plugged the unit back \r\ninto the system! Anyone who has replaced or added a hard drive on a \r\ncomputer will find everything about the process very familiar.\r\n\r\nThanks for providing the service!"
2008-03-31
"Hi, Just wanted to let you know that your directions\r\nfor adding hard drive and fan to my tivo were\r\nperfect.I went from 80 to 260 hours recording. I will\r\ndefinitely buy fom you guys again.\r\nRegards,\r\nWalter"
2008-03-31
"I just upgraded my 80 hour series 2 with a 500GB drive and it was EASY! Good instructions, good packaging, good product - very well thought out for the consumer (and so few things are today). I now have over 650 hours so I can record my stuff AND let the kids keep 20 episodes of Elmo! Fantastic!"
2008-03-30
"After a power storm knocked out my old Pioneer Tivo DVD recorder, I assumed that the power supply had been damaged, but after talking to one of your techs on the phone, he felt confident it was actually a burned out HD. I checked around briefly but you clearly had the best prices and seemed to offer the best service and support, so I ordered the upgrade kit needed, and was pleasantly surprised to see it shipped that same day, and arrived in just a few days. The installation instructions were clear and easy to follow and in no time at all, my Tivo was booted up and running perfectly again. Thanks for your great service for all us Tivo fans! \r\n"
2008-03-28
" Having very easily upgrading my 8 year old Tivo with a new hard drive and power supply, I just wanted to say THANK YOU. The instructions were easy to understand. I did not want to lose my lifetime serivce and thanks to you everything is a-ok. Keep up the great work."
2008-03-28
" I just installed your replacement drive for my Directv Tivo unit and I couldn\'t be happier. My unit went out and I was trying to buy a new one but apparently Tivo and DirecTV no longer love each other and I was going to have to pay both companies unless I fixed the old one. For less than a new unit, I bought a replacement, installed it in about 15 minutes, and my life is good again. Thank you for such a great product."
2008-03-25
" I just wanted to tell you that the replacement hard drive Weaknees sent was installed by me and has worked flawlessly. My non-technically minded wife even watched me and said that it looked so easy to do that she could have done it....Thank you for a great and needed product and your available phone assistance."
2008-03-25
" Order received on 3/24. Excellent instruction. It took me only 10 minutes\r\nto replace the drive ( including vacuuming the dust and lint inside the TiVo\r\nbox). The unit power up without any problem. I will be glad to recommend\r\nanyone that needs replacement drive to Weaknees. Thank you."
2008-03-21
"Studied your web site to learn all about options. Ordered a replacement drive for my Tivo Series 2 (300mb). Old one failed to boot after extended shutdown. New one booted right up, everything works perfect. Super fast delivery at a fair price. Extremely well done and informative website!"
2008-03-03
" Thank you! Thank you!\r\n\r\nWhen I first ran across your company, I had my doubts. Mainly, I was fearful I would not be able to install the kit. (Not very mechanically inclined). To my surprise, the instructions were very clear and easy to follow. In fact, it took me longer to reprogram the TiVo than it did to install the upgrade kit.\r\n\r\nNow, instead of tossing the old one in the trash, and replacing it with a new one that would require purchasing a new contract, my family continues to use the original box with its life time service contract."
2008-02-27
" On Saturday night, my TiVo\'s (named Johnny) hard drive went down. After\r\ncalling TiVo customer service and having them tell me that I could get a\r\nreplacement unit for $149 but would not get the lifetime service carried\r\nover, I turned to an internet search and found Weaknees. Here it is\r\nWednesday night, and I have Johnny up and running again, with the\r\nlifetime service intact! The kit made it really easy to install, and I\r\nupgraded from an 80GB hard drive to a 300GB one. Weaknees is fabulous,\r\nand you saved Johnny\'s life! Thank you!"
2008-02-23
"I\'m out of the dog house! My wif[e] is hooked on her tivo and when the hard drive crashed. I needed to get it up and running in a hurry luckly I found you guys through a search and with your quick service all is back to norm in the house hold. keep up the great work! Your se[r]vice was nothing short of outstanding."
2008-02-20
" I just installed an added drive to my 2 tuner Tivo. (I have done 3 others in the past)\r\nI just wanted to comment to you on how good your instructions are. Probably the best of any instructions that I have used.\r\nI just installed a wireless rain gauge and the instructions were terrible."
2008-02-14
"Just to a note to thank you for your excellent service. The hard drive was a breeze to install,\r\nand now my Directv Tivo is working perfectly\r\nas new, except with more recording time!\r\n\r\nThanks for providing such a great service.\r\n"
2008-02-03
"Just a word to let you know that your external modem did the trick on my almost-dead TiVo HDR312 (Philips) box. Since I have Lifetime Service on this machine and now I can bypass my fried internal modem, I save myself $129 a year and another TiVo box. Awesome! Thanks.\r\n"
2008-02-02
"I emailed you guys about a week ago with a description of the problem I was having with my TiVo, fully expecting to have to buy a new unit. My email was answered within 30 minutes and I was advised to buy the external modem that ultimately fixed my Tivo! Thank you for the quick response, helpful diagnosis, and easy to follow instructions when the parts arrived. You guys rock!"
2008-01-31
"Just got a new power supply from you and I\'m back in business!! Thanks so much. Once a TIVO user, always a TIVO user. Good to know you\'re here. Some day I\'ll be getting a bigger hard drive, but not right now. YOU\'RE THE BEST."
2008-01-29
"Just wanted to thank you guys, you helped me determine that I had a bad \r\ndrive in my Pioneer 810H Tivo. I am a 76 year old guy, with limited experience in \r\nelectronics, was scared to death of a project of this nature, however, your \r\ndetailed instructions were EXCELLENT! We are back in business, my wife \r\nthinks I\'m a genius. I also hooked the unit to my network and am excited to \r\nexplore all the neat things I should be able to do with this system. Your ethernet \r\nadaptor worked just fine for this connection.\r\nThanks again\r\nGene "
2008-01-21
"You guys are \'XXXXing Awesome\'. After a week in discussion with the Best Buy Boys and reps from Tivo, confusion and dissatisfaction reigned. Located your website and against advise from everyone, ordered a replacement Hardrive. What a pleasure. It arrived on Frdiay at 4:30PM. Your easy instructions allowed me to install it in 5 minutes. It took about a half an hour for Tivo to re-setup, but we were cooking by dinner time and back recording again.\r\nTO ALL THE SKEPTICS - STOP WORRYING AND ORDER. I\'m recommending you to everyone. PS. Where to I buy stock in your company?"
2008-01-19
" I just wanted to say thanks for your help in reviving my Tivo. I emailed you on a Sunday, and was suprised to get a response in about an hour. You diagnosed a hard drive failure. I ordered an upgrade replacement kit, which arrived very quickly. It took about 15 minutes to install, from the time I cracked the case, until I tightened the last screw. Hooked it back up, and everything is working like it should. You were the only ones who gave me a straight answer. Everyone else I contacted just said " send it to us, and we\'ll fix it". I have two more Tivo units I plan to upgrade, and I will definitely buy the parts from Weaknees. Thanks again."
2008-01-17
"Well, being the pessimist that I am I was very dubious about purchasing my DirecTV disk upgrade from you since I found you from Google and had no previous knowledge of your business. After reading your entire website I was impressed by how thorough it was so I nervously made a purchase of my 160gb upgrade....\r\n\r\nThree days later your package arrived via UPS. I installed the new disk in about 10 minutes, the instructions were easy to understand and I cleaned the interior of dust and then held my breath while I turned my receiver on. I was amazed that my DirecTV TIVO worked perfectly the first time. Absolutely NO PROBLEMS. WOW! What can I say except THANK YOU for your great service and the great product upgrade for my Tivo.\r\n\r\nAnyone out there wondering if they should upgrade, my response is DO IT. These guys really do know how to make a great product and make customers happy."
2008-01-16
" I just wanted to drop you a line and thank you for my new TiVo HD. I\'d been itching to get one for some time, but I was hesitant because of the very short warranty period on the unit. When I noticed that for an extremely modest price the wizards at Weaknees would stand behind my system, the wait was over. I paid a reasonable price for a wonderful new toy that was very promptly shipped and will be protected by the best in the business. Thank you so much!"
2008-01-10
2007-12-25
"Like many of the comments that I\'ve found on-line, our tivo was developing issues (restarting, stuttering, freezing), very annoying. Solution: new receiver. Not. As you know new receivers have DVR\'s not Tivo. I did some research on the net and Tivo users do not like DVR. I am a long time customer of DirecTV and I like the program package I have. I also like my Tivo. I did a search on Google for "Tivo repair" and it came up with Weaknees.com. I admit I was leery but I read everything I could from your site and decided to take a chance. The directions didn\'t look that hard. I ordered a bigger hard drive and it came in yesterday. The directions I received with the up-grade kit were even better than the ones on-line and I had no problem switching the drives and restarting the system. My local channels did not show up but I read in my research that it may take a while. This morning when I turned it on, there they were. So I say again, Thank you, Thank you. This ex!\r\nperience was everything you and your customers said it would be. Merry Christmas."
2007-12-16
"When my TIVO-based DirecTv unit recently began to re-start at random, I knew I was in trouble. I suspected the hard drive was failing. Sure enough, the system soon reached a point where it would not re-start at all. I contacted DirecTv but all they would offer was to "lease" me a non-TIVO box. Since I seemed to have no other option, I tried the DirecTv system. However, it took only a few days of using their system to realize just how inferior it was in comparison to TIVO. It was like swapping your new Lexus for a Kia Rio! The thought that I had lost my TIVO was depressing and having to pay a monthly fee to lease the DirecTv system only added to my torment. I searched the internet in the hopes of finding another alternative. That was when I found the Weaknees web site. I ordered a hard drive replacement kit. When it arrived, it took less than 1/2 hour to install it and that includes giving the insides of my old system a complete cleaning with compressed air to remove the dust build-up. The instructions are simple. If you can read english and turn a screw, then you can install one of these kits. With the new hard drive installed, my old system roared back to life. It is even better than before since my new hard drive is 4 times larger than the old one that failed. I have already made arrangements to ship the non-TIVO box back to DirecTv. I want to thank Weaknees for their highly useful products. It is good to know that TIVO owners have a resource to fall back on if their equipment fails and are not left to the tender mercies of the cable and satellite companies."
2007-12-13
"Hi\r\n\r\nJust wanted to let you know that I received the replacement drive kit. It took about 10 minutes to install and booted right up without a problem.\r\n\r\nThank you very much for your fast shipping and great service!"
2007-12-07
"Howdy weaKnees:\r\n\r\nI ordered your 2 drive 260 hour upgrade kit & fan, for our Hughes GXCEBOT Tivo unit. I just wanted to let you know that I am most pleased to report that EVERYTHING you say about the ease of doing this upgrade is 110% TRUE ! !\r\n\r\nMy order was shipped almost before I place it, that is how fast your follow up was. In no time I had a UPS tracking number emailed to me, and I could follow it to my door. Which I did, and it got here as specified by UPS........\r\n\r\nUpon receiving the new drive kit, the hardest part of the job was unhooking the TiVo from the entertainment center and pull it out to do the installation.\r\n\r\nOnce I opened up the TiVo and took out the old drive, installation of the 2 new drives and new fan took just a few minutes to make the job complete. The instructions were easy to understand, but the job is so easy I barely even looked at them. (Just to make sure where the "A" and "B" drives belonged)\r\n\r\nAbout a half hour and the rig was hooked back up and downloading from the DirecTv satelites.\r\n\r\nWe now have a variable 259 hours capacity, up from the almost 40 we limped along with before\r\nlearning about weaKnees..........\r\n\r\nI can honestly say that no one should be afraid to tackle this upgrade, as it really is such a\r\n"no brainer" that anyone with the ability to turn a screwdriver ahould be able to master this really easy upgrade.\r\n\r\nAlso, this upgrade made a nice "extra" Holiday gift for my bride of 40 years. We now look at each other around this time of the year and ask what to buy a person who has all the toys they need. The same old question: What do you want for Christmas this year dear ? ? And all you get is shrug of the sholders and a blank deer in the headlights stare - - And an "I don\'t know" for an answer.........\r\n\r\nA TiVo upgrade is a heck of a lot better than a pair of slippers that don\'t fit or jewelery that always goes back.........This time around, she really loves the added capacity that this new TiVo upgrade has provided our machine. This year I\'m her HEEERO ! ! ! !\r\n\r\nPlus, during racing season we will now be able to record NASCAR races, F-1, Indy Car & CART and still have room for her soaps and other shows we want to save for later viewing, then we can blow through them almost commercial free - - What a deal ! ! ! !\r\n\r\nweaKnees, thanks for a super product line and super service - I am glad I found you on the net............Have a very Merry Christmas.\r\n\r\nKind regards"
2007-12-05
"I just ordered a power supply for my Series 2 DirecTivo and it worked great! DirecTV couldn\'t offer me any help, but thanks to your support forums, I was able to diagnose it as a bad power supply. I had previously upgraded this unit with your upgrade kit, and my wife had over 200 hours of shows on it - mostly for the kids. The fact that I got it back up and running in less than 3 days without losing any shows is awesome. Thanks again!"
2007-12-03
" I just wanted to let you know that I received the new\r\nhard drive and installed it in about 45 minutes. I\r\nwas extremely skeptical, but I am happy to say that it\r\ncompletely repaired my TIVO. Thank you very much.\r\nThe instructions are also very clear and easy to\r\nfollow."
2007-12-01
" I enjoy my Hughes HDVR2/TiVo very much. With 17 keyword searches, a half-dozen season passes and a M-F manual recording, it gets quite a workout. But recently, it\'s started giving me trouble - restarting by itself, locking up when the hard drive starts to get full, picture skipping during playback, etc. Not any fun for sure.\r\n\r\nAnd while I have a replacement contract with Best Buy, they don\'t offer this model receiver any more, and I didn\'t want to lose the TiVo service. So what to do? Well...\r\n\r\nLast weekend, I found WeaKnees on the internet, ordered a 140 hr replacement drive (arrived in 2 days) and I\'m back in business! Installed in minutes with the simple, easy-to-follow instructions - no muss, no fuss. You guys even provided the tools! Ya gotta like that. I have found THE difinitive source for everything TiVo and I will recommend WeaKnees to anyone and everyone I can.\r\n\r\nTo use the colloquial vernacular, you guys are the bomb! Best of the best, bar none."\r\n
2007-11-27
"I just got my new DVR hard drive from you. Installed it in minutes. You guys are amazing! The instructions were clear and simple and unit worked good as new. Thanks!"
2007-11-21
"I wasn\'t sure how to give feedback, but I wanted to be sure and thank you for such a painless experience. I\'ve had my Series 2 since 2004 and the poor 40GB drive was very very tired. I have the lifetime subscription and with your help - it\'s going to be a very very long lifetime!!! Thanks again - installation instructions - perfect; Time it took - 20 minutes; Overall Experience - 100% satisfied. Regards,"
2007-11-19
"Our TIVO stopped dialing out back in September and we were debating what to do. We had purchsed the lifetime package a few years back and did not want to start paying for it every month. All the info I had seen on-line talked about reprogramming the TIVO through your computer, soldering things to the motherboard and other seemingly impossible tasks for a novice. I finally found your site, ordered the external modem and just installed it in under 5 minutes. Our TIVO is now updating. We could not be happier!!! Your directions were so easy and friendly!! THANKS!!!!!!"
2007-11-18
"Just wanted to say thanks. You sent me an 80gb drive to upgrade my malfunctioning Tivo. 12 minutes after I unplugged the cables, I had the thing up and running and reconfiguring. Your instructions made it idiot proof!"
2007-11-17
" Hi to the good folks at Weaknees,\r\n\r\nThis week I emailed you a couple of times over some issues I was having with\r\nthe TiVo drive update process....Thanks to your help, the operation was a success. Happy endings\r\nare good....Your simple, direct responses serve both you and the\r\ncustomer well. I never felt talked down to - despite dealing with more\r\nelementary issues. I feel confident you would have kept the same approach if\r\nI had encountered more serious problems....In short, well done; keep up the\r\ngood work."\r\n
2007-11-10
" Just wanted to let you know how easy and thorough your instructions were to\r\nexchange my 40 gig hard drive with your 300 gig hard drive. I did not have any\r\nproblems and my wife is very happy since she had maxed out the 40 gig\r\ndrive. Thanks for a good product and good instructions.\r\n\r\nThanks"
2007-11-06
"Our Toshiba dvd/dvr crashed and thanks to your trouble shooting page, we were able to replace our hard drive and keep our lifetime subscription intact! Thanks for the information, it was installed and back in working order in 20 minutes. THANK YOU!"
2007-11-02
" Weaknees Team,\r\n\r\nI have a Toshiba DVD-Tivo. I can\'t live without it and when the hard drive went bad I was devastated. I called Toshiba\'s tech support and learned that I had to mail it in for repairs. A friend told me to check out Weakness where I purchased a replacement hard drive.\r\n\r\nI received the drive in TWO days using FREE ground shipping. That was the start of my delight. I immediately opened the new hard drive and followed the easy step by step instructions using the TOOLS YOU PROVIDED. And BINGO...I\'m up and running and my beloved Tivo is back from the dead!\r\n\r\nI just had to say THANK YOU!!!"
2007-10-31
" We\'d been having problems with our Toshiba TX20 for over 2 months..unplugging and rebooting when it would freeze up. We talked about a new Tivo machine and my wife reminded me that we bought this unit in 2004 from Weaknees and that your website indicates that our symptoms are pointing to a new HardDrive. We\'ll I ordered on Saturday of last week and today is Wednesday and I installed the new hard drive tonite and we\'re back in operation! Thanks for the toolkit and instructions to make this swapout a no-brainer!\r\n\r\nI wish you sold MORE electronic equipment!! I\'d buy ANYTHING from you guys!"\r\n\r\n
2007-10-11
" I just wanted to say that I received the hard disk for my Pioneer, and I was pleasantly surprised on how easy it was to replace the disk. All this because on how easy it is to follow your instructions. All I had to do after installing the disk was turn the Tivo on and off it went without a hitch.\r\nThanks again, I am placing a order for a disk for my other unit, and recommend you guys to all of my coworkers and friends."\r\n
2007-10-06
" I recently had a hard drive die on my Toshiba DVR/DVD burner combo. It was the second such event in three years, and I was not looking forward to having to pack up and ship the thing back to Toshiba. I surfed to your site, ordered a replacement drive, installed it myself and was Tivo-ing again in just a couple of days. The installation couldn\'t have been easier (did I mention that I\'m not tech savvy), and the documentation was superb!\r\n\r\nYou guys are great! I\'ll recommend you highly if I ever have the opportunity.\r\n\r\nthanks,"\r\n
2007-09-23
"I wanted to thank you. My Tivo hard drive died this week. Tivo would give an advance replacement, but it would have taken 3-5 business days to get here. Most of the shows we watch are starting this coming week. I was able to order a drive from you and have it here overnight. The installation was simple (and well documented) and I was back up and running in less than an hour, including running through the guided setup again. You guys are great! Thanks again."
2007-09-21
" Sorry it\'s taken me so long to give you feedback - Your modem (and cable)\r\nfor my TiVo worked perfectly - your installation instructions were detailed,\r\naccurate and easy to follow - dealing with your company has been nothing\r\nless than ideal - all companies should be as good and helpful as yours is\r\nand this would be a much better world. Thank You Very Much.\r\n\r\n\r\n\r\nSincerely,"\r\n
2007-09-21
" Thank you for making my Tivo hard drive replacement so easy. The hardest part was cleaning up all the built up dust inside the box from 5 years of use. Perfect instructions, totally as advertised. You guys are fantastic."
2007-09-21
"I received my replacement drive for my broken Hughes TiVo. Following your easy directions, it is back up and running better than ever! DirecTV had sent me a free DVR, but I spent the money with WeaKnees for the upgrade and am happier than a pig in .... well, you know. THANKS VERY MUCH FOR BEING THERE FOR ME!!"
2007-09-21
2007-09-19
"I called and talked to Max to let you all know how happy I am with your product. The hard drive arrived on Monday, the 17th, and when I saw how detailed and concise the instructions were I decided to try to install it myself instead of waiting the two weeks for my computer scientist son to do it. Well, everything couldn\'t have gone smoother. Not one glitch, and within a reasonable amount of time I had my TIVo up and running again instead of the 5 weeks that Philips was going to have it if I had mailed it off to them.\r\n\r\nSo thank you all again and especially a big thank you to Mick for his encouragement in telling me that he felt confident that I could do it myself. For a 63 yr. old electronically challenged person, I\'m pretty pleased with myself. . .thanks again, guys. . .Carol"
2007-09-18
" My 4 yr old Series2 Tivo hard drive died this past weekend. I searched the internet and found you guys. The website and wealth of information provided was impressive. Based on this and reading a few excellent reviews, I placed an order for a replacement drive on Sunday afternoon. It arrived Wednesday and within 10 minutes I had my Tivo hooked up again. It took me longer to go through Tivo\'s setup than it did to swap hardrives and hook it back up. The new drive is much lighter and significantly quiter than the old one. I couldn\'t be happier with my purchase decision. Keep up the great work!"
2007-09-15
"We ordered a Tivo Hard Drive and a new fan. We received it and \r\ninstalled it (thanks to your excellent directions) and it works \r\ngreat. We\'re so pleased. Just had to let you know. Will do \r\nbusiness with you again.\r\nThanks"\r\n
2007-09-14
"Last week I contacted your technical folks about my problem with my Pioneer DVR-810H. Your representative demonstrated a thorough understanding of the situation (better than Pioneer), provided me a coherent choice of options, rationale for the choice of options, and ways to save money and get better quality products and features. He suggested the harddisk upgrade kit and assured me that the installation would be very straightforward (which it was). I dealt with many customer service technical representatives in the past (I\'m an Engineer) and your person who supported me...was fantastic. So good, that it motivated me to seek out writing you about it. I will definitely recommend your company to others. Too bad more companies do not hire quality workers like you do. I am just emailing you to say thanks and please let the technician know that he was wonderful. Thanks again," 
2007-09-08
" After the power went out last weekend our HR10-250 seemed dead. I went to\r\nyour sight and you guys suggested a power supply replacement. So I ordered one\r\non Thursday and received it on Friday. We installed it on Saturday (a few\r\nminutes ago) and bingo it works! Thanks to your fast shipping and excellent\r\nadvice, Sunday football will be in High Definition brilliance. You guys rock!\r\nIf you ever need an endorsement I would be happy to post.\r\n\r\nA Happy Boy,"\r\n
2007-09-07
"My DirecTivo HD was dying and causing several resets a week, I got online ordered a replacement and you had it here on time and quick. It was a fast and easy process that gave me peace of mind for the upcoming fall TV season that my TiVo will not fail, plus to boot I double it\'s storage size.\r\n"
2007-09-06
"Just wanted to let you know how easy it was to upgrade my Tivo. My kids\r\nbought me a Toshiba SD-H400 a few years ago for Christmas. When the hard\r\ndrive crashed a few months ago, I was ready to toss it in the trash.until I\r\nfound out about you guys. I doubled the size of the original drive and it\r\ntook ten minutes to swap out the drive. Great product!\r\n"
2007-09-05
" Hi\r\nI just wanted to let you guys know that you ROCK!!! I love my newly\r\nupgraded 670 hour tivo! Seriously, your customer service was fantastic and\r\nI am recommending you to all my friends."\r\n
2007-08-23
"I have replaced the original hard drive in my RCA DVR40 with the 300gb TIVO upgrade kit. I would like to make two comments. It was easy! I am happy!"
2007-07-31
"I want to thank you guys for offering such excellent service. Installed my new 500gb HD and fan last night at 9 pm. When I had a question arise; I emailed your staff [and] was blown away when I received a reply five minutes later! It took me about an hour to complete the install. My TiVo has been in operation since December of 2002 and needed to be blown out with canned air before starting the upgrade. Your sales person suggested I have canned air on hand and it was an excellent idea. I would recommend that step for anyone whose TiVo has been setting on a shelf for a considerably long time. I am a 60 yr. old female.....so if I can [accomplish] the [TiVo] upgrade....ANYONE can!\r\n\r\nYou[r] company is awesome."\r\n
2007-07-30
"That you very much for such expeditious service. Your response far exceeded\r\nmy expectations and my TIVO is up and running again. Thank you so much\r\nagain and I am continuing to notify others who I know who have TIVO in your\r\ndirection. Sincerely,"
2007-07-27
" MY TIVO LIVES AGAIN !!!\r\n\r\nI recently got a replacement drive for my TIVO...Thanks to you, I did not [lose] my lifetime service AND I was able to upgrade to 300 hours. All I can say is BRAVO !!!! The instructions were easy. It took me 20 minutes to un-hook everything and put in the new drive...... A new set up, and I was rolling once again..Total time from unplugging to watching TV was one hour.....So easy a caveman can do it !!!!"
2007-07-26
"I received my replacement hard drive quickly and installed it in about 15\r\nminutes. My TIVO now works as it should. Thank you very much."
2007-07-26
" WeaKnees,\r\nWell that was a very pleasant experience! I ordered the expansion kit (500\r\ngig drive) on Tuesday; got it on Wednesday (I live close); installed it\r\nWednesday afternoon (about 1 hour and 15 minutes) and after 5 minutes of\r\nsignal searching I was up and running. Great kit and excellent\r\ninstructions!!\r\nThanks again,"\r\n
2007-07-23
"You guys are great!!! I am a Tech idiot. I was able to install the new hard drive I just purchased from you in 10 min. Not only that but ordering the hard drive was a breeze. How often do you get instructions from a box that actually are clear and easy to understand? Plus I lost the instructions that came in the box and right there on your site in plain view and easy to find; I was able to download the full instructions on the spot. You have no idea how happy you have made me. I have a second Tivo that has just been sitting in the den unused due to being fried by a storm. It will now be repaired as I will be ordering again. You people out there don\'t be afraid to do this. It is easy! I don\'t ever remember being this happy with any company!!!!!!!"
2007-07-10
" I recently upgraded to a Series 2 80 hour TiVo. After adding all my Season Pass entries and having many of them indicate that there was not enough room to keep everything, I contacted you.\r\n\r\nI now show \'variable 367 hours\' which is totally awesome!\r\n\r\nThank you for the upgrade kit. It was quick and easy to install."
2007-07-06
"I received my replacement drive last night. The install instructions were thorough and I was able to replace the drive and start the setup process within a half-hour. It was really great seeing the recording capacity was \'variable, up to 507 hours\' in the system info too.  Thanks for your great service."
2007-06-17
"We\'ve had our Tivo for about 3 years and started having problems connecting. Thank goodness we found your company online and were able to order the super-easy-to-install modem that works perfectly! Your product saved the day and made a great Father\'s Day gift!"
2007-06-15
"We lost one of the last R10\'s DTV gave out in a fire in Sept 2006. We replaced it with one from Weaknees as DTV forced us to use a R15. Thank you so much for keeping us in the tivo family! \r\n\r\nI still laugh when I see my R10 record something and the R15 chooses not to. \r\nApparently the R15 can\'t read the same data that I and the R10 see in the guide!"
2007-06-15
"Hi. I just wanted to tell you that I upgraded my tivo with your add kit and it was great! It was so easy to do and the instructions were very easy to follow. Thank you for such a great product!"
2007-06-14
"THANK YOU for restoring my directv with tivo. They don\'t make them anymore and we hated the substitute DVR that comes with new directv receivers. We just couldn\'t afford a new HD TIVO at $699 on sale, and I didn\'t think fixing ours was possible. We gave up hope.\r\n\r\nBut I used your forums to diagnose the problem, ordered a replacement hard drive, installed it and voila! Tivo again.\r\n\r\nThe instructions were the very best I\'ve ever received with a techie product, and it was easy to install. \r\n\r\nNow if I could only get directv to accept their crummy receiver back and not charge me for leasing it, I would be a happy girl. \r\n\r\nThank you for a great product that restored joy to our home"
2007-06-05
"Without a doubt, this has been the best experience I\'ve ever had for repair service - of any kind! I shipped my ailing TiVo box on Tuesday, and had it back on Friday, ready to use. \r\nIn comparison, the store from which I bought it (still under warranty, by the way), gave me a turn around repair time of 3 weeks to 2 months! \r\nYou have an incredibly efficient business operation, and I highly recommend your services. Thanks so much."
2007-05-31
" I should have upgraded sooner!\r\n\r\nIt took all of 12 minutes for me to do the upgrade.\r\n\r\nInstructions were great. Very clear with good pictures for examples.\r\n\r\nI hate to think of all the time I have wasted managing my recordings on our old 40 gig drive.\r\n\r\nThanks for a great service."
2007-05-23
"You guys are great. Quality parts, excellent documentation and\r\nsupport. I tell everyone I know (that has a Tivo) about you. Keep\r\nup the excellent work.\r\n\r\nBest,"
2007-05-22
"Just wanted to tell you how completely satisfied--no, flat-out impressed--I am with my new drive. To think that I delayed doing this for longer than I needed to...ugh.\r\n\r\nThe drive arrived promptly; your directions were detailed to the point of being excessive; the install took me abou 10 minutes and was SIMPLE...when I powered up again I was at the guided setup stage. From the time I opened the package until I was recording again was less than an hour.\r\n\r\nI would (and will) recommend this service to anyone."
2007-05-16
"wow, thank you for this wonderful product, it could not have been\r\neasier and works great!"
2007-05-11
" Please just use my initials, and this more detailed review:\r\nWhen my R10 crashed, in order to keep Tivo (a must!) I was afraid I\'d\r\nhave to either go to the dark side (cable) if I wanted dual recording,\r\nor stay with satellite but lose the dual recording. I tried eBay to\r\nreplace it, but got snaked out twice. Luckily, when I lost the bids I\r\nfound weaKnees as a sponsored link.... Their fabulous Customer\r\nService was able to diagnois the problem over the phone and shipped the\r\nR10 hard drive immediately. I received it in 2 days and not only was I\r\nable replace it in 10 minutes, but triple its capacity as well....THANK YOU, weaKnees!\r\n\r\nThanks!"
2007-05-01
"Sirs:\r\n\r\nI just wanted you to know how very pleased I am with your service.\r\n\r\nI simply could not ask for more - orders are acknowledged quickly, tracking information is provided, along with tools and instructions.\r\n\r\nYou breathed new life into my exhausted Tivo.\r\n\r\nYou are offering a valuable service and doing a great job at customer service.\r\n\r\n- Keep up the good work!"
2007-04-27
"Just wanted to let you know that I\'m very pleased with the 160 Gb hard drive \r\nthat I just bought from Weaknees. It replaced our blown hard drive from our \r\nToshiba sd H400 (I also diagnosed this problem from the troubleshooting \r\nportion of your website), and I was so excited that it only took me 10-15 \r\nminutes to install. TiVo powered up with no problem! Thanks so much!"
2007-04-25
"Just thought I\'d let you know, I replaced the drive on my TiVo last night\r\nwith a 250 gig unit. I\'m happy to say, it went just as advertised, very\r\neasy, and everything is working great. I was very impressed with your\r\nservice and the completeness of the instructions. Thanks!"
2007-04-23
"Once again, you all have saved my life. As sad as it is that my life is defined by Tivo, I embrace it. Recently you revived my dead DirecTV Philips RS6000 dual-tuner unit. I had suffered miserably with an R15 for a week and the pain was unbearable. thankyouthankyouthankyou for sparing me further torture and relieving me of this crappy r15 and restoring my RS6000 to life. I am so, so,so very happy now. Please feel free to use me as a reference. I\'ve never been a customer of a company as wonderful as WeaKnees. You guys rock."
2007-04-20
" I just got my order delivered ... replaced a dead TiVo drive for a Samsung no longer sold.\r\n\r\nExcellent. Fast shipment, fast install, and is working perfectly as I write. Who knew it was so simple? I wish I could have found out about you guys when my Ultimate TV died a few years ago.\r\n\r\nI\'m so glad I didn\'t have to give up my ability to record 2 sat feeds using TiVo; nor did I have to go with the leased DirecTV unit that is getting murdered in reviews (let alone fork out the leasing fee)....\r\n\r\nThanks again."
2007-04-19
" I want to thank you for the above referenced order. It arrived sooner than expected, was well packed and worked like a charm. I had a Directv w/Tivo that went out on me and I did not know about Weaknees and threw it away and bought a new DVR from Directv; it was miserable and as soon as I learned I could buy a box from you I ordered. Now I an back to loving my Directv service again and the box from Directv is in the bedroom, where I mostly just use the pause live TV feature, so it is not nearly as frustrating as when I relied on it for full features. Thanks for keeping Tivo alive for us Directv subscribers."
2007-04-12
"Just a note to ket you know how PLEASED I am with my order.  Instructions were great, help on the phone was terrific, and the product is just what I was looking for.  Now I can record all the movies, shows, etc that I want to without being told I have to delete something.  Thanks again for being there."
2007-04-12
"OK - I rarely feel compelled to praise a company or its service, but \r\nWeaKnees has gone far beyond my expectations. After dealing with \r\nboth DirecTV and TiVo themselves, I realized my only option was to \r\npurchase a replacement drive for my existing unit. I spoke to your \r\nsales department who advised me on the right equipment to buy, and \r\nthe installation was easier than ever anticipated. However, the \r\n\'real\' customer service came into play when I needed post-sales \r\nJason was not only happy to help \r\nimmediately, but fixed the problem personally and efficiently.\r\n\r\nTo be blunt - if you were a publicly traded company, I would buy stock!"
2007-04-11
" Hi Guys, Just wanted to send you a quick note to thank you for a great\r\n product at a fair price.\r\n \r\n This is my third purchase from you. Two R10 upgrades and one Sony SAT60\r\n upgrade. All have completed without a hitch and work perfectly from the\r\n start.\r\n \r\n Thanks Again,\r\n \r\n Andrew"
2007-03-21
"Hello. I just wanted to thank whoever helped me on this. I asked a few questions before I ordered and you guys were right on with diagnosing the problem with my tivo. Your installation instructions were easy to follow and the whoe hard drive change took 5 minutes. I couldn\'t be happier that i don\'t have to use the POS DirecTV Plus DVR that I got. Thank you so much. If anyone I know ever has a problem with their tivo, I\'ll have them contact you."
2007-03-20
"Hi there,\r\n\r\nA little feedback. I ordered a replacement tivo fan from you guys a\r\nfew weeks ago, and it came pretty quickly. Before I opened the\r\npackage, I started rummaging through my tool box looking for some\r\ntorx bits. Couldn\'t find any, so I thought I would take one of the\r\nscrews out of your package to the hardware store to match up to a\r\ntorx bit I would need to purchase. Of course I was thrilled to see\r\nyou had included two torx allen wrenches in your package when I\r\nopened it up. In addition, you included a note for installation\r\ninstructions that could be found on the website.\r\n\r\nI just wanted to say thanks for the extra touches that made the\r\nreplacement of the fan quick and easy!"
2007-03-10
"Thanks, you guys are real pros.  I recently purchased a kit to repair my damaged Tivo.\r\nYour website provided excellent info/troubleshooting and identification of my Direcv Tivo problem.The fact that if it wasn\'t the problem you would accept a return (only costing me the restocking fee) was very reassuring.  The directions were super easy to follow and including the tools was a great touch.  Literally got my Tivo "repaired" in about 7 minutes.  Ordered on Thursday and repair kit arrived Friday..just in time for all the races!\r\n\r\nI just so happy that we diddn\'t have to switch to the "DirecTV brand DVR becuase in our eyes its no match against Tivo.\r\n\r\nThanks again"
2007-03-09
"I just wanted you to know that the replacement fan arrived today, is installed and works perfectly.  Thank you again for your very prompt service and PROMPT replies to my customer service questions.  It\'s great to have the assembly tools included with the order, your instructions are perfect - easy to read, easy to follow.  I couldn\'t be happier with the overall experience of dealing with your company.\r\nBest Regards,"\r\n
2007-02-28
"I purchased a Single 160gb Add TiVo Upgrade Kit and i am very pleased. The directions were as simple as they get. Thank you for a wonderful product. Thank you for a easy directions to install. Thank you Thank you Thank you."
2007-02-17
"I bought the 80GB second drive kit as a Valentine\'s present for my wife (plus roses and chocolate, of course), and just finished installing it.  What a treat!\r\n\r\nAs a professional computer technician, I was expecting to use my skills for this kit, but, no need!   The instructions were great, and I would recommend this kit to practically anyone.\r\n\r\nI especially appreciated the finer touches, like the way that the screws were packaged together, rather than thrown in with everything else.\r\n\r\nOne never knows what they will get from a mail order kit, but this kit reminded me of the old Heathkit projects, very well thought out.\r\n\r\nYou may want to know that I found out about Weeknees from Leo Laporte, on one of his podcasts.  Anyway, thanks again!"
2007-02-14
"Thank you sooo much for making my hard drive replacement so quick and easy. I now not only have a bigger recording capacity but my beloved Directivo is back up and running like it was brand new. I will recommend Weaknees to all my friends and colleagues. Thank you for your excellent customer service."
2007-02-14
"You guys rock!  I don\xef\xbf\xbdt know if you guys every take a break from putting these kits together to check the news but the NE has a vicious ice storm today.  Since I had nothing else to do I figured it would be a great day to potentially be without my Tivo and set about to installing my upgrade.  It was done in about 30 minutes and it all works perfectly.  100% the very first time that I powered it up.  This is such a change from the last Tivo upgrade.  I even followed the undocumented 13th step and put the little \xef\xbf\xbdupgraded by weaknees\xef\xbf\xbd sticker on the outside so my friends will know where to find you.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nThanks again for the well documented instructions and a great product at a reasonable price."
2007-02-14
"Thanks for a great product!\r\nVery clear and concise instructions.\r\nWorked great and took only a short time .\r\nI spent more time cleaning the interior and fan of my pioneer 810H of dust buildup than it took to do the replacement of the hard drive.\r\nSet up worked flawlessly and I have all of my recording "to do list" back to normal and am enjoying the benefits of Tivo again.\r\nThanks again."
2007-02-10
"I just wanted to congratulate you on great service and a flawless drive replacement experience.  The HD in our Tivo failed Thursday night, I ordered a replacement kit on your web site that night, you shipped it Friday and it arrived Saturday.  Installation was flawless and we are back up and running without the sweat and trials of trying to image the old disk, etc.  Having a drive arrive all prepared with softwarer loaded is clearly worth the few (and it really is just a few) more dollars than the cost of a bare drive alone.  Thanks!"
2007-02-07
"Just wanted to come back and thank you guys for making me a happy camper and allowing me to tell DirecTV exactly what they can do with their R15 lemon unit.  Thanks to you, I have my Hughes DirecTivo back in operation and I have had no problems at all!  The installation was fast and the instructions were so clear and simple to follow that I had the unit back up and running in less than 20 minutes.\r\n\r\nTHANKS SO MUCH!!!!"
2007-02-05
"I just finished adding a second drive to my Directivo and it work flawlessly. Thank you for providing such a great product and detailed, yet straight forward instructions."
2007-02-02
"THANK YOU!!!\r\nI just wanted to drop you a note and let you know that I received the drives on Wednesday, I installed last night and now I\'m enjoying my upgraded Tivo!\r\nThe installation was easier than I thought. Everything fits as it should and the instructions were spot-on.\r\n \r\nThank you again...\r\n"
2007-02-02
"Thank you gentleman for getting me up and running before superbowl. I have a working HR10 250.  I thought there was no way!  Also thanks to the guys at DBSTalk who turned me onto WEAKNEES."
2007-02-01
"Awesome site!  Awesome products!  Thanks a bunch!  Got my update kit this afternoon.  Finished installation a half hour later.  My Tivo is reborn!!!\r\n"
2007-01-26
"Just to let you know, I got my new HD in 2 days as promised.  Took 10-15 minutes to install.  Very simple.  My TIVO works again, only this time with a monster size HD.  Thanks again...."
2007-01-24
"Hi WeaKnees,\r\n\r\nI just got an add on hard drive for my TiVo and although I was a little intimidated at first by taking my time with your detailed directions I now have [up to] 163 hours of recording space!  Thanks for the great product!"
2007-01-22
"Recently our Tivo machine died a slow death.  We ordered a Tivo Upgrade Kit and replaced the hard drive.   It was easy to do and it now works wonderfully!!!  We are so happy that we found WeaKnees!  We love our Tivo and the new machines are no longer "linked" with Direct TV.  We couldn\'t find anyone to fix our machine and we were really starting to bum out, but your company saved us!!  Thank you so very much!!"
2007-01-20
"Thanks to your tech/sales staff for inspiring confidence and getting me \r\nexactly what I needed.  I was not psyched at the prospect of loosing my \r\nProduct Lifetime Subscription when my Series 2 Tivo failed.  You guys \r\ngot me a new 250g drive overnight as promised and it took less than ten \r\nminutes to swap it out!  Back in business with three times the \r\nrecording capacity..... and still no monthly fees!!"
2007-01-19
"Hi,\r\nI ordered an upgrade kit on Wed. and chose the 2 day shipping option.  I wasn\'t really sure if you would get it processed and shipped in time so I\'d receive it by Friday, but you did.  Thanks!!\r\nI\'ve installed several hard drives in computers so I was pleased to discover that installing your kit was much, much easier to do than that.  The instructions and photos were clear and simple to understand.\r\nIt\'s great to have my Tivo running again.  And now it has twice the capacity as before!!  Thanks again for a great product and great service."
2007-01-17
"Just a quick note to say how absolutely completely satisfied I am with my transaction with you folks.  I have completed the upgrade and everything is proceeding beautifully.  I have a lot of experience, so your instructions were not so necessary for me, but I was impressed with the level of detail and obvious concern for those with less [or no] experience you provided.  I would heartily recommend you without any reservation to anyone who wants to keep their old Tivo going and give it new life!\r\n \r\nCongratulations on doing everything just right!"
2007-01-17
"I had to take a few minutes to write to you in order to express my gratitude for offering a product that successfully resurrected my TiVo. you see, my TiVo\'s hard disk had failed, so I needed a replacement disk with the TiVo software pre-loaded. your ready to install and use upgrade disk drive arrived on time, as guaranteed by UPS, and was mind-boggingly simple to install. within minutes I had resurrected my DirecTV/Hughes TiVo and was recording TV shows for my wife. YOU SAVED ME FROM A LOT OF EAR TORTURE (which would have been administered by my wife had she missed the season premiere show of American Idol). \r\n\r\nthanks a million!"
2007-01-17
" Oh my goodness! I can\'t believe this worked as easily as it did. The time is 8:42pm and I started to install my new hard drive at 8:20. It took longer to reconnect all the a/v cables to my born again Tivo than it did to install your replacement drive. What you have here my friends is an invaluable service. If I ever run into someone with a similar problem or is looking to upgrade, I will not hesitate to refer them to the company with the funny name...www.WeaKnees.com.     \r\n \r\n  Also, thank you for the decal which is proudly displayed on the face of my Tivo!"
2007-01-16
"My RCA DVR 40 seized up and was replaced by DirecTV with their R15 piece of you-know-what.  I was inquiring with TiVo about what I had to do to be able to use their product and was verging on going back to cable when the saleswoman said to check on EBay for another unit.  From there I checked on Yahoo shopping and found you.  I have just installed my new 80 gb hard drive and can\'t believe I\'m back in business!  It was a nightmare having that R15 in my house.  My dog that\'s afraid of fireworks and things that click wouldn\'t even stay in the same room with it because the remote, which is very insensitive, made clicking noises.  Nightmare over, thanks!!!!"
2007-01-15
"Just a quick note to tell you I am a happy customer. I have 4 TIVO\'s and the oldest gave up the hard drive. So, I ordered from you and it installed in less than 10 minutes and now it is back up and running GREAT! Excellent instructions and fast service. I am sure that I will be needing to contact you in the future for the other three TIVO\'s, but hope it is sometime yet!"
2007-01-14
"I stumbled across your site when I googled HR10-250 to see about replacing my defective unit.  Exploring your site I came across your troubleshooting section.  Here I discovered my problem described exactly as it was.  I immediatedly followed your recommendation and  ordered your hard drive upgrade.  Upon receipt of your shipment, I installed the hard drive without even reading the directions.  It was unbelieveably easy and my Tivo now works better than it ever did.  Your hard drive appears to be of higher quality than the stock driver which came with my unit. THANK YOU SO MUCH.  YOU PEOPLE ARE THE BEST.  "
2007-01-13
"Dear Folks at Weaknees,\r\n    My directv tivo began to die a short while ago.  Thanks to your excellent troubleshooting web site areas, I was able to determine it was the hard drive.  I ordered a new larger one from you. I was so pleased with the speedy arrival and the great directions and pictures....The installation went without a hitch and I was back in business within minutes.  Thanks for the great product and directions!!!"
2007-01-11
"after asking around a few places here and finding nobody who could fix my hughes tivo that i got in 2003, i decided to fix it myself....going through your troubleshooting page i discovered i needed a new hard drive. \r\n   i ordered one and after only 2 days it arrived.\r\ni found that taking out the old one and installing the new one was very easy and trouble free. i reconnected it and after calling directv the newly installed hard drive in my old tivo worked perfectly!! absolutely no problems!  thanks guys you are the greatest! i cant believe i figured out the problem and fixed it all from your website!  you could color me a very satisfied customer!!!"
2007-01-07
"Just wanted to let you know how impressed I was with the easy to follow instructions you provided with the upgrade I purchased.  I was skeptical at first, cause I\'m not the type of person who opens anything electronic, but my Dad assured me that your directions were idiot prood (as he called it) and that even a blond like myself could do it.  He was right!  I intend to buy another upgrade kit in the near future for my second TIVO.  Thanks!\r\n"
2007-01-06
"I was totally impressed and satisfied with my experience working with your company.  Usually I spend more time looking into different companies before making a purchase, but all of the information and feedback on your site made me feel entirely comfortable proceeding with my purchase.  My new hard drive was easy to install because of your clear and thorough instructions, and the DVR is working perfectly.  Thanks also for providing the information about how it make take a few hours for local channels to return via DirectTV."
2006-12-27
"I would like to send you this quick email to let you know what a great experience I have had with your company.  Your website was very easy to navigate and full of info.  Your trobleshooting guide had my problem perfectly discribed and your instructions are very clear and easy to fallow.  It took me less than 20 minutes to install my Tivo Upgrade Kit.\r\nI saved your web page in my favorites and fowarded you web page to all my family and friends that have Tivos.\r\nKeep up the great work."
2006-12-24
"I just installed your 350 hour upgrade to my Humax Tivo unit. You provid the clearest instructions I have ever used. The installation was a snap. Thanks for supplying an excellent product."
2006-12-19
"Thank You Weaknees.  I just installed... no wait; my 9 year old just installed the new 300HD drive in my HR10-250HD.  It works great.  My TIVO is back.  I am so thankful I found you!  Thanks again."
2006-12-18
"Thank you, it has been a pleasure.  On complaint, however.  I set aside an evening to do this upgrade.  You should have warned me it would only take 10 minutes.  All that free time and nothing planned.  Oh well. LOL\r\n\r\nThanks again."
2006-12-16
"Hi!  I just wanted y\'all to have another great review for your product and services!  I ordered a 140 GB hard drive from y\'all on Wednesday and received it and installed it by Friday.  The directions could not have been more clear and the DirecTivo is already recording programs.  I thought I would be stuck with the new R15 and you guys have totally rescued me!!  Thanks for a great product!"
2006-12-15
"I received my Tivo upgrade hard drive today. I installed it and am back online again. I thought the unit was done for because the original drive totally died. I had no way of getting another drive or the information back. I ordered your large drive replacment and it works great.  I couldn\'t be happier with your product and services.\r\n\r\nThank You Very Much !"
2006-12-13
"Just wanted to tell you how pleased I was in your company. I used your Troubleshooting page to learn I had a bad Power Supply for a TCD140060. I ordered it with the Torx Keys, received them in 3 days, yes, I had weakness and Dry Mouth, however, your directions and pictures were perfect. Changed the Power Supply out in 20 minutes and it took me longer to hook all my rat nest wires back up.\r\n\r\nThanks again and I also am now enjoying your Weaknees TiVo Forum too."
2006-12-12
"I know you guys receive a lot of these, but just let me add one more. Your upgrades are AWESOME! I just installed your pre-formatted Seagate 750GB DB35 drive in my Series 3, and, I know this sounds like a cliche, but it truly was a snap! From the time I cracked the case on my S3 until I was finished took no more than 30 minutes. Then I just ran guided setup again (maybe another 20 minutes), and I was in business! This drive is quiet as a church mouse, and I now have nearly 100 hours of HD capacity and over 900 hours of SD capacity. Thanks WK!!"
2006-12-07
"I just replaced my 40 hr. (had problems) drive with a new 160gb 140 hr. drive in my hughes SD-DVR40. everything was right on the money. the shipping was on time, the installation was simple and tonight i\'m back in action with my hughes running. in the last 2 months i have went through 2 R-15\'s and i\'m currently waiting for my third to arrive in the mail due to constant problems. my whole weaknee\'s expirence has been excellent!!!!!"
2006-12-03
"Thank you, Thank You, Thank You!!!!!    I just replaced the hard drive \r\nin my SVR-2000.  It could not have been easier!  The directions were \r\nexcellent!!!  The hardest part was taking off the cover and putting it \r\nback on. The directions were very specific about how to accomplish this \r\ntoo. I just ordered another one to fix my mom\'s Tivo.  Again Thanks"
2006-11-28
"On the 23rd of November I ordered a pre-loaded 80Gb replacement drive for my Hughes HDVR2 DirecTV Tivo. My drive arrived Monday, it was well packed and good condition. The drive installed with no problems using the provided tools and booted properly the first time. After DirecTV assigned the access card and a few more setup procedures I was back up and running and programming all of old season passes. Thank you for the prompt delivery of a fine product which worked as advertised."
2006-11-26
"Great service!  I received the fan yesterday. It is installed and working great. Thanks for helping me with this problem. I would gladly recommend your company."
2006-11-24
"Thank you!  The disk arrived promptly and was easy to install.  My TiVo is back up and running.  Now I can send the DirecTV LEASED machine back to them.  I refuse to be bullied by DirecTV.  Thank you very much for your prompt reply to my inquiry and shipment.\r\n\r\nregards,"
2006-11-24
"You guys are great !\r\nFirst you send me the CORRECT replacement remote which works right out of the box. Next you include the liitle card which tells me about programing the 30 second skip which we love ! Thank you and Keep up the outstanding customer service\r\n                                                                                                                    regards,"
2006-11-15
"The first time I used WeaKnees I had them upgrade my Sony series 2 because I was hesitant about doing it myself. The unit was only a few weeks old and I figured it was safer to have them do it. About 4 years later the picture began to freeze up intermittently and I decided to replace the hard drive. When I asked WeaKnees about shipping the unit back to them, they explained how easy it was to change the drive myself and it would save me money and time. Now that I wasn\'t dealing with a brand new unit I figured I would take a chance and do it myself. I couldn\'t believe how easy their step by step instructions were. I fixed it myself and it up was up and running in about a half hour.\r\n\r\nIn October I ordered a Series 3 with the 750GB hard drive from them. Like other people, mine had the noisy hard drive problem. I called WeaKnees and they e-mailed me a free UPS shipping label. My unit was repaired and shipped out the same day that they received it. By the way, I left both cable cards in the unit when I shipped it back to them (NYC to LA). Today it arrived and when I plugged it in I didn\'t hear a sound. Within 10 minutes it automatically connected to Tivo for updated program information and I am now enjoying a very quiet HD Tivo.\r\n\r\nI would highly recommend WeaKnees as I have found them to be very reliable and honest. \r\n"
2006-11-14
"Guys, you rock. I ordered a power supply for my 140060, which blew when the power flipped Saturday night. Just received it today, installed in, and wallah! The Tivo is back online. Didn\'t realize how much I NEED the Tivo. I actually had to watch TV shows at the appointed time for the last couple days. Geez.\r\n\r\nYou guys rock!\r\n"
2006-11-13
"I just wanted to add my kudos to Weaknees.com \'s long list of happy customers.\r\nI had purchased my Series 1, 40 hour Tivo -and the lifetime service - about 5 years ago.  After enjoying my favorite shows on my own schedule for so long, I was devastated to find that my Tivo was not working one night.  After some internet research, I found Weaknees.com\r\n(love the name!) and read all the troubleshooting information.  It sounded to me that my hard drive had "failed".  So I called to ask some questions and ended up purchasing an upgrade replacement hard drive from Jason.  He assured me that we would be able to replace the hard drive with very little trouble.  My husband was confident (I was less sure because todays electronics also seem so complicated).  Our hard drive arrived in just 2 days, and it took my husband only about 20 minutes from start to finish to remove the back cover, take out the defective hard drive, install the new drive, and re-attach the back cover (the hardest part was getting the cover back on straight).  I wanted to perserve my lifetime service and Jason at Weaknees.com assured me it would be fine as long as we didn\'t touch the motherboard.  \r\n\r\nI had a slight problem with the set-up but it was totally due to my error and skipping over the screen to select "no cable box" on the set-up screen.  It was Saturday-Jason had told me that although they are no available by phone on Saturdays at Weaknees.com they do monitor their email and respond.  Once someone at Weaknees.com pointed out my little problem (within 5 minutes of my sending the email question) I back tracked on the setup and soon my TIVO was busy downloading all program information.  I now have my TIVO back - better than new since I now can record 165 hours at basic quality - instead of the original 40 hours - AND best of all: my lifetime service is still in effect!!!  WOW.  WEAKNEES.com is the best.  (And we feel like real techies-which we are most certainly not!)\r\n\r\nTHANK YOU - if I had stopped my research at the TIVO website, I would have ened up spending about $500.00 more for a new TIVO and would not have TIVO service for longer than 3 years.\r\n\r\nI will be happy to let everyone know about your company. If anyone is nervous about doing the replacement hard drive themselves I can assure them it is not difficult - just follow the uncomplicated instructions that are included with the hard drive (and Weaknees.com also sends all the tools needed). EXCELLENT! Thanks again.  Tonight, after work I can watch Oprah and Dr. Phil again."
2006-11-09
"Shopping at Weaknees has been the absolute best internet shopping experience I have ever had.  I have never visited a better website.  All of my questions were answered on the site.  The troubleshooting guide accurately identified my problem.  Navigating the site was very easy and everything necessary to make an informed purchase decision was provided.  My order was processed and shipped immediately.  The drive installation was so easy with the included instructions and all necessary tools that it was amazing.  Almost nothing is ever that easy.  Thanks.\r\n"
2006-11-03
"You guys are GREAT!\r\n\r\nI\'ve been reading that "upgrade information" mumbo jumbo for two years in\r\nthe Tivo Community.  With your replacement hard drive, I went home at lunch,\r\ninstalled the drive and had the Tivo ready to record Bill Maher on HBO\r\ntonight!\r\n\r\nAll in just a few minutes.\r\n\r\nThanks!\r\n"
2006-11-02
"I just wanted to write and say that I am pleasantly surprised by your\r\nquick turn around service and product!  You\'ve made my doorstop a\r\nfunctional TiVo again!"
2006-10-27
"You saved me! You brought me Tivo back from the dead and preserved my lifetime service. New hard drive installed exactly as directions described and now I have double the capacity."
2006-10-17
"I recently ordered and installed your 750 gig hard drive upgrade for my new Tivo series 3. I cant say enough how your instructions made it so simple to get 100 hours of HD recording space from my digital cable. Thank you thank you for being a top quality company. Your products are superior !\r\n"
2006-10-14
"I just want to take the time to thank you for your speedy servce. I called and spoke to one of your service reps about a problem with my Tivo. It was determined to be a blown power supply. So I ordered a new power supply for my Tivo Series 2, and requested 2nd Day Air shipment. Imagine my surprise when my order arrived the very next day! I was hesitant to try the repair myself, but I downloaded the instructions from your site and set about the task of fixing my Tivo. It was surprisingly easy. I now feel confident that when it comes time to upgrade my Tivo hard drive, I\'ll be able to do it myself after ordering it from Weaknees. Thanks guys!"
2006-10-12
"It\'s tough to do without TIVO.  When my Sony unit started stuttering and dropping signal, ignoring the remote etc, panic set in.  I worried about losing my lifetime subscription, and I\'d heard nothing but bad reports on the new DirectV DVR\'s.  An internet search brought up you folks, and I must say you have been a lifesaver....The family is happy again!"
2006-10-11
"My old series 1 Phillips TiVo started stuttering and locking up. Since I had just ordered a new TiVo from WeakKnees a few months ago, I checked your site for info. It suggested a new drive will fix this problem 99% of the time. The new drive shipped fast (and free), installation was super easy and now I\'m back in business!"
2006-10-08
"Guys,\r\n\r\n        I just installed my DSR708 upgrade kit. The kit was complete, the\r\ninstructions were perfect, and bottom line, it worked as promised with no\r\nproblems whatsoever. Excellent! Keep up the good work. \r\n\r\nThanks,"\r\n
2006-10-05
"Hi,\r\n\r\nI just wanted to give you some feedback on my recent fix/upgrade of my Tivo system (like you asked me to).\r\n\r\nIn a word - you guys are AWESOME!\r\n\r\nI have been having problems with my Tivo for months now.... Continues to reboot for no reason. I wasn\'t sure what was going on, or even if it could be fixed... So, I "Googled" it and your company\'s URL came up. I went to your troubleshooting section and found my exact problem along with how to solve it. I ordered an upgrade disc from you (it took my 80GB drive up to 250GB!). I ordered this on the past weekend, and chose the "free" delivery option. I received my drive this Wednesday!!! The instruction were "spot-on"\r\nand it was so so easy to do. Hell, it took me longer to uncable/unplug my Tivo then it did to swap out the drive!!! I re-installed my Tivo, powered it up - and it came right up as all the necessary software was pre-installed on the drive. Then "Tivo" walked me thought re-initializing of the system (took about 1/2 hour) and everything worked perfect the very first time!!! If you can work a TV remote control, then you can replace the disc drive in a Tivo using your excellent instructions!\r\n\r\nThanks again,"
2006-10-04
"Shipped, received yesterday, installed (in about 20 minutes), and \r\nperfect! All \'stuttering\' problems gone.\r\n\r\nThank you.\r\n\r\nYour instructions are exceptionally thorough and clear, without being \r\ncondescending."\r\n
2006-09-29
"Thank goodness for you guyz....we were back in service in just a few days.  Your web site was easy enough for me to locate our necessary parts, the product arrived exactly on time, and was a snap to install!\r\n\r\nMy wife, an edicted Tivo user was back in service within days, despite the fear I\'d never get her service working again!\r\n\r\nThanks and keep it up!"
2006-09-28
"Hi Weaknees Folks:\r\n \r\nI just wanted to drop you a line complementing you on your product.\r\n \r\nI recently purchased a replacement Tivo 2 hard drive.  You answered my pre-sale questions within two hours. You shipped the product the day that I ordered it (at 6 PM on the east coast) and it arrived exactly on time.\r\n \r\nThe directions (with pictures) were superb and I was able to install the disk less than 15 minutes. The machine booted right up and although I had to spend more than an hour on the phone with DirecTV, the problems were unrelated to the new hardware.\r\n \r\nI am very happy with my purchase and your service.  I will recommend it to everyone.\r\n \r\nThanks"
2006-09-20
"I was leary about ordering and installing my own hard drive for TiVo.  I called around locally and no one would be able to do it.  With some hesitation, I ordered my hard drive from you.  I got the thing installed and TiVo put back together in 20 minutes!!!\r\n\r\nThanks for getting this out to me promptly, too.  I should have timed my ordering a little better bacause because before I know it, the fall tv season is upon us.  I ended up getting overnite shipping.  After paying for the faster shipping, I started getting concerned that my order would be tied up for days in "processing".  I ordered it over the weekend and I got it on Tuesday.  Truly overnite.  I won\'t have to miss any shows of the new season now because of conflicts.  Sad that I\'m so addicted to tv.\r\n\r\nAnyway...thanks again."
2006-09-18
"You guys rock!  The shipment to fix my Sat-T60 came quickly and had the best, most user-friendly technical instructions I\'ve ever seen.  Please keep up the great work!"
2006-09-13
"I just want to say that everything worked out of the box as advertised. The \r\ninstructions were chrystal clear, you even included the Torx wrenches. Will \r\ndefinitely do business with WeaKnees again."
2006-09-07
" I just did the "TiVo Series 2 Dual Tuner 80 Hour TiVo Upgrade Kit"  adding a 300gb drive. I was intimidated by doing this and put it off trying to find a place local to install an upgrade for me. Also I was waiting for the new DT brackets to arrive because my TiVo is only a few months old. After reading so many posts about the ease of the project I went ahead. Man, am I glad I did. It was pretty easy and rewarding to do it myself....Thank you for a great product!"
2006-09-05
"I just received the new hard drive for my sd-h400.  Package arrived quickly, drive was packaged perfectly, and directions were crystal clear.  I swapped the old drive for the new, and I am back into tivo world!  Thanks weaknees!"
2006-09-04
"I just installed one of your upgrade kits in my new Tivo.  I was a little hesitant about tearing into my brand new Tivo, but after I started installing the kit, it felt much better. The kit went in without any difficulty. All of the parts in the kit were well designed and fit very well....Overall the kit was outstanding, I had it installed in no time and I am very happy with the results. I am going to recommend your kits to everyone that I know that has a Tivo. \r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nThanks for making a great product,"\r\n
2006-08-31
"Thank you so much... I ordered a replacement on Sunday, it arrived \r\nWednesday. My  husband installed it the same day and it is working \r\nperfectly. What terrific customer service. You are certainly the\r\n"best kept secret". But not for long... I am\r\ntelling everyone about you and how to keep TIVO\'s alive. \r\n \r\nAgain, thank you for providing this valuable service."
2006-08-31
"Thank you!!\r\nI couldn\'t agree more with all the Customer Comments I read.  Your website made it very easy to identify what I needed.  I ordered a new HD and it shipped the same day.  It took me approx. 15 minutes to install - thanks to your great instructions.  I am 100% satisfied.\r\nThanks again!"
2006-08-31
"I\'m sure you guys get love letters all the time... So here\'s another one!!!\r\n\r\nIt was so easy and it all worked!!!  I love TIVO and I love WEAKNEES!!!!"
2006-08-30
"Hi,\r\nI just wanted to drop you all a quick line about the add-on HD I just finished for my TIVO.\r\nI did a 180G add-on to my Series 2 Dual 80.\r\n1. Fantastic, it was just as you said an easy do it yourself kit with great instructions.\r\n2. The website and ordering was easy and fast.\r\n3. Thanks for the FAST shipping.\r\nI did the install, including warmup in a little over an hour.[]\r\nWe\'ve been very happy with our new TIVO, but now that we\'ve upgraded to 260hrs with your kit it has become complete.\r\n\r\nThanks and best wishes"
2006-08-17
"Thank You!\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nWhat a great company & product.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nFirst, your diagnosis was right on.  Power supply as identified by lights/pattern.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nThe printed instruction set with photos gave me the confidence to try it myself.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI got hung up (by not carefully following photos) but your tech talked me through it in about 30 seconds.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nFinally, when I plugged it back in, NO SMOKE!  And it actually worked.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI was able to save all of my daughters TV appearances on Nash Bridges & Grey\xef\xbf\xbds Anatomy,\r\n\r\nand I have the wonderful bonus of having my TiVo lifetime subscription intact.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI will get those priceless recordings onto a DVD ASAP, and when I want to upgrade, obviously,\r\n\r\nI know who to call.  \r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI don\xef\xbf\xbdt know if you are affiliated with TiVo in any way, but you sure know your business.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI was disappointed that the people at TiVo would not give me even a hint of what was wrong with it.\r\n\r\nIt was clear that they knew, but would not do the right thing.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI can and will recommend your service at every opportunity.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nThanks for your good help."\r\n
2006-08-12
"I received the fan and installed it.  What a BREEZE!  Anyway, thank you for\r\nsuch quick service and a great upgrade.  We are now ready for football\r\nseason!!!"
2006-08-12
"Just wanted to tell you how thrilled I am to have found you on the internet. I ordered the power [supply] and it arrived yesterday. Today my brother-in-law came over - he has experience with computer components so I thought he should help me - he took about four minutes to replace the part. When I plugged the Tivo in and I saw \'powering up\', and the Tivo logo - I was ecstatic.  I am downloading my updated programming information right now.  All of my saved programs are right where I left them!!!\r\n\r\nI really appreciate how fast you emailed me back and diagnosed the problem.  You really helped me by sharing your knowledge about this system and I will be sure to recommend you to others."\r\n\r\n
2006-08-11
"Hello,  I just wanted to let you know my new modem came and thanks to your simple instructions, it was one of the easiest "installs" I have even done.  I think it was less than 2 minutes from plug-in to line test.  It works PERFECT!  My TiVo is fixed! Thank you WeaKnees!"
2006-08-09
"The order arrived in record time, was easy to install and worked flawlessly.  \r\n\r\nThank You,"
2006-08-09
"My refurb Toshiba TiVo unit died, and I ordered a replacement kit from your site, which arrived promptly. The instructions had me up and going in about 20 minutes, flawlessly! You guys have got it going on!"
2006-08-07
"Your kit is the best!!  I now have 300% my original disk space.  It really was easy and well documented.  Thank you for expanding our television watching."
2006-07-29
"Just installed our new hard drive, and it WAS easy.  Nice directions.  Hubby is watching his beloved TIVO as I write this, and our lifetime subscription just keeps on giving!!!! Thank you, life without the second TIVO just wasn\'t as much fun!!!!"
2006-07-21
"For the great service fast shipping and great information on my recent order. The installation was very smooth. Thanks again."
2006-07-21
"The replacement hard drive for my Philips 704 worked like a charm.\r\n\r\nThanks for saving me from that horrible R15!"
2006-07-21
"I have DIRECTTV/TIVO combo HR10250. Everywhere I went, I was told that I would be unable to download my show schedule with my new VIOP phone system. THey were wrong! You TV modem replacement kit did the trick. Simply hook it to the back of the TIVO with the seperate purchase  cable , and the other end to a phone outlet. It\'s well worth the money and is so simple a child could hook up. And it works!!"
2006-07-18
"Just wanted to let you know that the replacement hard drive fixed my problem and was super easy to replace.  The enclosed directions were perfect."
2006-07-14
"Cake!  That was easy!   The picture on our TV would stop then start randomly.  Then the sound turned to nothing but a hiss.  I ordered the replacement drive, installed it in about 10 minutes (5 of which was blowing 4 years of dust out from inside the case - had to take it outside when my wife saw it), plugged everything back in and it\'s like a new box.  I\'ve sent your URL to all my friends who have TiVo boxes (one of which has a dead TiVo.)  This was cake!"
2006-07-12
"Thanks for the quick service and awesome product. Piece of cake to install\r\nand I am a happy TiVo user again!"
2006-07-11
"UPS delivered the kit at about 2 pm.  I read the instructions, opened the machine, installed the new drive and replaced the original in the bracket, added the new fan and closed the unit.  Hooked it up and I was back in business at 3:30 with over 250 GB of new recording space.  I can\'t tell you how much I appreciate this upgrade.  It was just as easy as you state on the web site.\r\n\r\nThanks"
2006-07-07
"Replacing the hard drive did the trick. It couldn\'t have been simpler. Ten minutes, max! \r\n\r\n\r\nWith its much bigger drive, my machine is better than ever.\r\n\r\n\r\nThanks a lot,"
2006-07-04
"This fix worked very well.  Thanks for your help on the phone and for this product with easy to follow instructions."
2006-07-04
"Whooooo  Hoooooo !!!!!!!\r\n\r\nWeaKnees done brought my Toshiba back from the grave....Gracious thanks, the new 160gb drive and the new OS seem\r\nto be working fine, and my Wife and I can watch our shows\r\nagain without the urge to throw a hammer at the tv... O:-)"\r\n\r\nThanks again,\r\n"
2006-06-28
"I added a second drive to my TiVo last night using your kit.  It took one hour from start to finish and it was a completely painless operation.  Your website is clear, clean, and completely understandable, as were your excellent installation instructions.  What a great experience.  BRAVO!"\r\n
2006-06-28
"Just wanted to drop you a line and let you know that I received my order very quickly. I\'m also impressed by your very easy to follow instructions! I was able to replace the hard drive on my TIVO easily and quickly. It\'s working great. Thanks for your great product. I\'ll be keeping your website as a favorite for the future.\r\nA Satisfied Customer"
2006-06-25
"Your description on my TIVO problem/solution was right on. Fast turn on the order. Great and simple directions for power supply installation and in just a couple of days I\'m back in business. I figure you saved me the price of a new Tivo and the cost of a lifetime subscriber account - Thank you."
2006-06-24
"I wanted to drop you a line to let you know how thrilled I was with your replacement kit I ordered and the ease of installation.\r\n\r\nMy drive was going bad which was confirmed by your staff and various internet sources.  The kit came as described with tools, instructions and warnings appropriate in this time of consumer stupidity (Who would work on their Tivo while plugged in... someone must have eh?).\r\n\r\nAnyway the hardest part of the job was removing my Tivo from the entertainment center disaster of wiring, then 15 minutes later putting it back.\r\n\r\nThank you again for your excellent product, outstanding service and bringing my Tivo back from certain death.\r\n\r\nSincerely"
2006-06-23
"Great Service\r\nModel TiVo TCD140060, died on Tuesday, replaced Power Supply, back in Service Thursday Morning.\r\nGood Instruction on Trouble shooting,great response time on delivery."
2006-06-21
"Wow!!!  That was a really easy storage upgrade.  The instructions were incredibly detailed and simple.  I have never opened a TiVo and I got it done in an hour.  I would definitely recommend this to anyone looking for a little extra space - novice or expert.  Thanks!"
2006-06-14
"Dear Weaknees:\r\n \r\nYou asked for my feedback on my installation.\r\n \r\nI was intimidated by the directions posted online which is peculiar because I have had experience fixing VCR\'s. but I let the 5[00] Gig upgrade kit stay on my office floor for a week.\r\n \r\nIt\'s probably because my wife would kill me if I screwed up her saved shows on the factory hard drive and I completely rely on my Tivo units.\r\n \r\nWell, I was very careful reading everything twice before I did it and because of that it took me 1:20 to upgrade my Hughes HR 10-250 HD unit and it was easy and simple to do and nowhere near as intimidating as the photos looked.\r\n \r\nIt booted up perfectly and I now have 91+ hours of HD programming available.\r\n \r\nThanks, Weaknees. \r\n \r\nBest,"
2006-06-14
"Got my upgrade kit today, had it installed in 20 minutes. Now I have 230 \r\nHours! Was very easy to upgrade....I would definitely recommend this for any \r\nTivo.\r\n\r\nThanks a lot"
2006-06-13
"Once again, Weaknees has saved the day.  This is the third item I\'ve bought from you, and the third time I\'ve had complete satisfaction.  My drive arrived this afternoon, I got home less than an hour ago, and my Tivo is happily updating itself.  If anyone is considering an upgrade or the purchase of a Tivo, they need to look to Weaknees.  There is no one better.  Thank you, Weaknees."
2006-06-13
"Another satisfied customer! Got the upgrade kit for my Hughes DirecTV TiVo DVR and installed the new drive in 15 minutes. Everything works great and I couldn\'t be happier. Now I can avoid switching to the DirecTV DVR Plus system (which I tried and found totally lacking). Thanks for your company -- you keep TiVo products and information available for the TiVo nation."
2006-06-12
"This weekend I installed the new hard drive into my 10-250 and \xef\xbf\xbd well \xef\xbf\xbd it went perfectly.  Very clear instructions.  Box is now back in tip top shape."
2006-06-03
"Dear Weaknees-\r\n\r\nI just ordered a new hard drive from your store for my\r\nReplayTV.  The drive in my unit crashed on Monday, I\r\nput in an order on Tuesday (talked to a support guy on\r\nyour end who was helpful), and got the drive on\r\nFriday.\r\n\r\nYour included instructions were excellent and clear. \r\nWithin 10 minutes I had the new drive in and it worked\r\nperfectly.  The whole time I was installing it, I kept\r\nsaying "these are excellent instructions!"\r\n\r\nI\'m so glad I found your site and am impressed at your\r\nservice.  I will definitely recommend it to everyone I\r\nknow.  THIS is how an online store should run.\r\n\r\nps. Please, please keep your Replay drives available! \r\nI love my ReplayTV and if anything happens to it, I\'m\r\ncoming back to Weaknees."
2006-05-31
"You saved our lives!! Our hard drive went dead on a Wednesday and you were able to send us a replacement by Friday. I followed your easy to understand instructions and we were back in business on Friday night! It was truly amazing! Thanks so much. We are telling all of our Tivo owner friends about your wonderful company!"
2006-05-23
"I just wanted to thank you folks for providing me with what was one of the most painless upgrade/replacements I\'ve ever had to do!\r\n\r\nMy HR10-250 had thrown a hard drive, and I didn\'t want to get involved with the whole "leasing" thing, so a friend suggested your company.\r\n\r\nThe instructions were clear and concise, the parts were in great condition and my set is in full operation again!\r\n\r\nThanks, Weaknees.com for giving my my DirecTivo back!"
2006-05-22
"I have a TiVo TCD140060 with Lifetime on it that died the other day when I was updating my image and swapping the drives around (recording downgrade).\r\n\r\nNeedless to say, with one other box in the house on a month-to-month, I was in a panic! \r\n\r\nYour troubleshooting guide was right on the money, and I replaced the power supply with one of your refurb units just now and I\'m back in action!\r\n\r\nYou rule! \r\n\r\nThanks for all the hard work, keep it up!"
2006-05-22
"I offer some positive feedback for you.\r\n\r\nI just bought a Tivo from WeaKnees. Why did I buy from you? Your web site provided a lot of information that I couldn\'t find elsewhere. That "free" support tells me that you are interested in more than commerce (although that is probably your first concern).\r\n\r\nAnd, you offer upgraded Tivos (even though I bought a std. unit). A sign that you know your stuff. All of your on-line documentation supported my impression. You have a good web sit; easy to use and informative.\r\n\r\nAs a minor issue: I went to UCLA for a long time (three degrees). I appreciate your West LA address. Not a big deal, but ...\r\n"
2006-05-17
"I received the upgrade kit tonight. Took less than 10 minutes to install. Turned it ON and went thru setup. Everything works. Great product. Thank you."
2006-05-16
"I recieved the hard drive yesterday and replaced my old one with it in about 15 min. It works great . It was definately a time saver, as taking my Tivo to the shop to get fixed and then picking it up 2 weeks later would have been inconveiniant to say the least."
2006-05-15
"I just received the 250 GB hard drive for my Phillips 7000 from \r\nyou, and I want to let you know how good your instructions were and how easy it was to install. It works perfectly. Thanks for the  excellent product and service."\r\n
2006-05-11
"I rcvd and installed the upgrade kit today.\r\nI followed your enclosed instructions and was back up and running in less than 30 minutes.\r\nI now have a reported 180 hours of storeage time.\r\n\r\nThanks,"
2006-05-10
"My kit arrived in perfect condition.  It took about 45 minutes to install (and I am VERY meticulous).  I fired the unit up and it is perfect.  I couldn\'t be happier with my purchase!"
2006-05-03
"     Just a note to say the receiver arrived in excellent condition and \r\nplays perfectly.  I am very impressed with your selection and customer \r\nservice.  Rest assured that I, and everyone I tell, will be WeaKnees \r\ncustomers from now on.  Thank you very much for making this such a pleasant \r\ntransaction.  Take care."
2006-04-27
"Thank you for your great service. I wish all companies had customer service as friendly, efficient and no nonsense as yours."
2006-04-25
"I am really happy with the modem replacement kit I bought from you!!...GREAT!!!"
2006-04-17
"I just wanted to send a quick message to say thanks.  I ordered one of your twinbreeze bracket kits and installed a second hard drive into my Tivo.  Let me say that the bracket was professionally made and the instructions were extremely detailed.  I had the unit up and running in about 30 minutes.\r\n\r\nIn a world with pathetic customer service, you guys come out way on top.  Great work, I wouldn\'t hesitate from buying other products form you in the future."
2006-04-17
"After a great deal of research, I decided to purchase one of your upgrade kits.  Not only were the instrcutions clear and concise, but the parts fit like a dream.  In under 30 minutes, I went from a capacity of 40 hours to about 230 hours.  I am sure my friends will be ordering from you soon.\r\n\r\nKeep up the good work."
2006-04-15
"I received the replacement\'s replacement on Thursday and it worked perfectly.  I\'ve been telling everyone about the amazing company where live people actually answer the phone and help you.  \r\n \r\nThank you for your great product and great service."
2006-04-15
"Just wanted to let you know that I recently ordered a hard drive replacement kit for a DSR6000. Your kit worked perfectly, and it was super-easy to install."
2006-04-12
"Just wanted to write and say how skeptical I was at first.  But, upon placing my order and you guys shipping it out same day. I received it the very next day, opened it up, used the easy to follow directions, and in ten minutes I was booting my TIVO up!  One week later and it\'s running perfect! And the best part is, I have double the HD space! Thanks so much! You guys are the best!"
2006-04-11
"You shipped my replacement HD the SAME DAY you received the order!  No one does that.  No one!  With great fear I opened my DVR to attempt the HD replacement.  Five minutes later it was done!  Great directions!!!  The DVR booted up fine and TIVO is working.  Thanks for your great service!"
2006-04-10
"Just wanted to let you know that I installed the replacement hard drive on my TIVO Series 2 and everything seems to be working fine.  It had been suffering from frequent bouts of freezing and through your website, I was able to find and order the correct replacement very easily.  Using your instructions, installation was a breeze (dare I say, "idiot proof").  Thank you for returning our world to the safe, happy place it is when our TIVO is healthy."
2006-04-01
"I just want to thatk you for you awesome service.  The new drive worked flawlessly.  It was also very cool that there was a recent version of the TIVO software on the drive and I did not have to use the phone line instead of my network."
2006-04-01
"Last Wednesday morning, I woke up to a \xef\xbf\xbdPowering up\xef\xbf\xbd screen on my Hughes SD-DVR40....The household was in chaos. No Directv and no Tivo. I called you guys as soon as the time difference allowed, and you suggested a new hard drive and I could return it if that wasn\xef\xbf\xbdt the issue. I decided to go bigger and ordered a single 250GB disk for next day delivery. Wednesday night we, for the first time in years, watched local TV from an antenna. I had forgotten how bad it was. Thursday around 4:00 PM, the new disk arrived. Everything was so simple. I had the new disk installed and the case back together in 15 minutes. It powered up without incident....I\xef\xbf\xbdd recommend you guys to anyone. Most importantly to me in this case, your guy at your 800 number 1) answered without me listening to music on hold 2) He knew his stuff 3) English was his first language 4) he took the time to go over my options and 5) after choosing a solution, execution of the solution was flawless.\r\n\r\n \r\n\r\nI\xef\xbf\xbdm a very satisfied customer. Thanks.\r\n"
2006-03-30
"I want to thank you for the prompt service and outstanding products. My TiVo had died & with the help of a replacement disk and your easy to follow instructions we are up and running again.  It is rare that something is really as good as advertised, you guys are better than advertised. Keep up the great work!"
2006-03-29
"I just wanted to say a quick THANK YOU for a quality product!  I received the order quickly, and the replacement 400GB hard drive has brought my DirecTV H10-250 back to life once again.  The hard drive was easy to install--just under 15 minutes with your easy-to-understand instructions.  Once again, thank you, and keep up the good work!!"
2006-03-28
"Just received the replacement H.D. today. Works great! Good job on the great and prompt service. \r\nthank you,"
2006-03-28
"It has been a pleasure doing business with you. We received the DVR the day after we ordered it. The unit has been installed and activated. It works Great."
2006-03-27
"I just installed your 250 gig HD. It went in flawlessly.  I got the unit out of the entertainment system, cover off, replaced the hard drive, cover on and back into the entertainment system in less than a half hour.  After the TiVo setup I was up and running.  Thank you, great doing business with you."
2006-03-26
"Drive already installed and working AWESOME ! you guy\'s at Weaknees Rock!!!  And the guided setup was soo much eaiser this time.  The only question I had to answer regarding channel lineup was what I recieved on channel 14 Cnn Etc. I put in CNN and I was basically done.   Thanks for the great job you guy\'s do every day!\r\n \r\n   A very satisfied Weaknees Customer!"\r\n
2006-03-23
"I ordered the replacement drive for my R10 on Monday. I received it the\r\nnext day, and got around to installing it last night. It only took 20\r\nminutes.  \r\n\r\nI must say, you sell a great product. Not only have you revived my 4\r\nmonth old R10, but I now have 140 hour capacity!! \r\n\r\nIn the past, I upgraded my original dsr6000r "the hard way". I\'m\r\nthinking my HDVR2 and Phillips 708 will get opened up in the next few\r\nmonths after my move to Texas.\r\n\r\nThanks for a great product. I\'m sorry I waited so long to actually buy\r\nfrom you. I am recommending you to all my friends!!"
2006-03-23
"WOW - what great service.  Got the hard drive...installed it.  Perfect instructions.  Up and running in 15 minutes.  Loved the 30 sec skip tip.\r\n \r\nJust a great experience.\r\n \r\nThank you"
2006-03-23
"Ordered the new drive & fan for my Sat T60 on Sunday. It arrived yesterday (Wednesday). Took about 20 minutes to install.\r\n\r\nMy formerly loud & whiny box is as quiet as it was when new. My lifetime TiVo subscription lives again!\r\n\r\nI am a very happy camper! Thanks for the quick turnaround, excellent instructions, and quality product."
2006-03-21
"Dear Weaknees - Thank you thank you thank you!!!   I have DirecTV and was an unfortunate purchaser of the DirecTV Plus machine - but NO MORE!  Thanks to you, I received and hooked up my R10 today and just have to decide the demise of my wretched DirecTV Plus machine.  Thank you so much!!  I\'m back in TIVO-land!"
2006-03-16
"Just got my hard drive from you guys , installed it in a few minutes and its up and running.\r\nThanks for a Great product."
2006-03-15
"Just wanted to give you feedback on my hard drive replacement. My TiVo died after several lightning strikes in a row close to my house. Ordered a replacment hard drive from you, arrived in four days and took only 10 minutes to install successfully. Over four times the capacity of my original system also. Great product, great service. Thanks!!"
2006-03-15
"My Tivo was acting up after a series of thunderstorms.  I did an internet search for "Tivo troubleshooting" and got the Weaknees website.  It was easy to deduce that I needed a replacement hard drive from your site and I received the new drive less than 2 days after placing an order.  Installation took minutes, it was very easy.  My beloved Tivo is now working great and with even more room for my favorite shows.  Thanks Weaknees!!"
2006-03-09
"I was pretty bummed when my DirecTV DVR with Tivo wouldn\'t start up after a power outage.  Then I was psyched when DirecTV said they\'d send me a new one for the cost of shipping.  Then I was bummed again when the DVR they sent didn\'t have Tivo.  It was hard to use and didn\'t have nearly the functionality that my old Tivo unit did.  Based on the info from Weaknees\' Troubleshooting page it seemed that I needed a new drive for my old unit - confirmed with a quick email from one of your techs.  Free shipping and a week later I got my new drive from Weaknees - easy installation while enjoying a cold one after work and I was back in business.  Thank you.  Great customer service and a great product."
2006-03-04
"Power supply arrived Friday, March 4th.  Took about 10 minutes to install.  As expected, I was back up and running within the hour.  You guys provide a great service for the do it yourself clients.  For $50, my Tivo with a lifetime subscription has been brought back from the dead."
2006-03-03
"Anyone who has a DVR needs to step up to the plate and give your upgrades a try. It\'s a guaranteed hit. I installed your dual 160 hard drives and went from 60 hours to 412 hours! The easy replacement process only took 15 minutes. Now I can Tivo all my reality shows without the fear factor. The fear that they\'ll be deleted before watching. Thanks again Weaknees!"
2006-03-02
"Thanks so much!! You guys are awesome. Even replay TV couldn\'t fix my unit.\r\nYour disk fixed it in 10 minutes and I did it myself.\r\n\r\nYou Rock!!"
2006-02-27
"Got it today.  This was the easiest installation and operation that I\'ve\r\never experienced.\r\nYou guys have got this down PAT.\r\n\r\nThanks a million."
2006-02-24
"Just wanted to let you know what a great product/service you offer!\r\nOrdered my Weaknees Twinbreeze TiVo Upgrade bracket for my Directv HR10-250 on Monday 2/20 Recieved it and installed it on Friday, Thanks to your clear instructions and interactive selection for chosing the right software to download and burn to CD, I went from 30Hours HD to 63Hrs HD! I will gladly recommend your website to anyone interested in Weaknees Upgrade or Weaknees DIY products. Thanks a million!!"
2006-02-22
"Just finished Tivo set-up with my new hard drive from Weaknees.  If I can install it, anyone can.  As we used to say when I lived in the Pacific Northwest---\'I\'m happy as a clam!\'\r\n\r\nThanks"
2006-02-21
"Thanks, WeaKnees! 300GB upgrade to my TiVo Series 2. Crystal-clear instructions, 10 minutes of effort, works perfectly."
2006-02-18
"Just wanted to take a moment to compliment you folks\r\non your service, helpfulness, and great attitude. \r\nWe\'ve come to rely on Tivo to ensure we get to see all\r\nour favorite TV shows, and we\'ve now come to depend on\r\nYOU to keep our Tivos up-to-date and running.  I\'ve\r\nbought an add-on kit, a new master drive, and you\'ve\r\nhelped me to get them working right.\r\n\r\nYour service was courteous, fast, and very reliable.\r\n\r\nthanx very much, you\'ll definitely hear from me again\r\nwhen I need help with my Tivos!\r\n"
2006-02-03
"I just wanted to let you know I\'m very happy with my purchase. I purchased and installed one of your hard drive upgrade kits and I found it quite easy to install and it works perfectly. Thanks for saving me quite a bit of money!"
2006-02-03
"This is to notify Jason  and his supervisors he provided excellent customer service and I feel he went above and beyond to obtain customer satisfaction.  After the whole shipping fiasco and living in a rural area my hard drive was finally received.  The whole installation was a breeze just in time for the Super Bowl.  I can not wait to use the extra space available.  I will definitely tell my friends about your website and my satisfied service.  Thank you again"
2006-01-24
"I just wanted to send a note of thanks!!  I recently ordered a Tivo hard disk replacement (even super sized it) and was worried about installing the drive myself.  Lo and behold when I got my new drive and followed the directions step by step I had no problems whatsoever.  When I plugged in the Tivo and hooked up my broadband connection I was going through the guided setup.  No problems.\r\n\r\nThanks so much for everything.  You all made it a piece of cake."
2006-01-18
"I just wanted to let you know that I received my TiVo upgrade drive yesterday as expected, and the installation went precisely as described in your advetising and documentation.  It\'s a rare occurance when everything goes exactly as advertised, so I wanted to Thank You, and let you know that I will be sure to recommend your company to my friends and family.\r\n \r\nGreat Job!"
2006-01-17
"Thanks for a great product. I just installed a 250 GB drive in my 40hour\r\nTivo. Just popped in the new drive, powered it up and went through the\r\nstandard Tivo set up, couldn\'t be easier. This is a whole lot easier than\r\ntrying to put in a second drive on my own, which I did try and it did not\r\nwork. Now I can record like crazy."
2006-01-17
"I can\'t thank you enough for giving TiVo back to me.  I had a Hughes HDVR2 DirecTV/TiVo combo unit that I used and loved for over 2 years.  It then went bad on me, and started having pixel issues.  Thanks to DirecTV ending their deal with TiVo, they would only send me an R15 unit.  I had read bad things online about it, but nothing could prepare me for just how horrible the R15 is.  It\'s not even close to a TiVo in functionality and reliability.  I had nothing but problems with it from the first day I received it.  It then just stopped working at all.  I\'m so glad I found your site, and that you sell DirecTV/TiVo units.  I purchased one of your refurbished units, which I just received today.  I was very pleased with the fast shipping.  I\'m so happy to have TiVo again, especially with the upgraded 140 hours of space.  I can only hope DirecTV will see what a mistake they made with ending their deal with TiVo.  Thank you so much WeaKnees.com.  Keep up the great work."
2006-01-13
"Just wanted to say, I just recieved a 250GB HD to replace my 40 hour HD in my Humax DRT400.  It took me less than 10 minutes to do the physical installation, then the mac[h]ine worked perfectly once plugged back in!  It even gave me 31 hours more then advertised at 301 on basic quality, although I use high quality usually in which I get 99 hours now compared to 13 hours before with my 40 hour drive.  Thanks a lot!"
2006-01-10
"It worked.  I\'ve got to give Weaknees credit, you\'ve really put together\r\na valuable product.  Our lifetime subscription Tivo was headed to the\r\ntrash because of hard drive problems, and now it has new life with\r\ndouble the storage space for recordings.  Thanks again for the help."
2006-01-08
"Just to let you know from someone who has the "Real Men Don\'t Need Instructions" syndrome. Your replacement fan I ordered for my Sony SAT T-60 was the easiest replacement fix I\'ve ever experienced. Your instructions were right on and everything went just as you said in your instructions. Based on this experience, I\'ve bookmarked your site should I ever need replacements parts. Thanks again for an easy fix."
2006-01-06
"Dear Weaknees:\r\n\r\nYour company is awesome!  I received my shipment in a very short period of \r\ntime, it came complete with the harddrive, tools and instructions.\r\n\r\nAll companies should take a lesson from you on your instructions!  They were \r\nclear, detailed, precise, and easy to follow.  Even the part where you get \r\ndown on your knees, 6 inches from the tivo, to give yourself the proper \r\nleverage to remove the cover!\r\n\r\nEverything happened on tivo, just like you said, and it functions \r\nbeautifully!\r\n\r\nmany thanks to your company - get the word out, you are great!!!!!!"
2006-01-02
"Friends,\r\nI recently experienced the horror of having my Direct TV TiVo hard drive go bad. I ordered a replacement from Weaknees including having the TiVo OS installed on the drive. From the time of order entry to order delivery to installation and subsequent performance, my experience with weaknees was exceptional. My TiVo is running great and has double the storage capacity. This is my first experience with Weaknees, and it was one I would heartily recommend. If you can use a screwdriver competently, you call follow Weaknees\' instructions and do the installation yourself. Great job! Thanks."
2005-12-30
"Received order #326822 today. In 30 minutes I replaced the hard drive in my Toshiba SD-H400 DVD-TiVo como unit & it went throught the setup process flawlessly. I couldn\'t believe how easy it was.\r\n\r\nThanks for a great product with clear instructions!"
2005-12-23
"Just wanted to let you know that I installed my Tivo hard disk upgrade.  The installation was very easy and went smoothly.  We were up and running in less than 30 minutes!  Thank you!"
2005-12-22
"I just replaced the HD of my 240080 with your 250GB kit and also replaced the fan.  The procedure was quick and easy with your clear instructions. The machine restarted without a glitch.  Great job guys!  Thanks."
2005-12-20
"I just purchased a replacement power supply and 300GB drive from you, and\r\nwanted to let you know how pleased I have been so far.\r\n\r\nThe new drive installed without a problem, and the power supply got our\r\nother TiVo (storm damage) running again quickly. Please let the\r\npeople/person responsible for the very detailed and well-written\r\ninstructions know they did an excellent job. Compared to so-called\r\n"manuals" supplied with many other technology devices, your plain-English\r\ndocument was quite pleasing.\r\n\r\nYou can count on me for referrals and praise.\r\n\r\nKudos to the Weaknees Team!"
2005-12-20
"I just upgraded the above unit with one of your kits and it was so simple and easy.  I used the add-on kit to go up to 180 hours of recording time.  20 minutes and it worked perfectly.\r\n\r\nThanks"
2005-12-19
"I read about you in "Wired" and checked out the website. The site was clean, inviting and very informative. I immediately ordered the 90hr rreplacement drive kit for my failing Sony SVR2000 Tivo.\r\n\r\nThe unit shipped within hours and arrived about 72 hours later. I was impressed with the packaging and the inclusion of the needed wrenches and instructions.\r\n\r\nThe illustrated step-by-step instructions couldn\'t have been clearer or simpler- even for a relative novice.\r\n\r\nAfter allowing the unplugged unit to sit for five minutes as directed, I had the drive installed and running in about fifteen minutes. MAN, was that EASY! It works perfectly and I am psyched to have triple my original storage space for less money than I paid to buy the unit in the first place.\r\n\r\nI couldn\'t be happier with my experience from beginning to end. Well done guys and thanks from a new fan!"
2005-12-18
"I just finished installing one of your add a hard drive kits on my DirecTv Tivo. Wow, I have to tell you that it was a very impressive kit. The mounting bracket is well designed and fit just perfect. Your instructions make it easy for any skill level.\r\nGreat kit. I would recommend weaknees to anyone interested in upgrading a Tivo."
2005-12-13
"You guys are AWESOME!\r\n\r\nI got my HD today. I installed it at my house, fully expecting that I would have to bring it into the office to run guided setup after testing the drive for noise. First of all, it was whisper quiet compared to the hard drive that came with the Tivo. Second, I was able to run through guided setup using my wireless USB adapter! The extra capacity is excellent too.\r\n\r\nFast delivery, reasonable prices, and ridiculously easy setup. I\'m impressed! Thanks for all your help."
2005-12-08
"Got my HD upgrade for TIVO  yesterday - It was as easy to install as a light bulb and it works great.  I thank you for shipping it so quickly.\r\n \r\nI will probably be needing another hard drive soon for my other TIVO and am so pleased with how easy it was to deal with you that I wont hesitate to order again. "
2005-11-28
"the week and it could not have been easier. Good instructions...everything worked the first time!  Increased my storage from 40 to 164 hours!   Thanks for the product, I am recommending to family and friends...."
2005-11-26
"Hello Weaknees...\r\n\r\nThanks for your more than helpful website database.  With the information I found there in just a short period of searching, I was able to diagnose a problem with the TiVo Brand "TiVo Series 2" TCD140060.  Your database information was right on the money.  Replacement of power supply is what was needed.  The TiVo is now back in hopefully several more years of service.\r\n\r\nSince I was local, the ability to be allowed to will-call the product was more than appreciated."
2005-11-18
"What a well designed install kit, you could not have made it simpler.  I ordered the upgrade kit, to add mucho capacity to my hd-dvr, and the install was a snap.  Had everything back up, and running in just under an hour.  Great job on the detailed instructions, down to showing where to lay the cables and hold the bracket.  Another customer for life, thanks."
2005-11-16
"Weaknees is a pleasure to do business with. Professional and knowledgeable in every aspect with lightning fast shipping. They stand behind there warranty 100%. The best company I\'ve ever dealt with on the internet. I would highly recommend Weaknees to anybody with TiVo troubles. Thanks Again!    P.S. Purchased four upgraded Sd and Hd TiVos from Weaknees."
2005-11-11
"it\'s not often that i\'m delighted with a company.  i am happy to tell you that you are the exception.  after using your website to diagnose my TIVO problem (hard drive death), i ordered a replacement hard drive.  this was on friday.  the order was processed the same day and was shipped the next.  with regular shipping, it arrived 6 days later.  i followed your very clear instructions, with helpful photos to both remove my hard drive and install my new one.  it could not have been easier.  my TIVO is up and running again and i couldn\'t be happier.  thank you."
2005-11-07
"You guys have the coolest service available!\r\n\r\nJust put in a new drive on another Tivo box....the old one was still good but a year old...just for the extra space...\r\n\r\nSmooth, seamless...the way it should be.\r\n\r\nYou guys definitely deserve two thumbs UP!"
2005-11-06
"I just updated by TiVo with your Maxtor disk.\r\nEasy to follow instructions. My "freeze" symptoms disappeared and the picture quality improved!...I\'m happy as a lark."
2005-11-03
"Hi!\r\nI just can\'t believe how wonderful you are!!! I am 100% PLUS satisfied with your merchandise AND your excellent service!!!!! I\'ve never dealt with a more supportive company! How can I leave feedback for others to see? Thank you! Thank you! Thank you! :)"
2005-10-29
"I just had to write to let you know how delighted I am to have found your company.  When the drive on my Pioneer DVR-810H went bad, I thought I\'d have to buy a whole new unit.  However, a quick search on Google led me to you.  \r\n\r\nI got the new drive only one day after I placed my order (which was wonderful for someone going through Tivo withdrawl)!  What impressed me most, however, were the detailed instructions which accompanied my purchase.  As someone with no experience with electronics, I was amazed at how easy it was to install the new drive.  Whoever writes your instructions is a genius.  They were so easy to understand and follow, and no detail was left out.\r\n\r\nMy new drive is working perfectly (and has twice as much space as the old one) -- it\'s like having a whole new DVR.  I have raved about your company to anyone who will listen to me, and now I just wanted to let you know how very pleased I am.\r\n\r\nThanks!"
2005-10-27
"Thanks again for all the help.  Installing the new drive, re-establishing\r\nTIVO service, etc....like buttah.  :-)"
2005-10-25
"I just want to let you know how happy I am with your company and its products !!  Last week lightning took out my TIVO modem and I was devistated (the unit has lifetime service).  I went to your website and you had just what I needed.  The instructions that came with it were excellent and now I am up and running.  I will definately recommend you to others. Thanks again"
2005-10-18
"I just wanted to let you guys know that my add-on hard drive is working \r\ngreat. Thanks to the great instructions, I had my HD Tivo upgraded in 1 hour \r\nand enjoying 63 hours of HD.\r\n\r\nKind Regards,"
2005-10-01
"I recently threw in a 140hr upgrade drive into my DirecTV 7000; took only a\r\nfew minutes and it worked like a charm.  Money well spent.\r\n\r\nanother happy customer,"
2005-09-29
"Just completed my TIVO upgrade by installing a second drive and new fan.  "Fantastic" instructions and information.  Did the whole job in 30 minutes taking my time as you suggest.  Saved me at least 2 weeks without the unit (fan was already bad) having to send it to SONY and some $$$$$.  Thanks for your company.  Will never hesitate to buy from you again."
2005-09-23
"WOW! I usually don\'t provide feedback to on-line retailers but I\'m impressed. Extremely fast delivery and extremely easy install.  Everything was as close to \'plug and play\' as installing a harddrive can be. TIVO owners are lucky to have you as a resource."
2005-09-16
"I plugged in my modem and cable last night and it worked as advertised\r\nwithout any hassles on my part!\r\n\r\nThat shouldn\'t make news these days, but unfortunately it does, as\r\nmany products simply don\'t live up to the advertising promises.\r\n\r\nThanks and keep up the good work. You will be getting recommendations out of me."
2005-09-10
"I recevied the moden replacement for my first generation TIVO. It works great!. The instructions were excellent and installation was a breeze. Thanks for the help."
2005-09-07
"I upgraded my Sony SVR2000 last weekend using your 165-hour upgrade kit.  It was amazingly easy.  Your instructions were dead-on and the whole procedure took less than 10 minutes.  Great job!  Great service!"
2005-09-06
"Received my second hard drive today....installed it and had it up and running again in less than an hour....\r\n"
2005-09-02
"Hi - my computer-savvy cousin found your external modem repair kit for me after I called him in my desperation.  Sony customer service screwed up my TiVO by telling me to go through Guided Setup when my problem was a failed modem (ARGH!).  Of course, after that I couldn\'t use my TiVO at all.  I was really relieved to see instructions on your site and in my kit for people with a broken modem and stuck in Guided Setup.  It was nice to know that I\'m not the only one.  ANYWAY, I was so happy and thankful to receive the external modem I ordered from you last night.  I had it installed in 5 minutes flat.  My TiVO was up & running again in no time.  THANK YOU!!"
2005-09-01
"I purchased an external modem and two high capacity hard drives to replace the single hard drive in my Series I Tivo.\r\n\r\nThe directions were clear and simple, and they communicated exactly what I needed to know for each step.  One of the things I really appreciated was the careful attention to tell me what I needed to notice before and/or after some action I was going to take.\r\n\r\nThe kit contained everything I needed to switch the drives, except for a Phillips head screwdriver, which I assumed I would need and which I already had.\r\n\r\nAll that extra care and attention to detail enabled me to switch the drives in less than half and hour - and I have no experience working on computers!\r\n\r\nExcellent work!"
2005-08-18
" Team,\r\n\r\n        I don\'t want to let the week expire without telling you that yep, your modem kit was a complete success.  Thanks.\r\n\r\n        I should state what I\'m thanking you for.  For sure, I appreciate the responsiveness, the superb order fulfilment, and all that.  But what pleases me the most is that you had this workaround all set up, in stock, ready to ship.  That a quick fix for a blown-out internal modem could be so readily provided is yet another testimony to the essential robustness of the TiVo platform, but it took you guys to actually implement it.  This is real support, and is only possible from people who know what they\'re doing.\r\n\r\n        pm"
2005-08-17
"I received the TiVO replacement hard drive today,\r\ninstalled it as per your instructions, and it worked\r\nperfectly !\r\n\r\nThanks Weaknees -- you guys are great !!!!\r\n\r\nBest Regards,"
2005-08-09
"I ordered a new Tivo/DirecTV box as my old, original had fried. I got extended hours plus the cooling options. The receiver arrived in 2 days even though I chose the lowest cost shipping option, I plugged in and activated in just a few minutes. Great price, great product, and the extra capacity and the cooling options are working flawlessly. Nice! I would buy from you again but I have a feeling I won\'t need to for a long time."
2005-08-09
"WEAKNESS IS THE GREATEST!!!!!!  THANKS SO  MUCH FOR THE UPGRADE ."
2005-08-04
"Two weeks ago, I bought an upgrade drive for my 35 hour Tivo and it works great.  The installation was quick thanks to your thorough instructions.  Today I purchased a drive as a gift for my dad and two of my friends will be buying kits from you in the next few days.\r\n\r\nYou sell a great product."
2005-08-02
"HI GUYS, \r\n   JUST A QUICK NOTE TO SAY THANKS ALOT! APPARANTLY MY TIVO HAD A SURGE IN THE PHONE LINE ON JULY 21ST AND I DIDNT KNOW ABOUT IT UNTIL I HAD 6 DAYS OF PROGRAMMING LEFT. I WAS READY TO FREAK! BUT I FOUND YOUR SITE AND READ ABOUT WHAT MY PROBLEM WAS - THE MODEM GOT FRIED- AFTER TRYING EVERY SOLUTIONJ I COULD. I ORDERED YOUR MODEM KIT ON THAT SATURDAY AND PAID EXTRA TO GET IT HERE ASAP, AND BY 11 O\'CLOCK IN THE MORNING OF AUGUST 2ND, MY TIVO WAS BACK TO CONNECTING TO THE SERVICE IN NO TIME AND UPDATING , THANSK ALOT, YOU GUYS HAVE GAINED A LIFETIME CUSTOMER HERE!! = )"
2005-07-23
"Received my upgrade 120 MB disk drive and installed it a few days ago.  Instructions were great.  Upgrade works well.  Much easier than I thought it would be.  Thank you and keep up the great work.  I will certainly buy from you again."
2005-07-23
"Hi,\r\nI ordered a TiVo upgrade earlier this week, and just finished doing the install.  I have to say WOW!, your service is impecable and you delivered your promises beyond my expectations.  The ease of ordering was great.  Receiving the order the next day was great. The quality of the kit components was great.  The ease of install was amazing. In one word WeaKnees is GREAT!.\r\n\r\nYou\'ve earned my business and I\'ll be promoting you to friends and family.\r\n\r\nKind Regards."
2005-07-20
"I just installed your 400 MB drive in my Pioneer 810H and I want to let you know it went like a breeze.  The installation took about five minutes after which I went through the guided setup.  My only problem was locating my local channels which had moved to the 800s (DirecTV).\r\nThanks for a flawless process."
2005-07-08
"How often have I done this?  Seldom.  I did feel it was necessary to tell you how great you guys are.  My TiVo bit the dust recently, due to a lightning storm.  I couldn\'t connect to Tivo and after talking to Tivo did a Google search on mdem problems revealing your company.  I clicked on your site, found that my problem was not an uncommon one and called immediately.  I bought the modem and serial cable for my TiVo, the customer service rep (who was very friendly and helpful, took my order and two days later I\'m downloading information.  Thank you WeaKnees.  You\'ve saved me hundreds of dollars and kept me from buying a new TiVo with a new service agreement.  This customer appreciates all the help you gave me."
2005-07-06
"Dear Weaknees, thank you for diagnosing my problem with my tivo, I got the\r\npower supply from you and had it in the unit in 15 minutes and tivo was\r\nback up and running. Thanks again!"
2005-07-05
"I just wanted to tell you that within 20 minutes of delivery of a replacement power supply from you guys, my TiVo is once again up and running and processing info from the TiVo service to make up for the downtime.  It was really easy to replace and such an easy fix.  I can\'t thank you enough!"
2005-06-27
"I just wanted to thank you so much for all of your help.  When my Tivo died I thought I would too.  There was no way that I was going to pay for a new Tivo lifetime membership so I thought my Tivo days were numbered...then I found your site!  I emailed you with the problem and asked what part you thought I needed and within hours you responded.  I ordered that part right away and within a week had it.  The installation was way easier then I could have imagined, and now not only does my Tivo work again, I now have so much extra storage it\'s insane.  I am sooo please with you and your service and I am definitely going to tell others about you.  You have just gained a customer and fan for life!"
2005-06-19
"I just wanted to tell you how smoothly my TIVO Series-2 (40 hours) upgrade went last weekend to make it a 140-hour unit.\r\n\r\nI ordered the new 120 GB drive (old drive was 40 GB) and new fan and had the box in only a 4 days; very prompt shipping.  \r\n\r\nI prepared the old TIVO for downtime and transferred any shows not wanting to be lost to the upstairs TIVO.\r\n\r\nI began the upgrade on Saturday 6/11/05 at 11:00 AM and was finished at 11:45 AM.  Once I had the TIVO software back up to date around 5 hours later and soon we were transferring shows back down to the improved TIVO that now has 80 hours of MEDIUM quality and 60 hours at HIGH.\r\nHow shweet is that???\r\n\r\nEven though the web site name weird, you guys are not and gave great service and I am telling others how smooth this went and to buy from you if they decide to do this.\r\n\r\nThank you very much,"\r\n\r\n
2005-06-19
"I want you to know how wonderful my experience with WeaKnees has been. From the presales call, to the online ordering, to the speedy delivery, and the finally trouble-free installation, I couldn\'t be more pleased.\r\n \r\nI wish everyone I did business with was as professional as your team.\r\n \r\nBest regards,"
2005-06-08
"Hi, I just wanted to thank you for the quick response to our order, and also thank you for the excellent instructions. You really made a seemingly daunting task very easy!\r\nI changed out a hard drive, fan, and installed an external modem. Many thanks"
2005-05-31
"Dear Weaknees,\r\n\r\nI just installed a two-drive upgrade to my early model TIVO, and I am very impressed by the well thought-out package and clear instructions.  You made this upgrade easy. Thanks!"
2005-05-27
"Just wanted to add my voice to your (presumably long) list of very satisfied customers. Although I have been a professional technician for over 30 years and have been hacking with Linux since before kernel 1.0, I believe that your clear instructions would allow just about anybody to successfully install a capacity upgrade in mere minutes and fully expect things to work with no problems.\r\n\r\nWeaknees -- It just works.\r\n\r\nMuch thanks."
2005-05-23
"Last Monday I ordered a new hard drive for my TIVO. It arrived in two days. On Sunday I opened the box, found the instructions, followed them to the letter and my TIVO is up and working! Thank you for your quick shipment, clear instructions, and great product! You exceeding my expectations! I hope my TIVO keeps going for a long time, but if it doesn\'t, I know where to go. Keep up the good work!"
2005-05-16
"I just wanted to tell you guys how IMPRESSED i was with the ease of installation!  everything went great and i couldn\'t be happier.  i love it so much that i want to upgrade my other tivo!  thanks again for making this such an easy experience.  "
2005-05-15
"I received my hard drive on Friday and upgraded my TIVO today.  Thanks for your step by step instructions, all went well.  It took me about 15 minutes.  I just had to let you know how easy it was and how pleased I am. Sandra"
2005-05-11
"Just wanted to say thanx for the speedy shipment and the ease of the upgrade. It took me less than 30 minutes to upgrade and it was very easy.  This was a much better deal than buying a new TiVo!"
2005-05-10
"Dear Mike and Jeff:\r\n \r\nYour upgrade kit is an engineering excellence and it doesn\'t cost an arm and a leg.\r\n \r\nThanks again"
2005-05-06
"Thanks guys!!!\r\n\r\nFedEx delivered my upgrade kit at 3:55pm today, and by 4:55pm I had a 230 hour TiVo.  Your instructions were great, the bracket, the fan and the assorted hardware were perfect, and the install went without a hitch.  Imagine, a 230 hour for only $178!!! ( I got my new TiVo-TCD540040 for free, after rebate at Circuit City).\r\n\r\nThis sure beat the hell out of my Series1-HDR 112 upgrade, completed about 4 years ago.  No need to open up my computer, program the hard drive or jury rig a mounting bracket.  I\'ll be contacting you again real soon to upgrade my brother\'s Toshiba TiVo/DVD Player.\r\n\r\nThanks again"
2005-05-01
"I\'ve had this TiVo unit for quite awhile. Your drive replacement was easier than expected. The only unexpected surprise was the amout of dust accumulated in the unit. The job took less than 20 minutes and then the hour to get through the guided set-up. Excellent service, great instructions."
2005-03-30
"Just wanted to drop you a line to thank you for the replacement drive I\r\npurchased last week.  Installation was far easy than your already simple\r\ndirections suggested and my TiVo is up and running better than ever.  I know\r\nit was a simple hard drive swap but the wife and I swear the unit is faster\r\nthan it was.  Nice work and thanks for the help."
2005-03-28
"Awesome service, as usual. That\'s why I keep recommending you to my friends. Thanks!"
2005-03-26
"Just finished my upgrade.  With your instructions it\'s simple.  It took less than 15 minutes. You guys have a great service.  Thank You"
2005-03-24
"I just upgraded my second TiVo box with the prepped drive from you guys.  Flawless!  You guys do great work."
2005-03-24
"I just wanted to drop a note letting you know that I am extremely happy with my transaction with your company. Not only did I receive the upgrade quickly (ie. the next day) but your instructions were very well written and explained. The upgrade went well despite my nervousness in opening the box of my beloved tivo."
2005-03-23
"Just wanted to let you know I got my order. It installed in minutes just as \r\ndescribed and is working perfectly. I could not be more pleased with your \r\nproduct and your service. I plan on letting my friends know about you and \r\nthe services you provide. Thank you for your prompt response to my e-mail. I \r\nwill surely do business with you in the future. Thanks again."
2005-03-23
"I recieved my kit today and it was an easy 15 minute install. I replaced my jittery and stuck on "just a few more minutes" hard drive. My Tivo is better than new. It faster and quieter than my old drive. And more memory too!!\r\nAs I had purchased the lifetime warrenty with my Tivo, it was more economical to replace the drive than buy a new Tivo. All updates downloaded from Tivo including Home Media options. Hmmm... that 2nd drive looks like a good idea now...!!"
2005-03-18
"Easiest upgrade EVER!  Instructions so easy that any techie-phobe could complete.  Kudos galore to weeknees!"
2005-03-13
"My TIVO unit started to freeze up after about a year of use.  I contacted the local TV/Appliance repair outfit and they were reluctant to try to repair it, indicating that parts were almost impossible to obtain.  They offered to look at it, re-solder joints, etc.  Since I had spent $350 on the unit a year prior, I looked further and found your site.  The (VERY HELPFUL) information on your site about symptoms matched what I was experiencing and indicated the need for a hard-drive replacement.   I ordered a hard drive, got it via FEDEX within the week,  found the installation instructions very helpful and complete, and restored my TIVO to working order with a single call to TIVO to restore local channels.  The TIVO unit responds even faster than before to commands.  I\'m very satisfied with the service!"
2005-03-09
"Your service rocks!\xef\xbf\xbd Your great website helped me to diagnose the problem for my dead Tivo.\xef\xbf\xbd New hard drive arrived in 24hrs and Tivo has been revived.\xef\xbf\xbd Outstanding service thank you"
2005-02-28
"Weaknees Guys;\r\n\r\nJust wanted to let you know the mod to my Directivo worked GREAT.\xef\xbf\xbd Your shipping was fast and the instructions were clear and explicit.\xef\xbf\xbd I now have 157 hours of recording time!\r\n\r\nWill tell my friends.\r\n\r\nThanks"
2005-02-25
"Just wanted to let you know how pleased I am with my 140-hr TiVo and your service.  The unit arrived quickly, installed quickly and it\'s great to not have to constantly delete programs and worry about bumping up against that 35-hr limit.  I love it!\r\nThank you very much"
2005-02-19
"I\'ve just installed the 140 hour upgrade to our Directv TIV0.  I\'m not very technical, but completed the job in under an hour!\r\n\r\nGreat kit and instructions!"
2005-02-18
"Thanks for the upgrade.  It took longer to get the Tivo to download than it\r\ntook to install the additional drive and set up the external modem.  Wish\r\nevery thing was that easy!\r\n\r\nThanks again"
2005-02-10
"I just completed the 105 hour HDVR2 TwinBreeze upgrade with the advanced cooling package. The instructions were clear and the upgrade was easily done with the tools provided plus 1 Phillips screwdriver. All the parts were neatly organized and came in a well padded box. The completed upgrade from turn-off to turn-on took 1 hour including time to clean out the 2 years of accumulated dust.  The rubber grommets on the new fans were a nice touch and the noise level remained very low like the original. The TIVO booted without a hitch and the system information screen confirmed the upgrade to 144 hours and also reported the internal temps as normal at 35 degrees. Very nicely thought-out and fairly priced package. Would do it again without any hesitation."
2005-02-09
"I wanted to take the time to thank you for your outstanding service and products.  My wife ordered your product Monday afternoon and we received it Tuesday morning.  Your instructions were clear and concise and the installation was a breeze.  You have a wonderfull product and I will be referring all my friends and family."
2005-02-09
"Hello,\r\n      I meant to write to you the other day.  I received my order and I \r\ninstalled the upgrade very easily.  Your instructions were extremely clear \r\nand precise.  You covered all of the bases.  I want to commend the founder/s \r\nof your company.  What a great idea!  I hope that your business is very \r\nprofitable for you.  I don\'t see how it can\'t be when you make it so easy \r\nfor the consumer.  Again, thank you and darn it, I wish I would have thought \r\nof it first..ha-ha."
2005-02-09
"I ordered your Twinbreeze Complete w/ Power Trip package per a friend\xef\xbf\xbds recommendation.  I placed the order on 2/2 and received a package on 2/9.  Very good turnaround for free shipping!....I was expecting flimsy bracket and cheap components.  I must say everything it top notch.  I think that the bracket could hold up to space shuttle reentry....I am very satisfied. I will recommend you to anyone that will listen.  I will thank my friend in the morning for his referral to your site!  Total install time less than 30 minutes.  (I read everything twice)  Next time it will take less than 10."
2005-02-02
"Yesterday I ordered a new Tivo Hard drive to expand my memory. I received free shipping and received my drive today!!! It took me all of ten minutes to install it, and the Tivo is working great. Thanks WeaKnees!"
2005-01-27
"My drive replacement took 12 minutes and I didn\xef\xbf\xbdt hurry.  Your instructions were easy to follow.   My old Series 1 came right back up and I repeated the setup process.  The unit works flawlessly \xef\xbf\xbd my old hard drive was slowly failing and I\xef\xbf\xbdd get a jittery picture at times \xef\xbf\xbd and its much quieter.  I know my way around a computer, but I\xef\xbf\xbdm sure my wife (who doesn\xef\xbf\xbdt) could have handled this in all of 15 minutes.  I\xef\xbf\xbdve got more capacity and I am pleased with my customer experience.  I received my drive four days after ordering and your use of Fed-Ex allowed me to track the package. Thanks for doing it right, and I hope your business continues to grow."
2005-01-27
"I recently purchased a Tivo Upgrade kit for my parents. My Parents are not computer literate and have never seen the inside of an electronic device before.  \r\nI offered to help them with the upgrade over the telephone and was surprised this morning when they called to tell me they had just completed the upgrade themselves without any assistance from me or anyone else. The[y] explained the documentation was very easy to understand and had no trouble upgrading their unit themselves and are [now] suggesting to others in their retirement park to consider such upgrading their Tivos because your instructions are easy to follow and your kits are easy to install.\r\n\r\nI wanted to share this with you as I see so many times people asking if they can do it themselves and now you can tell them that my parents who are nearly 70 and never upgraded a computer before were able to do it without a single problem."
2005-01-27
"I am frequently away from home for long periods - the weaKnees upgrade is a great option over the 140 hour Tivo (using Basic Quality).  In less than 90 minutes - from unplugging to adding shows to record - I upgraded from about 11 hours to over 56 hours of recording space (from 40 to 207 hours - Basic Quality)."
2005-01-20
"I would just like to complement you on what a great product you offer.  It\xef\xbf\xbds obvious that a lot of thought went into the development of your kits; from the brilliant design of the hard drive bracket to the subtle things like the rubber washers for the extra fan.  I placed an order on the 18th and had my new and improved TiVo up and running on the 19th.  Thank you!"
2005-01-20
"I just wanted to write to thank you for an excellent product.  In\r\nabout 25 minutes, my 40-hour Series2 became a 188-hour\r\nSeries2, and everything went along flawlessly."
2005-01-14
"My drive upgrade arrived next day and within 30 minutes I went from 35 Hrs to 143!  My wife is a happy camper now."
2005-01-13
"As usual you guys are great.  This was my second weaknees upgrade kit.  Ordering was easy and the package shipped and arrived promptly.  Within 30 minutes my TiVo was up and running with its new larger capacity."
2005-01-12
"Blazing fast FREE delivery on replacement Tivo Drive. All necessary\r\ntools were included; and I had my Tivo drive replaced within minutes\r\nusing Weaknees excellent directions. Highly recommended seller."
2005-01-10
"Good morning:\r\nReceived your modem for my Tivo, installed it according to your instructions and within a few minutes my machine was operating again. Thank you. I have a paid up sub! Now I can use it again.\r\nHappy New Year."
2005-01-07
"Thank you for your quick service.  The instructions for installing the tivo second disk were excellent and obviously written by someone who has English as his first language. I especially appreciated the hints about opening the tivo box.  I plugged it in and it WORKED."
2005-01-01
"I recently ordered a hard drive replacement kit for my T60.  Install was easy, the product worked exactly as promised, even the fan I ordered works great, very quiet.  There is nothing better than ordering something online, getting it in two days, and its works 100% as promised.  Keep up the good work."
2004-12-31
"I have been _very_ happy with my HD TiVo upgrade kit.  The quality of the...drive bracket impressed me and other engineers at my company.  I will most\r\nhighly recommend your company to others.  Thanks again for such a painless\r\nand high quality upgrade kit.\r\n\r\nCheers,"
2004-12-28
"Hello weaKnees,\r\n\r\nJust wanted to say that you guys are the bomb!\r\n\r\nI ordered your 160GB \'add\' kit late on 12/26, and received it 12/28! Only 2 days from order to install-WOW!\r\n\r\nImmediately after initial set up of my new TiVo, I had regrets about not getting the larger 80 hour model upfront for $100 more. 40 hours does not go far!\r\n\r\nWhat a complete and concise kit. Great instructions and first quality parts! After the EZ upgrade install and getting an additional 180 hours for under $200, needless to say I am stoked and totally sold on your company!\r\n\r\nKeep up the good work!\r\n\r\n\r\np.s.\r\nthanks for the \'30 second skip" code also!\
2004-12-26
"A couple of months ago I brought my Direct TV \r\nw/Tivo turner in and had you upgrade it with a 160GB hard drive. Shortly \r\nafterwards I had to leave town for over a month. When I returned, \r\neverything I had setup to record was where. I had hours and hours of all \r\nthe programs I would have missed had I not had you upgrade the box. \r\nEverything is working just great.\r\n\r\nThank you for your expert and fast service. I\'m more than happy to \r\nrecommend your company to everyone I\'ve met that has a Tivo.\r\n\r\nI hope that you and yours have a great holiday season. Keep up the great \r\nwork."
2004-12-26
"I want you to know we have installed the kit by following the instructions.  Everything went well and the Tivo booted up with no problems.\r\n\r\nYou have delivered as promised."
2004-12-24
"Hi, just wanted to let you know how happy I am with my Direct TV Tivo upgrade. The order arrived in a timely fashion, was extremely well packed and all parts were as advertised. The upgrade took no more than 20 min. Then came the thrill. After booting I checked the "system information" and saw that I had gone from a paltry 35hrs to 144hrs record time. Wow! But the bonus was that as a result of installing both Avanced Cooling Pack fans, my internal temp went from 44 C down to 39 C. Did I mention Wow? Thanks to you my Tivo is more robust, quieter and cooler as well."
2004-12-20
"I received my latest HD upgraded TiVo, it arrived overnight as promised. Installed and working great! In the past I\'ve purchased one HD upgraded TiVo and upgraded drives for two other SD TiVos from you, all with great success. Your customer service is second to none. Anybody looking to upgrade their TiVo this is the company to deal with. Thanks" 
2004-12-15
"Dear Michael and Jeff,\r\n\r\nI am very happy with the work you have done to my TIVO. Had absolutely no problems with connecting and using the upgraded TIVO. Works very well and past problems are absent.\r\n\r\nThank you so much for making sure that everything worked and it has been proven, when the TIVO was reconnected.\r\n\r\nThank you and I wish you a Merry Christmas for you and the family with a Very Happy New Year. I will highly recommend your services when someone or my friends ask about this and wish to do a similar thing, I had done.\r\n\r\nSincerely.... "
2004-12-15
"Oh..My..Gosh....your kit was easy enough for a GRANDMOTHER to install successfully. How do I know? Because I just upgraded my DirecTV tivo in under 30 minutes. It probably would have taken about 15 minutes, but I kept stopping and worrying: "It can\'t be this easy--I must be doing something wrong" Still not believing it could be that simple, I reconnected everything and held my breath as it powered up....viola! I went from approx. 35 hours to up to 156 hours. It is so rare for anything to work the way it is supposed to. Thank you, thank you, thank you. Very well written directions and a quality product. It does not get better than that!"
2004-12-14
"These were by far the best instrucitons I\'ve ever seen for assembly of *anything* ever. Period.  Fantastic !!!  Thanks for making the Tivo upgrade simple and foolproof....Thanks again for a great product !!! Worked first time no problem."
2004-12-11
"I recently installed a 105 min hard disk and a new fan in my Sony Sat T-60.\xef\xbf\xbd Your shipment came quickly, the kit was very well packed, the instructions were good, and it worked the first time I turned it on. Thanks"
2004-12-09
"I was not teribbly happy with the dismal 35 hour capacity of my TiVo and\r\ndecided to upgrade. I ordered the upgrade kit on Wednesday, got the kit on\r\nThursday and installed it in less than a half hour. Now I have over 100\r\nhours! Could not have been easier! Thanks so much!!"
2004-12-03
"Ordered Monday rcvd Wednesday night and took all of 15 minutes to install thanks to your excellant directions, up and running 45 minutes later.\r\nThanks so much for excellent service via phone and your great website!!\r\nI\'m happy, my bride is happy which means I\'m out of the doghouse - at least for a little while...\r\nThanks"
2004-11-30
"Thanks for sending the upgrade disk so quickly- ordered last Friday (day after Thanksgiving) arrived today. Packaging is certainly robust! The install was insanely easy and painless, and I\'ve now got enough space to use Best quality again!\r\n\r\nI was abit reluctant to fiddle with it since I have a lifetime sub, but it was easier than expected and the instructions are fabulous.\r\n\r\nTerrific. Do you guys get bored with all the praise ;)"
2004-11-14
"I\xef\xbf\xbdjust purchased your 160gig upgrade for my tivo.\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd The kit was PERFECT!!!\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd Parts fabrication, packaging , instructions and fit were top end.\xef\xbf\xbd I actually enjoyed installing the upgrade.\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd Everything fit as described and the bracket and additional cooling brackets made the original equipment mountings look inferior.\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd I was very impressed with the product and the professionalism of the overall package .... THANKS!!!!!"
2004-11-12
"I just upgrade my TIVO with a new hard drive from weaknees.  It was VERY easy and it works GREAT!  Thanks for having such an outstanding product.\r\n\r\nBest regards"
2004-11-09
"Fast Delivery, Ease of installation GREAT, Post install problems none, Overall experience unparall[el]ed ! .... Thanks, WeaKnees."
2004-11-08
"It is rare that I\'ve thought so highly of a product or service that I\'ve taken the time to contact a company.  I just installed one of your upgrade kits for a standalone TiVo dvr and the entire experience was amazingly straightforward.  I actually enjoyed the experience.  Your instructions were simple and thorough.  \r\n\r\nThank you for a wonderful product!"
2004-11-05
"Thanks for your speedy processing and delivery of my order! \r\n\r\nAs a professional technologist (an independent software developer) I am impressed with the wealth of information you make available on your website, and with the clever business you have created.\r\n\r\nI have found very little substantive info on the web covering Tivo, and a business devoted to providing superior hard drives seems unique. After first searching BestBuy, Circuit City and GoodGuys, I was expecting to be disappointed and not find any Tivo hardware with digital audio output. But, you had the goods:) \r\n\r\nI hope others appreciate you efforts, and recognize your uniqueness by purchasing from you!\r\n\r\nBTW, the unit you sent seems to be significantly quieter than the fried Western Digital unit I am replacing. Perhaps, the original disk bearings were damaged from the get go."
2004-11-03
"I just installed your 240 Gb upgrade in my new Huges SD-DVR40 DirecTiVo DVR, and was very pleased.  I ordered the upgrade online with standard free shipping and was amazed when the kit arrived via FedEx the very next morning. The installation was quick (30 minutes) and almost completely uneventful, thanks to your excellent installation instructions. My DVR capacity is now 243 hours vs. its original 35 hours.....Thanks again for an excellent product and excellent service.  I will recommend WeaKnees.com to my friends."\r\n
2004-11-02
"I wanted to let you know that the TIVO upgrade that I recently purchased was perfect.\xef\xbf\xbd Our Sony SVR2000 had been crashing, hanging up and responding slowly.\xef\xbf\xbd We had to cycle power to it almost every day.\xef\xbf\xbd We contacted Sony and they said that it would cost us $165 to have it repaired (Any parts would be additional $$$).\r\n\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\n\r\nThe instructions that you provided were right on the mark.\xef\xbf\xbd The drive replacement took 20 minutes.\xef\xbf\xbd Most of the time was spent cleaning all of the dust out of the inside of the unit.\xef\xbf\xbd Everything powered right up.\xef\xbf\xbd Our TIVO is faster than ever and the extra capacity lets us record and at a higher quality setting.\r\n\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\n\r\nThanks for a great product."
2004-10-31
"Thanks for the prompt service. Product worked exactly as described! I will\r\nrecommend to family and friends!"
2004-10-30
"My kit arrived promptly, I did not open it on day 1. On day two  I opened and read the instructions. Day three, I summoned the courage to install.  \r\nInstructions were as well written as any, for a complex device I have seen. \r\nSuccess..when my Direct TV system info showed 144 hour capacity, I breathed a sigh of relief....Thanks for a fine product and good support."
2004-10-30
"I am two weeks old in Tivo time. I did a quick study on the subject and bought a 540040 locally. Weaknees had a twin breeze complete kit (no drives)  to my door in two days. Excellent instructions. Quick service. The bracket fit well. Installation was easy. No surprises. Thanks very much. "
2004-10-29
"YOU guys absolutely ROCK!  Talking with me about the issue on my old 4532 quickly resolved the matter. I just got your replacement hard-drive.  Bolted it in, and watched it TAKE-OFF just like that; probably even BETTER than when I first got it! Customer service and product is ALL THAT!"
2004-10-19
"Best purchase I ever made. You guys are great. Instructions were easy and we were up and running in a 1/2 hour. I could not be happier. Thanks for the great service and product."
2004-10-16
"I ordered a Tivo replacement harddrive and had the drive installed in less than 15 minutes.\r\nYour instructions were very clear and I\'m very happy with the results. Thanks again.\r\n"
2004-10-14
"Dear Michael and Jeff:\r\n\r\nI rarely have the opportunity to rave about a product or service these days, and I\'m happy to say that you are the exception.\r\n\r\nTwo days after I placed my telephone order with you for a replacement hard drive for my Tivo, I received the package at my home via FedEx Ground. Included were:  the hard drive; some very easy replacement instructions; and, much to my surprise, two allen wrenches to accomplishment the replacement task.\r\n\r\nBecause you guys provided the tools to get the job done, I didn\'t procrastinate like I usually do.  I immediately replaced the hard drive, which took no more than 5 minutes to complete.  I think that you guys must\'ve known that, if you didn\'t include the allen wrenches, many of us would\'ve put the task off until later.  A stroke of marketing genius; and it works.\r\n\r\nNeedless to say, I am ecstatic about doing business with Weaknees.  You give quality of customer service a new standard.\r\n\r\nPlease feel free to use this accolade as a customer recommendation for your products and services too.\r\n"
2004-10-09
"I received my TIVO add- on hard drive. It took me 20 minutes to install with your clear and concise directions.  \r\nWay to go!"
2004-10-09
"Gentlemen,\r\n  Sunday I ordered some CDs from Amazon.com Thursday morning I ordered my upgrade from Weaknees.com for my DVR. By Thursday evening you had notified me it had shipped. Friday before Noon my upgrade arrived. It took about 30 minutes to complete. Now I have 150+ hours capacity. You guys are great. By the way, I am still waiting for my Amazon delivery."
2004-10-09
"Hi I just finished installing your 2 Hard drive kit for the Sony svr 3000.  Before hand It was giving me trouble, shutting down etc.  After I installed it-- it worked perfectly and tons of room to record.  The job was super easy and well explained in the instructions.  awesome job!\r\n\r\nThanks!"
2004-10-04
"Gentlemen,\r\n\r\nI\'m writing to thank you for the great experience of doing business with you.  \r\n\r\nRecently, I purchased an upgraded SD-DVR40 TiVo and a upgraded high-definition HR-10 250.  I also arranged a complete DirecTV install through you, having made the switch from Dish Network.\r\n\r\nEverything went swimmingly.  From my initial questions over the phone, to the arrangements of product shipment from LA to Pittsburgh to a follow-up of how the installation went, I couldn\'t have been more pleased.\r\n\r\nYou run a tight ship and are a quality organization.  I would not hesitate to do business with you again.\r\n\r\nThank you for your thoroughness and attention to detail."
2004-09-29
"Thanks, I received my harddrive yesterday.\r\nWithin twenty minutes my Tivo was up and running.\r\nYour insturction were clear and very detailed. I will shop with you again."
2004-09-17
"Hi,\r\n\r\nMy TIVO upgrade kit was installed and up and running in 20 minutes.  Your directions and add on hardware are superb. Anyone who has opened a PC and done any upgrade can do this no sweat.\r\n\r\nThanks!!"
2004-09-02
"Just wanted to say thanks, I installed your bracket today as soon as it arrived and it exceeded my expectations.  This is a great product with clear and easy to follow directions.  Job well done!! "
2004-09-02
"I wanted to say thanks for making an upgrade I did to my in-laws Series2 TiVo a breeze.\xef\xbf\xbd They went away on vacation and their house got hit by lighting and fried their TiVo.\xef\xbf\xbd I ordered one of your replacement drives and installed it in about 15 minutes.\xef\xbf\xbd My in-laws told me that they could never live without their TiVo again."
2004-08-31
"Weaknees, you did it again. \r\n\r\nThat would have been twice that I would have thrown my TIVO in the trash, first when the harddrive took a dump, and just recently when lighting blew out the on-board modem.  First fix was beautiful... new hardrive and one exta drive for a kicker, and now, your modem kit installed in five mintues.  Your instructions are great.  You guys are really on the ball.   Thanks for exsisting."\r\n
2004-08-31
"I received the replacemnet hard drive and installed it in less than 15 minutes.  Your instructions were some of the best I have ever seen for installing electronic hardware.  I ordered the hardrive on Sunday evening.  It was arrived on my door step Tuesday morning.  Count on me as a return customer.  I will recommend you to my friends and family. You saved my TIVO in time for football season!!!"
2004-08-25
"Gentlemen,\r\n\r\nI have recently installed one of your kits in my Hughes DVR\r\n\r\nand would like to say that I am extremely happy with the ease of installation and the easy to follow instructions.\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd \xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd \xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd \xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd Thanks very much"
2004-08-21
"My drive went out in my TIVO unit.  My sons tell me, \'dad you can replace your drive\'.  Got a hold of you and purchased a new 145 hour drive.  I came before I expected it and all I had to do was read the instructions while my 13 year old son installed the drive.  It\'s working like a champ.  thanks i will alway feep you in mind if i hear of people wanting to ungrade their units."
2004-08-21
"Just want to say thanks for the great service. Went on vacation for a week came home to a dead Tivo on Thursday. Got up Friday went to look for a new box but didn\xef\xbf\xbdt like what we saw and really like the SAT-T60 unit. I read about weaknees from the San Jose Mercury news. Got on the net at 11:00 am. Called you guys at 1:00 pm Friday. Was able to get Saturday delivery for a new drive. By 1:00 pm Saturday we were watching Tivo again.Twenty four hours total wow. The kit was complete and easy to follow....Thanks again  can\xef\xbf\xbdt be without your Tivo as we all know."
2004-08-20
"Thank you for your incredibly informative and accurate web site.  My 4 year old Sony Sat T-60 had a wicked hard drive failure and you guys saved the day.  I was only without Tivo for 46 hours (seemed like an eternity!).  I was able to replace the drive and cooling fan in about 15 minutes.  You guys have my highest rating. Thanks again!  A Tivo is a terrible thing to waste."
2004-08-12
"Item [HR10-250 high definition TiVo with 70 hours] arrived today in perfect condition.  It works perfectly, gives a great picture, and I\'ve already activated both the DirecTV and DVR modes for tomorrow\'s opening ceremonies at the Olympics, in HD no less!\r\n\r\nNow all I\'ve got to do is get an HDMI-compatible HD monitor, as big as my C/M/Y plasma.\r\n\r\nThanks for the great product!"
2004-08-10
"Just wanted to say I am very impressed with the speed in which I received my order and the very short amount of time it took to install my upgrade kit. Thank you very much for a great product and a kit that was well thought out."
2004-08-07
"I finally got around to installing the new drive. Works flawlessly! Going to order another one for our other one soon. Thanks a lot for the great product, great price, and great service."
2004-08-02
"Thanks for your response.  It worked just as you had informed me and all is well.  I\'ll be happy to provide a testimonial that you motto of 100% satisfied customers is true and honest, even on Sunday morning.  Incidentally, an e-mail to TIVO got a totally unresponsive reply."
2004-08-02
"I can\'t tell you how pleased I am with the 120 Gig replacement hard drive I bought from you last week.  It was shipped the same day I ordered it, and was waiting for me when I returned from a short trip.  The installation was just as easy as advertised and it works flawlessly, expanding my available recording time from 20 hrs to 122 hrs ( from 6 hrs and 47 minutes at best quality to 22 hrs at best quality).  Thanks for the great service."
2004-07-28
"Hello,\r\n\r\nI just wanted to let you guys know that after weeks of\r\ntrying to get my directivo to dial up over my vonage\r\nwith the built-in modem, I decided to order your\r\nexternal modem kit. The modem arrived the very next\r\nbusiness day, and it dialed up successfully on the\r\nvery first try!! Thanks a million."
2004-07-22
"Shipping:  Super Fast\r\nInstructions:  Super Easy\r\nTiVo Upgrade Kit:  Super Perfect\r\nI cannot believe the difference in my TiVo.  It\'s like it\'s trubo charged.  Thanks very much!!!"
2004-07-16
"You did a great job on my DirecTV Tivo! Easy ordering process, lots of excellent information, rapid turnaround, shipping updates, and most importantly a TIVO that has over 200 hundred hours of recording time! You even added additional packaging material! Very pleased with your service and my reinvigorated TIVO, I wouldn\'t hesitate to recommend you to anyone looking to add substantial value to their TIVO."
2004-07-12
"I received my upgrade about an hour ago,\r\nTivo is back up, & running with a new capacity of 156 Hours.\r\nSheesh , That was easy."
2004-07-12
"Just upgraded the hard drive on my Sony series 1. The hardest part was getting the cover off of the box. Great instructions for a great product."
2004-07-12
"Just wanted to say that my installation of the new Tivo harddrive could not have been easier. I will highly recommend you. Thanks."
2004-07-11
"I have just finsihed adding one of your drive addition kits to a TIVO unit for the second time. The first was a HDR212 and this one was a Series 2 24004A. The first one was easy but this one was even easier. The dual drive bracket was a great addition. No rubber standoffs or wire ties needed to secure the extra drive. The system works perfectly as expected. I will be ordering another kit for my wife\'s 24004A just as soon as the factory warranty is up."
2004-07-06
"Just wanted to say I got the hdd last week and it was so simple to install. Thanks for the great instructions, everything is working great. I will recommend you in the future for sure!"
2004-06-30
" have received the kit, it took about 20 minutes to install the new drive\r\nand now I have an awesome TiVo with a boatload of space.\r\nI just wanted to say Thank You for a great service and prompt delivery.\r\n\r\n"
2004-06-28
"Hey, Michael and Jeff -\r\nI got my upgrade kit today, had it installed in 20 minutes (great\r\ninstructions!) and now my Tivo is working beautifully.  The old drive had\r\nbeen making noise for some time, and I figured I would need to replace it\r\nsoon - it froze up for a while on Tuessday, failed for good on Wednesday,\r\nand it got fixed on Monday...not too bad - I just wish I had done it sooner.\r\n\r\nThanks for all your help"
2004-06-25
"Your instructions were to the point, easy to follow, and the installation went in flawlessly.  I went through setup and confirmed my new capacity (91 hours on an 80GB drive! w00t!)\r\n\r\nToo many customers complain when things go bad and don\'t praise when they go right.  I am not that kind of customer.  You guys have offered a FANTASTIC service to the public, and I thank you from the very bottom of my heart for ressurecting my TIVO!  I\'ve nicknamed it Lazarus now, since you brought him back from the dead. :)\r\n\r\nThanks again!"
2004-06-22
"Just wanted to thank you guys for a great job!  My TIVO arrived on time as\r\npromised, works great.  You guys are the bomb!"
2004-06-12
"I just upgraded my Hughes DVR with an additional 120GB drive. Just wanted to say how impressed I was at the ease of the entire process. Thanks to a well designed upgrade kit and thorough, concise instructions, the whole process was completed in less than 45 minutes. I wish all upgrades could be this straight forward. Excellent product and service!"
2004-06-11
"I telephoned you twice just prior to placing my order online to get some questions answered.  Both times, a live, knowledgeable, and helpful person answered the phone....\r\nMy order shipped just 2 hours after I completed my order online (as confirmed by your email and FedEx\'s tracking, which showed the time FedEx had my shipment in their possession) - AWESOME!\r\n \r\nI received my order in 5 days as estimated.  The hard drive was well packed and protected, and the box arrived in perfect condition.\r\n \r\nAlthough I have successfully installed hard drives in PCs before, I have never been comfortable with opening and poking around inside delicate electronic components.  I had never opened my DirecTV TiVo prior to installing the hard drive upgrade.  But your instructions made upgrading my DirecTV TiVo\'s hard drive very easy.  I was back up and running much faster than I had imagined, now with triple my previous recording capacity.  Bravo!  (While I was inside the TiVo, I removed the fan, cleaned it, and reinstalled it - a nice little bonus for me).\r\n \r\nI am not a big fan of purchasing items via the Internet, especially fragile electronics, due to some past personal experiences I have had with online ordering (ex. - confusing checkout procedures, products showing as in stock but are immediately listed as not available only after the order is placed, products arriving late and/or damaged, slow or no response to emails, no personal contact available, not abiding by stated privacy policies, security issues, etc.).  But your integrity and service are simply excellent - top notch, impeccable.  Thank you very much."
2004-06-08
"received your 120bg hard drive wednesday and installed it in about 30 minutes without a hitch.  my svr-2000 now has 144 hours on the clock.  i would have done it sooner but was unsure about being able to pull it off.  bottom line:  good product;  good service;  good directions and good value."
2004-06-05
"I have been very much satisfied with two product that I purchased from your company. Great Products and excellent service.  Please keep up the good work. Thanks again"
2004-06-02
"Thanks for a great product! I upgraded the 30GB hard drive in my Panasonic Showstopper with one of your 120GB units last week. The installation instructions could not have been more concise . It only took about 15 minutes to remove the old drive and pop in the new one. I went through setup and voila, 4 times the space. Thanks again!"
2004-06-02
"Ordered on Monday \xef\xbf\xbd Drive Shipped on Tuesday \xef\xbf\xbd Received and installed in 20 minutes on Wednesday! Your 160 GB replacement for Series 2 could not have been easier.  Instructions were flawless. Excellent product \xef\xbf\xbd Excellent service."
2004-06-01
"you guys are awesome!  installation was very easy, now my direct tivo has 157 hours!  and it worked the first time i plugged it in after the upgrade.  i\'m telling all my friends that have tivos to get the upgrade!"
2004-06-01
"I just replaced the 40G drive in my replaytv with a 160G Quickview.  Could not have been easier.  Thanks for providing this service.  Good work."
2004-05-25
"I received my Tivo upgrade kit yesterday.  In less than 20 minutes I was\r\nback on line with lots of memory.  The directions were clear, easy to\r\nfollow, and very precise.  It is a pleasure dealing with people who care\r\nabout their products like you do! Thanks again!"
2004-05-20
"Received my SVR-2000 hard drive replacement and had my TiVo up and running in 15 minutes! I can\'t tell you how delighted I was with the easy instructions, and the forward-blip button instrux was a great bonus! I will tell all my friends who have TiVo about you, and please don\'t stop marketing on the Internet so others can find! Thanks again!"
2004-05-15
"Hi Guys..\r\n\r\nI just (this afternoon) upgraded our Series 2 Tivo from 42 hours to 189 hours with your 120GB upgrade drive. It took me about 20 minutes to read through the easy to follow and clear instructions (which, I agree, are pretty important to review, even if you have a good deal of PC-upgrade experience) and about 30-minutes to perform the actual upgrade. No harder than adding a hard drive to a desktop PC, but there\'s a bit of finesse to it (as explained in the instructions).\r\n \r\nI like the way you guy have designed an ABS bracket to accommodate the second drive and extra cooling fan. Everything fit tight and snug. Nice job!\r\n \r\nI\'d recommend using www.weaknees.com to my friends who own TiVo systems."
2004-05-07
"Dear Michael & Jeff,\r\n\r\n\r\nGot the drive and installed it. Your directions were proven to be idiot proof, and it was easy to do. Thanks for your product and your service. You guys rock.\r\n\r\n\r\nRandy\r\n"
2004-05-07
"Thank you so much! I just upgraded my TiVo in 10 minutes and now have up to\r\n229 hours of recording time.\r\nYou guys are the best!"
2004-04-29
"Hi Guys,\r\n\r\nJust wanted to thank you for a great product. I ordered the Series 2 TiVo upgraded to 180 hours and it works great. This is possibly the best product I ever bought."
2004-04-25
"Dear Michael and Jeff,\r\nYour DirecTivo upgrade kit is awesome and was SO easy to install!  I\r\njust got my stock 40GB DirecTivo box on Friday and upgraded\r\ntonight...now at 200G total, sweet!\r\n\r\nThanks for the simple and easy to understand pictorial instructions."
2004-04-24
"Hello,\r\nI wanted to say thank you. I ordered an additional harddrive to add to my DirecTV Tivo, and it arrived promplty. I was very surprised by how thorough the directions were. Very good job. Now we get to enjoy 180 hours of Tivo!"
2004-04-20
"I just wanted to say you guys are awesome.  I bought an expansion hard drive for my DirecTIVO and it took about 45 minutes to install.  It worked perfectly and with your twinbreeze and extra fans I dropped my operating temp from 43c to 35c...\r\n\r\nWhat an awesome product.  I\'ll be looking for a second TIVO in the future and then probably an HD Tivo down the road.  I won\'t even consider anywhere other than Weaknees.\r\n\r\nThanks again for a great product!"
2004-04-17
"Just wanted to let you know how happy I am with your upgrade kit. I just finished installing it on my Directivo. Everything went very smoothly,and your instructions were very clear. It took me about an hour, but that was because I was trying to be very careful to not dislodge the grey front panel ribbon cable.(Like you warn about). I powered it up, and now I have up to 144 hours with my extra hard drive. Thanks again, and you can be sure I will recommend your upgrade kits to my friends."
2004-04-13
"Yep! The reviews were right! You guys rock! I got my upgrade kit in just a matter of days. (much sooner than I would have expected) It was well packed, and the instructions were awesome! (like a TiVo upgrade for dummies!) I had it all together in about 30-45 minutes and it worked like a charm!  Thanks weaKnees!  What can I say... keep up the good work!"
2004-04-12
"Took my Hughes SD-DVR40 from 35 hours to about 144 hours in no time at all - almost too easy... thanks for making it a breeze!"
2004-04-08
"I just wanted to let you know how great your service is. I was able to upgrade my 40 hour TiVo to a 205 hour TiVo without a hitch. The fact that everything is provided is a blessing. Everything goes as it should thanks to the detailed instructions provided. Now, hard drive space is no longer a concern. Thank you!"
2004-04-05
"Hi,\r\n\r\nI just want to let you know that I had absolutely NO\r\nPROBLEM installing the TiVo upgrade kit that I ordered\r\nfrom Weaknees.  You guys put together some GREAT\r\nquality instructions!  \r\n\r\nInstallation of the kit took me slightly more than one\r\nhour, instead of the 30 minutes that others have\r\nclaimed.  However, because I have absolutely NO\r\nhigh-tech prowess, I typically end up re-reading\r\ndirections about a half-dozen times before I try\r\nsomething.\r\n\r\nEasy-schmeezy!  Thanks!"
2004-04-05
"I\'ve never taken apart any electronics and was a bit scared.  I only tried adding the extra drive myself because several friends of mine had already done so and said it was easy.  And it was.  Took me 45 minutes.  Fantastic instructions and the only skill set needed is how to use a screwdriver."
2004-04-04
"Hi:\r\n\r\nJust wanted to let you know that I received my upgrade kit and the\r\ninstallation went great.  In about an hour, I was finished and enjoying my\r\nTiVo with the new higher capacity.\r\n\r\nI\'m already eyeing the new Pioneer 810H with DVD recording for my second\r\nunit!\r\n\r\nThanks for your great service and for a trouble-free setup!"
2004-04-02
"I just wanted to drop a note and let you know that the Tivo rocks with \r\nthe upgrades.  With two new drives in my Tivo I am stockpiling movies \r\nlike a madman.  You guys are great and I really appreciate all of the \r\nhelp and support.  Thanks"
2004-04-01
"Your company is phenomenal!  WeaKnees gave me the best buying experience\r\nI\'ve ever had.  I simply cannot say enough good things about my\r\ntransaction--it was simply outstanding from beginning to end.\r\n\r\nI was having difficulty deciding which replacement to purchase for my dead\r\nTivo.  I sent you two email questions which were not only answered promptly,\r\nbut gave me exactly the information I needed.  I ordered a new drive on\r\n3/31, received it via FedEx on 4/1, and I was up and running by Prime Time\r\nThursday.  The instructions were clear, the kit was complete (tools and\r\nall!), and I had no trouble at all replacing the drive.  I initially had an\r\norder mixup and Jeff took the initiative to call and clarify my needs.  That\r\nis truly a rarity in customer assistance and was much appreciated.\r\n\r\nThanks again for your great company, your attention to detail, and your\r\nsuperb customer service."
2004-04-01
"Just a quick word to tell you how impressed I was with your product.  Got it this evening, and installed it without a hitch thanks to your clear instructions and well-engineered product.  I went from a mere 35 hours of capacity to over 140 hours with no difficulty!  Thanks very much!"
2004-03-25
"I just installed the TIVO series 2 second drive upgrade WOW what a breeze, just thought I\'d let you know great product, great directions and good product."
2004-03-23
"My order arrived today and worked great!  Thanks for the fast and \r\nrealiable service!"
2004-03-22
"What excellent service.  My email question was answered the same \r\nmorning, my upgrade was delivered the day after I ordered it (living in \r\nL.A. helped, I am sure), and it was 15 minutes from opening the TiVo to \r\nclosing it with the new drive in place.  Thank you very much."
2004-03-21
"Just a word about my Tivo upgrade kit. What a piece of cake installing \r\nthe new hard drive for my SVR-2000. It took about 5 minutes to install \r\nonce the cover was off. It is now up and running just fine."
2004-03-21
"Just a word about my Tivo upgrade kit. What a piece of cake installing the new hard drive for my SVR-2000. It took about 5 minutes to install once the cover was off. It is now up and running just fine. "
2004-03-13
"I bought an upgrade kit from you - added a drive to my Hughes Directv Tivo.\r\n\r\nI started the install at 10:45 this morning - its now 11:23 and its installed and working great.\r\nI had 35 hours of recording time - its now 144 hours!.\r\n\r\nThe instructions were easy to follow and comprehensive.\r\n\r\nThank you for a great product."
2004-03-13
"I just wanted to let you know that I received my Hughes HDVR2 upgrade and it is working perfectly!\xef\xbf\xbd I unpacked all items, reviewed the excellent instructions and within 35 minutes I was complete.\xef\xbf\xbd I would have been completed sooner, but I double and tripled checked every connection to make sure I had it right.\xef\xbf\xbd It was a breeze.\xef\xbf\xbd I added to my original drive with a 120 GB upgrade and when completed I had 144 hours of storage.\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\n\r\nAlso I purchased the upgraded fans and the unit is noticeably quieter.\r\n\r\n\r\nThank you from a very satisfied customer"
2004-03-11
"I have never taken the back off of any electronic device that I could not afford to do without (definitely not the case with my TiVo). I ordered an additional 160 GB hardrive to add to my 80 hour Series 2 TiVo. From the time I took my TiVo off of the shelf until I placed it back and plugged it back in was 35 minutes. The directions were clear and concise, everything fit perfectly, it could not have been simpler. Best of all, I now have a 243 hour TiVo.\r\nThe genius of TiVo is in the user interface. The best compliment I know to give is that Weaknees does itself proud as a companion to TiVo. Weaknees is every bit as user friendly, every bit as high quality, every bit the equal of TiVo in quality, service, and value. Thank you for dramatically improving the enjoyment I receive from my TiVo. That is the highest praise I know to give. You deserve it.  "
2004-03-10
"I received your upgrade kit in the mail a couple of weeks ago, and with little more experience than installing a sound card in a PC, I was able to successfully install the 2nd drive and fan with no problems whatsoever on my Directv TiVo.  It took me longer than the advertised 15 min, but I was particularly careful about the known connector issue that you mentioned.  I would recommend your service to anybody and will upgrade again in the future after I buy my 2nd TiVo.  Thank you!"
2004-03-09
"Wow! Did I mention "Wow!?"\r\n\r\nWhat a wonderful experience this was. The package showed up on time and exactly as expected.  I ordered a 160 GB upgrade for my series 2. From the time I opened the package to the time I was booted up was 40 minutes. I will recommend your product line to anyone I know with a TiVo.  The instructions were clear, components fit perfectly and best of all, I now have 246 hours of TiVo time. Thanks so much!"
2004-03-09
"Weaknees folks,\r\n\r\nI recently purhcased a 100 hour upgrade kit for my Philips series 2 DirecTivo.  It shipped quickly, arrived a day earlier than expected, and took all of 30 minutes to install.  The twinbreeze bracket is excellently manufactured and installing everything was truly easier than plug and play.  I now have dual tuners and up to 144 hours of storage time.  It is definitely awesome.  I am a PC Tech by trade and could have done the upgrade all on my own, but I wanted the conveniece that a kit offered.  I was not dissapointed.  Thanks, Weaknees, and keep up the good work!"
2004-03-08
"Thank you for such a great product and easy install instructions. I have an old 14 hour Phillips TIVO and just upgraded to your 140 hour hard drive - took me just 20 minutes start to finish!! Thanks again"
2004-03-05
"I just installed your 145 hour kit in my Tivo Series 2.   I took about an hour because I was being very cautious--I could have done it faster.  I was amazed at how everything fit so easily and well.  I plugged my Tivo back in and within minutes it was warmed up and running perfectly--with 110+ hours at medium quality!  Thank you for making the upgrade so easy." 
2004-03-05
"Item: 120 GB Series 2 Upgrade with TwinBreeze\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\nI just want to say thanks for my order. I received it today at 2:30 and had it installed and working by 3:00. I had previously read the install info (downloaded from your website) and had no problems with the installation.\r\n\r\nGreat product!!!\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\nI hope you will soon be working on upgrades for the new HD DVR!!"
2004-03-03
"I ordered a replacement drive for my Phillips Tivo (the old hard drive had gone south) on Sunday.\xef\xbf\xbd\xef\xbf\xbd I got your ship notice on Monday and the new drive arrived today (Wednesday).\xef\xbf\xbd Even though I\'ve only opened a few Tivo -like boxes (I did add memory to a Mac once), it only took me 15 minutes from start to finish to swap out the drive.\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\nYour tools and instructions made it a snap.\xef\xbf\xbd My Tivo was back in action soon thereafter.\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd\r\n\r\nThanks again\r\n\r\n\xef\xbf\xbd"
2004-03-02
"Guy\'s I installed the kit tonight....\xef\xbf\xbd Took about 10minutes max....\xef\xbf\xbd Really a nice package the way you put it together.\xef\xbf\xbd Just wanted to say thanks much."
2004-03-02
"Michael and Jeff[,] A very big THANKS to you guys. I received my 160 hard drive and was able to install it without any trouble.\r\nthe instructions were perfect.  Anyone having been inside  computer like myself should have no problem at all. Your service is great. I love my new TIVO hard drive.!!!!"
2004-03-01
"Dear Michael and Jeff,   I received my upgrade kit today - thanks!! I\'m completely blown away.  I\'m a little scared of hardware (programmers were\r\ntrained to be so), so I approached the installation with a little bit of nervousness.  35 minutes after starting (including waiting 5 minutes for the Tivo2 to\r\ndischarge), I powered up the Tivo with the additional 120GB drive installed. Everything works perfectly! This is the best significant upgrade kit I\'ve ever used:  all of the parts are\r\nhigh quality, everything fit perfectly, without bending, prying, spit or scotch\r\ntape. Best of all, the instructions were perfect, including anticipating questions I had. Congrats on a GREAT product! I will definitely be recommending Weaknees to all my Tivo-owning friends."
2004-02-29
"I contemplated doing the upgrade myself by buying an over the counter hard drive.  I\'m glad I didn\'t!!!  Your kit was simple and straightforward and well worth the few extra coins- the bracket was extremely well made and everything fit perfectly in my Series 2 unit- The instructions make everything plug and play."
2004-02-21
"Hi. I just watned to tell you about my delightful installation experience. \r\n\r\nAfter two years, my 35 hour (original) hard drive failed in my Sony\r\nDirecTivo. As you know, Sony no longer makes this model. But I like the\r\nremote and I like the user experience -- although I\'m not sure which is Sony\r\nand which is TiVo. I was dreading buying a new system and then I remembered\r\nWeaKnees. \r\n\r\nI ordered a replacement drive on Monday and received it on Friday. I got\r\nhome on Friday at 8pm and was back in TiVo-land by 9pm. Your instructions\r\nwere clear and the your use of pictures and illustrations meant that I\r\nreally didn\'t have to read too much. And as you anticipated, I got the\r\nfailure at 28% -- but I was expecting it from your addendum and followed the\r\nsupplemental instructions. Overnight, TiVo updated my software and now I\'m\r\nprogramming all my Season Passes again. \r\n\r\nThanks for a great product, great service, and great instructions.\r\n\r\n(PS. Feel free to use my name in your promotions. I have posted a rave\r\nreview on my blog at http://www.productmarketing.com). \r\n"
2004-02-21
"I am thrilled with the kit. It was just as described on your website. Before starting on the upgrade, I looked in my DirectTV\'s TiVo list for upcoming recordings. I had 50 minutes until the next scheduled TiVo event. I did \'the operation\' carefully as per your wonderful instructions, and was able to record the next scheduled event without a problem! It doesn\'t get any easier than that! I was afraid that the upgrade was going to be like a typical Windows upgrade where everything sounds easy on paper, but you have to trouble shoot for three hours afterwards for what you thought was a simple install. Boy was I wrong!"
2004-02-18
"I now have a 322 hour TiVo in fine working order.  It took me under an hour, at a leisurely  pace, from beginning to end.  The instructions were very detailed and clear.  I would rate my level of experience as high - I\'ve assembled my own PCs before, so installing IDE drives is no biggie.  I think anyone could do this though - it\'s easier than assembling a piece of Ikea\r\nfurniture.  The photos with parts labelled were very useful.  The items I got in the kit matched exactly what was shown in the instructions. Excellent service from your company...!"
2004-02-16
"I just wanted to take a moment to write you about an upgrade package I ordered from you. I easily found all the information about upgrading my DVR on your site as your site is extremely "user friendly." I had an existing 40 GB HD which provided about 35 hours of recording. Problem was, I couldn\'t even record my favorite football\'s team NFL season with that capacity. In the past, I have upgraded my PC including memory, video and hard drive modifications but I was still a little leary about opening up my TIVO DVR. With your site\'s guidance, I decided to go with installing an additional HD as opposed to replacing the original. I purchased the 120 GB HD upgrade providing an additional 105 hours. I received the upgrade on a Wednesday and reserved my Saturday morning for installing it, figuring it would be a real chore. That Saturday, I began the install at 9:30 AM. Your instructions are incredible. Easy to understand and fully illustrated. To my shock, by 9:45 I was plugging my upgraded (now approximately 150 hour capacity) DVR back into the wall. I powered it up and ran the system check and bingo, I was good to go. Thank you WeaKnees for a truly great product and a truly wonderful web-site.\r\n\r\nThanks again from a now loyal customer"
2004-02-09
"The upgrade from 35 hours to 120 hours only took us 20 mins!  WOW!!!!!!!  Thanks for making his process so painless.\r\n\r\nWe love it.\r\n\r\nKeep up the GREAT work!"
2004-02-09
"I just wanted to tell you that I couldn\'t be more pleased with your product and your website.  I added a drive to my hdvr2 and eveything worked and fit exactly as described.  The intructions were very detailed and easy to follow.  What a first class operation you all are running!"
2004-02-07
"I just wanted to drop you a line to say how happy I am with the upgrade kit I purchased from you.  It arrived right on time.  The directions were clear and easy to follow.  The parts fit perfectly.  I was able to add a drive to my stand alone Tivo in about an hour and it worked perfectly the very first time.\r\n\r\nIt is very nice to order something and have it be everything advertised and more.\r\n\r\nKeep up the good work!\r\n"
2004-02-04
"I received my upgrade kit from Weaknees today.  I ordered it on Friday, and they shipped it Monday....The directions were superb; I believe that a third-grader could follow them and install the drive."
2004-02-04
"I just wanted to let you know how happy I am with your service. Your website had an easy to use and understand troubleshooting guide and I got quick response to my e-mail question.  I ordered a hard drive and you sent it right away (FedEx took their time in delivering it but that was not your fault.) The installation instructions were clear and in english! I am the techie in our house but I think that even my husband could have followed the instructions and been successful in replacing the drive. Thanks for the great service!!"
2004-02-02
"I just finished the install of your upgrade kit on my SD-DVR40. It was extremely easy, straight forward and enjoyable.  Instructions were excellent and everything fit great. I had 35 hours of recording time before and now I have 144 hours. So \r\ncool! Thanks for being there."
2004-01-30
"Finally got around to installing your drive bracket and fans on my SD-DVR40.  The system is now whisper quiet and 10 degrees cooler even with a second drive.  Thanks for great product and clear instructions   Couldn\'t have asked for more!"
2004-01-28
"I received my new Hughes DirecTivo yesterday (ordered on Monday).  All I can say is, \'Great product, great service and a very competitive price.\'  If I get another DirecTivo unit it\'ll come from weaknees.com."
2004-01-25
"I finished upgrading my DSR7000 from its 35 hours to over 210 hours with your Twinbreeze kit and your interactive instructions.  I was so easy and simple.  You helped take our TIVO experience to a whole new level.  Thank you so much."
2004-01-24
"I recieved my additional upgrade drive, installed it with no problems, and I now have a max of 188 hours on my series two. I must admit I\'ve built tons of PC\'s so I had confidence, but with your instructions pretty much anyone can do it."
2004-01-18
"I installed everything today in about an hour, start to finish. Everything was exactly as described, the instructions were clear and detailed, and the whole process was very straightforward. To my wife\'s utter amazement, after I installed the new hard drive, power supply and fan, the machine booted right up, all the settings stayed intact and I found I now have 62+ hours of Best Quality while the temp dropped by 8 degrees C. Thanks for the excellent service and a fine product at a fair price."
2004-01-17
"What a pleasure it was to install your upgrade kit.  Everything fit and worked perfectly.  Thanks for the great products."
2004-01-13
"I ordered one of your upgrade kits last week.  It shipped out promptly and arrived quickly.  Everything was well-packaged and easy to use.  The directions were well-written and easy to follow.  The process of installing the upgrade was simple and took about 20 minutes.  Thanks!"
2004-01-10
"When my 3.5 year old Tivo went black, I visualized buying a new one plus even worse, a new lifetime service; things seemed bleak.  But I googled "Tivo repair" and up popped Weaknees.  Three days later, for a modest price and an effortless replacement,  our world is bright again not to mention 90 hours instead of 30.  You guys are the best.\r\n"
2004-01-10
"I installed one of your hard drive upgrades into my Tivo and tripled my storage space.   Your design was so simple and the instructions were just great.  Thanks for this product.  Keep up the good work."
2004-01-08
"I recently purchase an upgrade from you.  I was a little concerned about the installation; but your instructions were great and everything went smoothly.  It was easy and well worth the price and effort.\r\n\r\nToday, my other DirectTivo, not the one upgraded hung.  I went to AVSForum for help and found a weaKnees post that exactly addressed my problem.\r\n\r\nI am now doubly thankful that I gave you my business."
2004-01-06
"When I set up the kitchen table to upgrade our 80GB TiVo over the holidays, there was a lot of eye-rolling from my spouse, who\'s seen more than her share of technology-driven frustration in our household. Thirty easy minutes later and without so much as a single four-letter word, I was reconnecting our TiVo and easing it back into place. Thanks, guys - your product is a rarity these days: it\'s reasonably priced, it\'s easy to install and configure, and it works exactly as you promise it does. Keep up the good work."
2004-01-06
"Replacement HD shipped out the same day I ordered it.  Install was a breeze.  I upgraded my 35 hr Tivo to a 105 hr unit at a fraction of the cost of a new unit.  Great service!  Keep up the good work!"
2004-01-06
"Wow. Installed my upgrade to my Samsung last night and it was a breeze. Your instructions were perfect, all parts fit and worked as they were supposed to and best of all, my unit is now much quiter than it was before. Internal temp is down 8 degrees centergrade as well. The entire experience working with you and your product was excellent. Thanks, Joel"
2004-01-06
"My Christmas present (to myself) was an 80 hour Tivo.  As I record most things at high resolution, within a few days I was having to manually manage space as the Tivo hard drive quickly got loaded up.  After spending some time reading on the Tivo Community Forum, I ordered your bracket and upgrade kit and I had absolutely no trouble adding a 120gb drive to my Tivo.  Just wanted to say that the kit was well designed and the instructions were very clear.  Thanks for a great product guys!"
2004-01-03
"Thanks! You guys run an awesome business. I have 2 of your units. Your service is the absolute best and your instructions are the most detailed and foolproof I have ever seen. And your kits are complete all the way down to included wrenches. Feel free to use this testimonial. I wish you guys all the best."
2004-01-02
"Received your Twinbreeze bracket and fan kit.... I was greatly impressed by the quality of the kit and instructions.  The enclosed tip about enabling the 30 second skip was worth the price of admission!  I\'ll be sending a bunch of TiVo pals your way."
2004-01-01
"I just performed my 160GB upgrade for my HDVR2.  The upgrade kit was way more professional than I ever expected!  Everything was perfect including the instructions and thr upgrade went flawlessly in less than 30 minutes.  I am a computer engineer and considered doing the upgrade myself using tools from the web, but now I am thrilled that I used WeaKnees instead.  I will be telling my friends."
2003-12-31
"lets start with saying that when it comes to electronics I\'M AN IDIOT. i got my upgrade box, my daughter said dad do it saturday afternoon it will take YOU 4 hours and you will for sure get stressed out. i said no tonight is the night, i opened the box saw all the parts looked at the instructions and was kicking myself for not buying my tivo from YOU already upgraded.  i debated sending it back and paying you guys the service fee to do it for me. BUT i laid it out on the kitchen table and voila 20 minutes later it was done i did not have a single problem, your instructions were amazing. Let me remind you i am an IDIOT. AND I DID IT STRESS FREE IN 20 MIN. THANK YOU THANK YOU THANK YOU FOR AN EASY UPGRADE"
2003-12-31
"After reading about you from epinions.com and tivocommunity.com, I got a sense that you guys were the ones to buy a modded Tivo from. My Tivo (180 GB with upgraded fan package) arrived a full week earlier than FedEx predicted and is whisper quiet. I love the fact that I didn\'t have to mod it myself, saving me a lot of time. You sure made a believer out of me and I shall recommend you to all - thanks and Happy New year!"
2003-12-30
"Thanks for the great upgrade to  my Phillips 212.  My wife purchased the 120Gb add on hard drive.  It installed with no difficulties at all.  And thanks for the tip on opening the TIVO case. A great product with great service. Regards,"
2003-12-28
"Thanks for the easy upgrade for our HDVR2. You said it would be easy, but I had no idea just how easy--the hardest part was extricating the TiVo from the \'entertainment monolith,\' that stack of five boxes under the TV. (The audio equipment is in the next room, fortunately.)Your instructions were excellent, and the price competitive. Brilliant!...Again, thanks for the great upgrade kit. It just doesn\'t get any easier. I don\'t know which was most impressive--the mounting bracket, the customized parts kit, or the detailed instructions. I guess I have to vote for the instructions, because even most equipment manufacturers no longer provide such detailed information."
2003-12-26
"Its my second order and my second outstanding experience. The order was 100% correct and delivered before I expected it. You have perfected the all too elusive internet shopping formula: Quality Products+ Competitive Pricing and a truly excellent Service First attitude Thank you very much!"
2003-12-21
"You guys have the greatest product and service!  Where else could I get my Tivo raised from the dead in just days?  I placed my order Sunday night and received and installed my drive on Wednesday night.  It took longer to get DirecTV to set up correctly than it did to open the TiVo and swap the drives.  You are awesome.  Thanks for doing what you do!"
2003-12-20
"Just installed my \'add\' kit to my SVR-2000. The original hard drive died a few days ago. I found your site on the TiVo Community forum, ordered it and it was delivered today. Installation was a breeze and I\'m back up and running. Thanks for saving my TiVo!"
2003-12-12
"When my Sony SVR-3000 (not even 1 year old!), started freezing and making a strange chirping noise I knew I was in trouble.  I got on the internet to look for a repair center and luckily Google also came up with your site.  At first I was a bit skeptical, but after reading your press and customer reviews, I decided to order a replacement drive.  The drive came with clear instructions and I was up and running in no time with more recording time than I had before!  I\'m glad I didn\'t waste the time or money to send the unit out to a service center.  Who knows when I would have gotten it back and how much it would have cost me.  Your service is terrific and your products are the BEST solution.  Thanks a million!!!"
2003-12-11
"Hey Weaknees, Got the shipment yesterday as promised. The instructions were great!  The \r\nentire job, replacing drive and installing new fan, took me 30 minutes.  My Tivo\'s back up and running, missed only 2 days of TV.  Thanks guys!  I\'ll be shopping with you again when I need Tivo stuff."
2003-12-11
"Hey guys: Your service is .... In one word.... AWESOME! I put the drive in, and it worked immediately! Thanks again, and Merry Christmas!!! Sincerely,"\r\n
2003-12-07
"Two weeks ago, I purchased a single HD upgrade for my HDVR2.  The install couldn\'t have been simpler!  20 minutes after opening my order, my TiVo was rebooting with expanded space.  You provided easy to follow instructions plus all the tools needed!! Thanks!  You guys are great!"
2003-12-06
"Just finished my upgrade of a Hughes HDVR2 to a 144 hrs and I wanted to let you know what a great kit you provide. Everything fits perfectly, is easy to install, and the directions are foolproof.  Nice job!"
2003-12-01
"My Direct Tivo upgrade was fast and easy. Good directions, solid bracketry support, long connection cables. Directions were very good. Easy to follow."
2003-11-26
"... I\'m not one to quickly praise a product right after I purchase it, but in your case I must make an exception.  Being an old Linux hack, I thought long and hard about performing a hard disk upgrade myself, but after pricing out the components, and time involved, I chose to go with one of your kits.  My package arrived in record time, and after 20 minutes of beginning the installation, I was once again watching my TiVo, with lots of recording space.  The instructions were excellent, and the installation was a snap.  Thank you very much."
2003-11-22
"Hello, After receiving my order, I had to e-mail you. I am not the type of person that writes or e-mails companies about product satisfaction often. In fact, I think this is my first time. I would like to let you know how satisfied I am with our TwinBreeze product. The build quality is superb. The parts selection great!...Thank[s] for making a fantastic product at a great price. Take Care,"\r\n
2003-11-22
"I would just like to extend my extreme thanks to you for the quick order processing and deilvery of the tivo upgrade for my HDVR3.  It is by far one of the best things I have ever ordered off of the internet and your kit was designed nicely.  It works perfectly and has added tons of time to my recording.  I assure you that any of my tivo needs in the future will be sent through you and I will suggest this kit to all of my friends that do and do not have tivo.... Thanks again."
2003-11-21
"Dear Weaknees, All is good in the world...I have been without my TiVo for about 3 months \'cause I thought I could fix it my-self. I finally decided on Wed that I\'d had enough! I logged on Weaknees.com and placed an order. On Thursday (am) I decided I wanted my new hdd before the weekend so I called weaknees and asked if they would alter my order to have it here today (Friday). Got home and popped it in, Low and Behold, MY TIVO LIVES!!!!!!!!!!!!!! I can\'t say enough about the folks at weaknees."
2003-11-19
"I just needed to write you guys and say THANK YOU!  I ordered one of your upgrade kits and it was exactly as you described on your website.  Your directions were very simple but detailed enough so that there was no confusion about what to do in the installation process.  You guys made things extremely simple -- it took me less than 25 minutes from the time I unplugged my TiVo to the time I was able to plug it back in, and that\'s including waiting for 5 minutes at the beginning to let the power supply discharge.  You offer a great service, and I\'d recommend you to anyone who is interested in boosting their TiVo\'s capacity.  Thanks again!"
2003-11-18
"Thanks Weaknees, got the HD, and the install was a breeze. Keep up the good work."
2003-11-17
"Installed my 120 GB upgrade in my 60 and it works great. Thanks guys. You do cool work and your website is super!"
2003-11-12
"Thank you so much for your outstanding service and competitive pricing. The items I orderded arrived ahead of schedule in perfect condition. You have earned a satisfied repeat customer.\r\n\r\nNice Job!!"
2003-11-10
"I bought a DirecTV Tivo Unit a few months ago. It is working perfectly w/140 hours capacity.  Last week, I ordered a Tivo 2 Hard Drive upgrade. Shipping was really fast. Installation time: less than 5 minutes. You are doing a great job. Thank You,"\r\n
2003-11-08
"I just installed my first TiVo hard drive, which I purchased when my factory-installed hard drive began to fail.  At first glance, I found the instructions a bit intimidating.  However, once I sat down with my actual TiVo with the instructions, the process of installing the hard drive was incredibly easy.  Although I am fairly adept at \'putting things together,\' I think almost anyone could follow these directions.  Thanks for making it so easy."\r\n
2003-11-08
"I just wanted to say how impressed I was with the nature of your operation. I recently ordered an upgraded HD, and was greeted with curtious help over the phone, timely and informative emails, and a quick and quality shipment. The installation of the HD was very simple, and the product works flawlessly. Just wanted to share a satisfying experience. Regards,"
2003-11-07
"I received my order and am very happy! Timely shipment, excellent\r\ndocumentation and lots more room on my TIVO! Great job -- thanks!"\r\n
2003-10-30
"Just a quick thank you, It took 5 min. to upgrade hassle free. You guys are 1ST class company from taking my order til i installed it.Thanks So Much"
2003-10-29
"I upgraded my Hughes series2 DirecTivo sucessfully. I now have up to 141 hours recording time as stated in system information.\r\nY-AAAAAAAAAAAAAAH.  Thank you"
2003-10-28
"Thanks for the great service and the prompt shipping. I installed the new\r\n fan and hard drive this afternoon. The instructions were thorough and easy\r\n to follow.\r\nThanks very much"
2003-10-26
"The install couldn\xef\xbf\xbdt have been easier.  I\xef\xbf\xbdve installed a lot of computer hardware over the past ten years and your instructions were the clearest that I\xef\xbf\xbdve ever used.  I plugged the Tivo back in and bingo, back in business with 163 hours of capacity.  You all sell a great product."
2003-10-25
"I received my upgrade kit and would like to complement you for the\r\nexcellent step by step instructions and the ease of installation. It took me\r\nabout an hour, but everything went exactly as the instructions depicted. No\r\nsurprises! What a joy to do business with a company that does just what it\r\nsays it will do.\r\nThank You!"
2003-10-23
"I\'m unhappy with Weaknees: Because the upgrade I just bought from you works so great, I will have to buy another upgrade for my other unit. Gee thanks....:-)\r\n\r\nSeriously, I just installed your 120GB upgrade in a Sat-T60 that was noisy and slow. BIG difference. Very quiet drive, and now I don\'t have to wait two minutes after selecting "Record Program" for the unit to regroup and return me to the working screen. \r\n\r\nThanks folks!"
2003-10-23
"I just wanted to let you know how easy it was to install the upgrade kit. My TIVO now has almost 50 hours on the best quality and I had the new drive installed and working within 15 minutes. I am very impressed with Weaknees, from the detailed information on the web page to the ease of installation of the hardware. Thanks for creating quality products with great customer service!!"
2003-10-22
"Just a quick note to let you know how impressed I am with both the products I purchase, and the service I received.\r\n\r\nI was able to install the TwinBreeze bracket, the add-on 160GB drive, and the Advanced Cooling Kit in just over 30 minutes.\r\n\r\nThe TwinBreeze bracket is incredibly sturdy and well designed. The instructions are top notch.\r\n\r\nThe website is very informative and easy to navigate. Every question I had about the products and the upgrade procedures were readily available on the website.  \r\n\r\nMy overnight order was right on time, and packaged well.\r\n\r\nI can\'t find one thing to complain about. In one word... WOW!\r\n\r\nThanks.\r\n"
2003-10-08
"I received my drive yesterday and we are once again enjoying Tivo!\r\n\r\nI just wanted to let you know that I am quite impressed with your\r\ncompany.\r\nTop to bottom - from initial ordering to the clear instructions -\r\nnothing was a problem. It is a pleasure to deal with a good company run\r\nby good people."
2003-10-06
"I am truely impressed! I have now done two add-drive upgrades. One, a Philips Series 2 DirecTivo and second, an older Hughes DirecTivo, and both upgrades were a breeze. The parts were all there, the instructions were clear and easy to follow, and the custom parts for the Philips (hard drive bracket and cooling fan kit) fit perfectly! Plus, of course the added benefit of now having 141 hours recording time on both units. I\'m sorry I waited so long! Needless to say I will recommend to all my friends. Great product!"
2003-09-29
"Great job on your upgrade product.  Everything was well\r\ndocumented, and the upgrade took less than 30 minutes.\r\nIt worked perfectly the first time.\r\n\r\nThanks for everything.  I would be pleased to\r\nrecommend Weaknees to anyone."
2003-09-25
"You all are the greatest thing since TiVo itself. When my TiVo died earlier this week, I went all twitchy and freaked out. What is a gal to do without her precious TiVo? \r\n\r\nWell, providence brought me to your website, and I\'ve been saved. You got my replacement TiVo brain to me overnight (even though I ordered it rather late in the day), and I was able to perform the necessary surgery right in my very own home.\r\n\r\nHe may have been a complete amnesiac after the surgery, but at least he\'s not dead -- causing me to need a new unit AND service contract (which is what I\'d been thinking I\'d have to do).\r\n\r\nIf I could kiss your feet, I\'d do it. Thank you weaKnees!!"
2003-09-24
"So: received and installed in under half an hour. I\'m thrilled. Thank you SO\r\nmuch for the painstakingly constructed instructions-- I spend a lot of time\r\ninside my computer, but this is the first time I ever "cracked" a.v.\r\nequipment. You made me wish there were more things I could take out and\r\nreplace, just for the fun of it. Whooee."
2003-09-22
"Hey-\r\nJust a note of profound thanks! I received the new hard drive\r\ntoday, installed it in about 15 minutes, and my TiVo was back. I guess\r\nI\'ve finally experienced real addiction -- if I didn\'t have the TiVo, I\r\nwould probably just have to give up TV altogether. One weekend without\r\nwas enough -- thanks!"
2003-09-17
"I just wanted to thank you for your awesome product.  I was able to upgrade my DirecTivo box.  I found the instructions very easy to follow and it only took me about 15 to 20 minutes to do.  I went from having 30 plus hours of record time to over 150 hours of record time.  This comes in very handy for a guy like me as I love to record and watch several college football games every weekend and my wife loves to record several of her favorite shows.  Now we don\'t have to scramble to record everything to VCR or watch it right away and then delete so that we can record the next show.  Thanks again."
2003-09-15
"This kit works great and just as described on your webpage.  I think it took about 10 minutes to unpack, read the directions and hook-up and get it dialing.  Something my defunct Tivo modem hadn\'t been able to do for months.  It\'s great to feel the power of Tivo again.  When I save up my nickels and dimes for a disc upgrade I know right where to go:  Weaknees.com!!!  Thanks for all you do."
2003-09-13
"Thank you guys sooooooooooooooooo much! I got the TwinBreeze very quickly! I\r\ninstalled both of my drives\r\non the very sturdy bracket and also mounted the fan on the bracket and replaced the case fan! Once I finished, my Directivo still look factory! The instructions were excellent! The fans are very quiet and has dropped the internal temp by 7 degrees! Thanks again on the quick service and a excellent product!"
2003-09-11
"I just wanted to pass on my thanks for the completeness and accuracy of your upgrade instructions.  Everything went exactly as the instructions for my\r\nSAT T-60 upgrade said they would and now I am a very proud owner of a 141 hour SAT T-60.  As I suspected there is a reason your feedback on the TiVo community forum is so positive!\r\nThanks again"
2003-08-29
"Absolutely stellar upgrade kit, WeaKnees!  I just put in a 120 gig hard drive into my HDVR2 and it went off without a hitch.  The little guy\'s been recording stuff virtually nonstop!  Your instructions were very clear and the twinbreeze hardware is fantastic!  Wanted to say thanks!...Thanks so much and keep up the great work.  I can\'t rave and rave enough about weaknees to all my TiVo friends."
2003-08-22
"I am 100% pleased with my purchase and your company. Your web site is well designed. Navigation was quick and easy.  I found so much great information on your site.  Your web site contained information regarding my problem, how to repair it, even the consequences (like what data would be lost). I was completely prepared!  My hard drive replacement has fixed my video stuttering problem.  The package was securely shipped and everything I needed was included - even the superbly written instructions - and if I lost them I could always download them from your website.\r\nThe ordering process was quick and easy too.  I give your company 10 out of 10.\r\n \r\nI can\'t imagine my life without Tivo.  I am glad I found your company.\r\n \r\nThank you"
2003-08-20
"I just purchased a 105 hour replacement disk from you for my brand-new, never-been-powered-up, HDVR2 unit.  It installed very easily (NICE instructions!), and worked flawlessly.\r\n\r\nI now have the original factory disk with a pristine never-been-booted image on it as a backup.\r\n\r\nThanks for the great service!"
2003-08-19
"Hey guys!\r\n\r\nI have to report my total satisfaction in my TiVo upgrade with this\r\ndrive.  It took only a short 25 minutes to complete!  In fact, it took\r\nlonger for my wife to microwave our dinner while I was doing the work on\r\nmy HDVR2."
2003-08-18
"I just wanted to say how easy it was to replace my broken hard drive on my Tivo. Your trouble shooting guide was right on the money. The new drive arrived so promptly and the installation was a breeze thanks to your organized and easy to follow instructions. I was back up and running in 10 minutes. Thanks for a great service and supporting my tv addiction! If I had known it was this easy, I would have bought a larger drive a long time ago!"
2003-08-17
"Attention Jeff, Just wanted to send this note to let you know that the replacement Hard\r\ndrive that I ordered is working just fine.... I am now one of your biggest supporters and have told all my friends with tivo units about the ease of\r\ndoing the swap. The directions were clear, concise and so easy to follow. Even someone with no hardware experience could do it."
2003-08-16
"I just wanted to thank you for making the replacement of my Tivo SVR-2000\'s hard drive such a breeze. It literally took me about 10 minutes to accomplish. The most difficult part of the swap was sliding the cover off\r\nthe Sony unit (as your PDF instructions warned). So, thanks very much for a quality product and the detailed "how-to" which\r\ngave me the confidence to try it myself. My Tivo is performing flawlessly once again."
2003-08-14
"Got the parts today & installed them, truly a first class package.\r\nThe drive bracket is outstanding.  I kept the original fan but used the supplied washers and installed the new fan.  My internal temperature is now\r\n37C, was 46 / 47C before, good job!!!!!!! The instructions were easy to follow.... Once more this is an excellent product."\r\n
2003-08-12
"Michael and Jeff,\r\n\r\nThe quality of materials in your Twinbreeze kit was\r\nquite impressive. I was tempted to go with a "home\r\ngrown" approach initially, but the resulting ease of\r\ninstallation and professional appearance were well\r\nworth the kit\'s price."
2003-08-11
"I just received your 120GB add on hard drive for my Series 1 Sony TIVO.  My basic quality time jumped from 30 hours to 180 hrs and 38 minutes.  Worth every penny.  And the install was simple and took under 10 minutes.  I was reluctant to order, but am very happy that I did.  There were no hidden costs, tricks, or necessary add-ons.  Every required tool and bracket was included.  I work for a electronics store and will defiantley be recommending you to our customers.  Thanks."
2003-08-11
"Ordered yesterday.  Received today.  Installed in about 25 minutes.   \r\n(Kept dropping hard drive mounting plate screws beside HD and using  \r\nneedlenose pliars to get them out.)  Doing guided setup now.  Can\'t  \r\nwait to never see ("that will cause your other program to be deleted  \r\nearlier...).\r\n\r\n\r\nThanks a bunch!"
2003-08-08
"Received my replace drive today, had it installed in the Tivo within 10 minutes. It succeeded in repairing AND upgrading my DirecTivo, in one simple shot.  Thank you all for the great service, great price and great product."
2003-08-05
"I received my upgrade kit recently for the Series 2 TiVo.  Last night, I actually performed the upgrade; it went flawlessly.  The kit was very professional looking and the bracket seemed very sturdy (unlike most products out there today).  You have a great company based off of a great business plan.  I just wish I would have thought about it first!  There was one thing that was left out of the instructions, though.  You never told me how I can keep my cat off my workbench when I\'m doing the upgrade!  Maybe I should have let my cat play in the TiVo before the capacitors lost their charge.  ;)"
2003-08-05
"You asked for a response: You have one VERY happy customer!!\r\nI don\'t know WHY Sony itself doesn\'t get into it (I asked them) but your idea is great! The instructions (for a 120hr replacement for my Sony SAT-T60) couldn\'t have been clearer (except the "pesky screw" is more pesky than "pesky"),and whoever thought of the idea of including the 2 Torx L-Keys deserves a medal!! I recently replaced the hard drive on my Compaq lap-top computer and had to take it to a computer store to borrow their L-key to open the lid!!!\r\nAlready the TiVo is responding MUCH faster while programming it!\r\nThankyou, thankyou!!!"
2003-08-02
"I just received your kit to install a new drive in my SONY SVR 2000. After reading the online instructions on how difficult the box might be to open I was anxious to get going. I was suprised how easy it opened (that might not be your experience) and after that the switch was easier than upgrading I\'ve ever done to my PC. \r\n\r\nI\'m thrilled that I purchased the upgrade and want the world to know that if you\'ve ever opened up your PC you should have no trouble with an upgrade from Weakness.com\r\n\r\nThanks!"\r\n
2003-08-02
"Guys, I recently bought the TwinBreeze Complete.  What a quality product, and super fast shipping!...[Y]our kit made the upgrade fast and easy.  The instructions were well written and easy to follow.  I would recommend your kits to anyone! Thanks,"
2003-07-23
"I just wanted to drop you a quick note about my recent experience with your company. I can\'t say enough about your service. I sent you my SAT-T60 Tivo via onvernight mail and the shipper didn\'t deliver on time. Rather than making me wait, you went above and beyond to turn around my item in less than one day!  All the while, you were always available for questions or comments. Amazing. More importantly, the new drive installed works great and I couldn\'t be more pleased. Again, amazing work guys - I appreciate it and will return again!!"
2003-07-20
"I wanted to thank you for the excellent WEB site, excellent service in shipping upgrade hard drive and very clear idiot proof instructions in dismantling and reassembling the Tivo unit. Faultless !"
2003-07-16
"I just received the "single drive to dual drive" upgrade kit for the Sony DVR-3000 Tivo unit that I ordered last week.  It took about 15 to 20 minutes\r\nto install the drive and then Tivo started right up.  Painless and almost effortless."
2003-07-16
"My DirecTivo hard drive was clicking up a storm and finally gave into the green screen of death. After hearing about Weaknees at the Tivo community boards, I jetted over and found a 80GB hard drive to replace the old one. In 15 minutes, I installed the hard drive and the Tivo booted up good as new, but this time with 67+ hours recording time! Any reservations I had about purchasing a hard drive for installation were washed away when I saw the Tivo man on my screen again. Thanks!"
2003-07-14
"Michael and Jeff, Got it as promised, installed it in 20-30 minutes, works like a charm. You\r\nguys have definitely got it together. Thanks for a pleasurable experience."\r\n
2003-07-14
"Just wanted to pass along a quick message to tell you what a pleasure it\'s been doing business with you.  Admitedly, I was somewhat hesitant to order a Tivo upgrade kit through the web, let alone open up my Tivo and perform the upgrade myself.  But, approximately one day after my online order, your package arrived at my door (I live in Los Angeles as well).  Within 45 minutes, I had bumped my Tivo capacity from 80 to 225 hours!  The instructions were very clear and there weren\'t any of those spare parts/screws leftover afterwards (I call it the IKEA syndrome). Anyways, just wanted to thank you guys for creating a great service/product. I\'ve recommended you to all of my friends who own Tivos...Best regards,"
2003-07-12
"I am now free of "the green screen of death".  My sony SAT60 now rocks again!  While I had it open I also replaced the fan.  The directions were stellar!  Only 20 minutes from open to plugged in!  This is the first hard drive replacement for me to perform.  What could be easier!  You are the greatest!"
2003-07-11
"The new diskdrive and fan work like a charm.  Amazingly easy to replace.  My\r\nknees were weak but it worked!!"
2003-07-10
"Like so many others, I found your service wonderful. I received my \r\nreplacement and upgrade drives last week and had a computer friend \r\ninstall. He said the instructions were easy to follow and to give his \r\ncomplements to the chef. I plugged in the tivo last night and it worked \r\nlike a dream. Thank you very much.  It is so nice to find a company that \r\ndelivers exactly what it says it will."
2003-07-09
"I just wanted to let you know that I had a brand new Tivo that the Hard Drive quit, and after fighting with Tivo not to pay the $99 service charge, I found your site.  I doubled my hours for almost the same price and fixed it within 20 minutes.  Kudos Weaknees!"
2003-07-08
"My old Tivo went from 12 hrs. to 200 hrs. in about 30 min. It took longer to read the directions than to do the work."               
2003-07-07
"Received my upgrade kit this morning. Within a half hour from the time the fedex guy left, the unit was back in the rack and working. The instructions covered every eventuality, the brackets all fit. everything worked."
2003-07-05
"I just wanted to let you know how simple it was to upgrade my Tivo with your easy to understand directions. I\'m no technological genius, but I managed to add 120 hours to my hard drive in little over an hour. Being generally clueless in such endeavors it was quite a buzz to accomplish this task without a hitch. Fear kept me from doing this upgrade for about 3 months ... how silly I felt once I experienced just how easy it could be.  Thanks for providing such a wonderful product."
2003-07-01
"Thanks for your prompt response.  I have my TiVo hooked up and it is a dream come true. Sincerely a very satisfied customer."
2003-06-27
"The upgrade was documented, design[ed] and supported beyond belief!!!! You bring the confidence and value back to internet purchasing."
2003-06-25
"I give you highest marks for your add-on Tivo upgrade kit. I am a non-techie and just looking at a motherboard scares the static charge out of me, yet your instructions were extremely clear and I had no trouble breezing through the entire installation process in under 45 minutes. My Tivo is now running quieter with two fans and two hard drives than it did initially. The air venting from the rear of the unit is at least 20 degrees cooler than before. And most importantly, I now have 184 hours instead of 40!! I highly recommend your service to anyone considering upgrading their Tivo."
2003-06-20
"Just wanted to drop you an email to let you know how satisfied I was with your upgrade kit.  Easy installation, flawless performance, great service.  I\'ll definitely use your company again, and pass on your URL to all my TIVO buddies."
2003-06-19
"I received my upgrade kit today. I am a senior woman and was able to install it in less than an hour following your directions. Thanks to you and a great product, with clear, easy to follow installation instructions, I now can record about 146 hours."
2003-06-18
"I took me less than 20 minutes from removing the screws and adding harddrive, putting screws back in and powering up unit. Tivo showed that I know had 233 hours of standard recording. On our last vaction out of the country, I actually lost stuff, but that won\'t happen again.  Thanks to you"
2003-06-17
"I just wanted to say thanks. \r\n\r\nTwo days ago my old Phillips TiVo HD up and died after almost 5 years of faithful recording. Here it is two days later, the new HD arrived this morning, setup\'s all finished and I\'ve re-entered my season passes and now I have more capacity than ever. Service was excellent, physical replacement took 15 minutes max, your web site is informative and I am wondering why I didn\'t do this ages ago before it croaked on me.\r\n\r\nYou saved and revitalized my TiVo. Thanks!"
2003-06-16
"Hey Guys!\r\n \r\nI got around to installing the additional disk/twin breeze (after letting it sit in the box for a week or two).  I was expecting to spend an hour or two....\r\n \r\n20 minutes later we were successfully back on line with increased storage....  Great, easy to follow, and comprehensive instructions.  Well designed and fabricated bracket.\r\n \r\nMany thanks.... I\'ll be referring friends your way!"
2003-06-16
"Hi, I just received the 120g HD that I had ordered as a replacement to the 40g that came stock in my series 2. The instructions you provided were pretty good and the install went fine. I just wanted to thank you for the good service. Take care"
2003-06-13
"Just a note of thanks.  I ordered your upgrade kit yesterday, and it is installed and running today.  Start to finish the whole process of installing the new drive took about 30 minutes (at least 10 minutes of which was untangling my Tivo from my home theater set-up).  The instructions were very easy to follow.  Everything in the kit was of the highest quality.  I wanted to upgrade my Tivo for a long time, but was intimidated by the process.  You guys made it a breeze.  I\'ll definitely be recommending WeaKnees to my friends that have Tivos.  Thanks again and continued success."
2003-06-12
"Hi Michael and Jeff. I received my Tivo upgrade yesterday, and the entire installation took ten minutes. Admittedly, I am a computer geek, having many times repaired and built computers, so this was no great exercise for me. However, the ease of the installation, together with the easy to follow directions, make your upgrades suitable for even a novice. Keep up the good work, and thanks again."\r\n
2003-06-12
"I upgraded my TiVo with two 120gb hard drives and your blazing fast replies to my questions immediatley put my fears to rest. My Sony SAT-T60 was the only problem with that "pesky" screw, but your flawless instructions gently warned me of the impending hardship. Also the way you package the products I ordered was amazing! Great job! What can I say but super product, super service, and super support!!\r\nThanks."
2003-06-11
"This is the second 120GB upgrade I have now purchased from you.  Since I have installed another HDVR2 in our bedroom I can not be without the additional recording space.  The first 120GB upgrade I purchased from you a few months ago works flawlessly.  You guys market a quality product with great support and a great web site.  I only wish the other businesses I deal with would have the same business ethics and mentality as you guys have.  Keep up the good work!"
2003-06-11
"Hi There, Just a quick note to say thank you for getting my upgrade to me so quickly. The upgrade to my HDVR2 was fast and easy thanks to your excellent instructions and the high quality of the components, especially the TwinBreeze bracket. Very nicely designed and made. Now my Tivo is more capable and more quiet as well. Thanks again."
2003-06-11
"I ordered my new drive for my hdr312 stand-alone unit.  The drive was shipped quickly and received within 2 days as requested.  Your packaging was perfect to protect the drive during shipping and the installation only took a few minutes.  Now my old 30hr basic qty system is now 141hr basic qty.  I\'ll definitely use your company again in the future for my Tivo needs."
2003-06-09
"I recently purchased a new hard drive for my Tivo Unit from your company.  I could not be any happier with the service you have provided.  Your knowledge of the product was key to me choosing your company.  The instructions were so easy to follow I was up and running in less than 30 munites.  I also received the product in under 4 days from when I placed the order.  Thanks again for the great service, I will be back if I ever need anything else for my Tivo."
2003-06-09
"I am a complete dummy when it comes to following instructions: my girlfriend has to put together our Ikea furniture. But following your step by step manual I was able to upgrade my 60 hour Tivo to 222 hours in about 40 minutes. I am very impressed with your product and its ease of installation."
2003-06-09
"I received the TIVO Upgrade on 6/6/03.  The hard drive was packaged great. The install was so easy with the provided directions that anyone could do\r\nit. I\'m very pleased with the product and service and would highly recommend you to anyone else that needs a TIVO upgrade.  Thanks again..."
2003-06-08
"I recently purchased an 80 GB Hard Drive from your site after the Hard Drive in my Phillips DirecTv/Tivo reciever died.     Rather than completely replace the receiver (for which I can only get 35 hours), I came across your site and decided for a much more reasonable price, I would replace the drive and double the space.   I do work in IT, and I am familiar with computers, but never worked on the inside of one.    The whole process from start to finish took me 30-45 minutes and I am back online!   The instructions were REALLY SIMPLE to follow.   I would highly recommend your product!  Thanks again."
2003-06-08
"Hi! I received my upgrade kit on Friday and yesterday, following the instructions, it took me about 30 minutes to install.\r\nGreat job, guys!  The instructions couldn\'t have been more clear and everything worked just as advertised right out of the box. Thanks again for a great job."
2003-06-04
"I\'ve wanted to upgrade my SONY Sat-60 hard drive for sometime. I was going to do this with the tools on the net with a generic hard drive but when I saw the segment on Tech TV I decided to try your hard drive upgrades. I ordered the drive on Friday, It shipped the same day and I received the drive on Tuesday. It was very simple with your instructions and tools supplied. I now have a 120 hour Tivo and the original drive as a back up. \r\n\r\nGreat service and product."
2003-06-03
"I just installed an additional 120GB drive and two fans into my TiVo series 2.  It went flawlessly.  Rarely have I seen instructions that were so simple to follow for what could be a scary process.  Great job!"
2003-05-30
"I would just like to say you provide a great sevice. My original drive died and with no back-up and having never upgrading you guys were a lifesaver.Your product did exactly as promised and was delivered in a timely manner at a fair price. I also want to say thanks for all the help I have received form Weeknees on the TiVo Forums."
2003-05-28
"I did the fan replacement and disk upgrade this past weekend and everything went almost too smoothly.  Everything fit, and the directions were perfect.\r\n\r\nCongratulations on providing a great service in a professional manner.\r\n\r\nBTW, it only took about 15 minutes from shutdown to restart!\r\n\r\nKeep up the good work!"
2003-05-23
"Just installed a 120GB upgrade w/fans in my HDVR2.  I couldn\'t be\r\nhappier!  Your instructions are superb.  Thanks for a great product."
2003-05-23
"You guys are great!! Thanks for making a wonderful product that is so easy to install."
2003-05-23
"Michael and Jeff, I would like to say \'THANK YOU\' for about the most pleasant on line purchases I\'ve made.  Not only did you put up with all my silly questions, you got the product out to me in MACH order.  You are certainly to be commended on the way you go overboard to please your customers.  BRAVO!!"
2003-05-22
"I just wanted to give you a BIG Thanks! Your website & service are the best! I ordered my Replacement HD Tue at 4pm EST & received it the next day at 2pm. FANTASTIC!  I was so bummed out when my Tivo died & so thrilled when I stumbled upon your site! And your rapid responce to my Emails were just short of incredible! What a refreshing pleasure to find such a helpful place to for service. Im sending a email to Home Theater mag they need to know about you guys!"
2003-05-22
"I just wanted to let you guys know that the upgrade I purchased went so well that it has been the high point of my month.  Thanks again for the great products and services."
2003-05-21
"Just wanted to send you guys an email to thank you for the wonderful \r\ncustomer service I received when attempting to install a new hard drive in \r\nmy Hughes HDVR2.  When the system wouldn\'t boot up thanks to an error on my \r\npart, I sent you an email which had a reply within minutes directing me to \r\nthe source of the problem.  Now my unit has 140 hours!  Thanks again!"
2003-05-05
"It worked great! My TIVO failed just as I was getting ready to replace the drive. It now works perfectly again. Thanks a bunch!"
2003-05-04
"The upgraded HDVR2 I purchased from you continues to work flawlessly.  It\'s nice that TiVo fans have people like you to depend on. Keep up the good work. Like your redesigned website!"
2003-05-02
"Ordered the [120GB] upgrade to my Sony Tivo. Just installed it. The upgrade was perfect, smooth and nothing was left out of the instructions. GOOD JOB!!"
2003-05-02
"Hi, I just finished installing the twin 120GB drives and cooling fans in my Hughes HDVR2.  Wow!  Very easy to follow instructions.  Literally a breeze to do! ... Many thanks for your products!"\r\n
2003-05-01
"Thanks!  Your instructions were excellent and the installation went flawlessly."
2003-04-30
"you guys rock, product was easy to install and now my tivo is \'pumped up\'"\r\n
2003-04-30
"I got the drive yesterday...that was fast! The install was easy...the setup quick...and the drive and quality of the picture rocks! I now have enough space to record all my shows at Best Quality!!! Thanks so much you guys!!!"\r\n
2003-04-25
"Michael / Jeff, Thanks for the prompt reply. I can\'t believe you guys! My friend said that you give prompt service, but that was an understatement. I was just handed the upgrade kit that I ordered YESTERDAY. I look forward to purchasing another kit for my other TIVO when I am finished with this one. I will recommend your company to all my TIVO owning friends. Yours truly,"\r\n
2003-04-23
"Dear Weaknees, Thanks for the great product.  I\'m so happy that I decided not to configure a drive myself.  Fifteen minutes total time and my SAT-T60 has 105 hours.  I\'m sure I\'ll soon be upgrading my wife and kid\'s HDVR2 with one of your kits."
2003-04-23
"Michael & Jeff, I know it\'s been a couple of weeks since our transaction, but I realized I\r\nnever took the opportunity to thank you for your prompt and courteous service. I couldn\'t have asked for a faster more efficient experience. You\r\nanswered all of my questions promptly, and the end product was all you said it would be. It\'s been a real pleasure doing business with you and I will\r\nhighly recommend you at every opportunity. I LOVE all the extra space on my Tivo!"\r\n\r\nThank you again,\r\nTodd Shear\r\n
2003-04-18
"I recently purchased an upgrade kit and installed in about 10 minutes. Very simple and straight forward. The restarting of my Tivo took longer than the installation! Thanks for a great product." 
2003-04-18
"Thank you sooo Much!!  I received the order today 4/18/03  Only three days after I placed it! Took me only 20minutes tops to install new drive. Everything seems to be running fine and I cannot thank or recommend you\r\nenough."\r\n
2003-03-30
"Just a note of thanks for your fine product and service. And one final tipping point for the add-vs-replace question: the new drive is at least 10dB quieter than the one that came with my unit. It\'s a substantial improvement even ignoring the tripled capacity."\r\n
2003-03-25
"you all have made us very happy here in the nation\'s capital. what quality! what quickness! what a great idea! what execution! broken tivo made us sad. then y\'all descended like angels and doubled our power! and it was so easy too! normally i\'m a buffoon, but hey, you made me feel like a champ. now i gots crazy tv propa! thanks a heap! YOU GUYS TOTALLY RULE"
2003-03-24
"Jeff & Mike, My new HDVR2 arrived. Easy to set up to replace my old unit. Thanks to your advice, I was able to recover the cost of my old TiVo standalone unit\'s lifetime subscription via auction.... I cannot believe I did not just buy my first unit from you. You were VERY helpful over the phone, via e-mail and were an absolute pleasure to do business with. I will recommend you in the future to anyone I know that wants TiVo or to upgrade an existing one. Thank you again!!"
2003-03-15
"Thanks for the excellent service! My upgrade kit arrived Friday, 2 days after ordering with FedEx 2 day service. Perfect! About 30 minutes after arriving home last night, we had 118.25 hours available on our Tivo. Wow! Your instructions sheets were very well done; I had zero problems installing everything. After cleaning about 12 months worth of dust from inside the unit, the new drive and it\'s custom bracket and parts fit exactly as they were supposed to. When plugged back in, the unit powered up exactly as if I had only just un-plugged it... except there was a bunch of new hours available. Sincerely, Your Latest Very Satisfied Customer."
2003-02-28
"Got my 120 GB self install drive, added it to my Series 2 60 hr Tivo in 1/2 an hour, and this is the first time I ever opened a computer component! Easy to install, only worried when I accidentally used a magnetized philips screw driver to secure the new drive. I didn\'t even think about themagnetized part until after I was done, but fortunately, it didn\'t cause any problems.... [M]y Tivo jumped from a 60 hr machine to a 220 hour machine and I couldn\'t be happier! Thanks a lot! You guys rock!"
2003-02-21
"I just finished installing my TiVo upgrade kit I purchased from your Company. I build Computers so don\'t generally read the Instructions Even thou I have a Masters in Electronics I must admit I don\'t understand fully how TiVo works so relented and read the Upgrade Instructions. ... My Son and Grandson were both waiting to see how I liked the Upgrade before the purchase it. I just gave them the GO."
2003-01-30
"To Whom It May Concern: I received the Upgrade I purchased last week. I was very impressed with the way the instructions left nothing to chance. It works like a champ. Thank you."
2003-01-29
"Hi Michael and Jeff, I previously upgraded my TiVo brand 60 hour Series 2 and added a 120GB hard drive which I purchased from you and it went very smoothly. I just received my new hard drive that I ordered from you for my Sony SVR 3000 and the installation was extremely easy once again. As before, the instructions were simple to follow and made the install a no-brainer. Well, almost anyway. I did have one question to ask about the jumper on the existing hard drive (not your fault, just my lack of knowledge). You replied to my email with the answer within 5 minutes so my install was not held up at all. And also since I live in CA, I received the poackage in two days by Fed Ex ground. Ordered Monday and received Wednesday. Thanks so much,"
2003-01-25
"Ordered your external modem. 10 minutes to read directions & install. Works great!!!!"
2003-01-19
"Hi, We bought a used PTV100 TIVO which had the 14hr hard drive. The TIVO already had a Lifetime subscribtion purchased for it, and as we used it, it quickly became our favorite device. The only problem was the 14 Hr limit for saving shows. We ordered the 120 gig replace drive from you which would increase our recording time to 114 hrs. The hard drive was received very quickly and took only about 20 minutes to do the replacement. Everything went smoothly with the easy to follow instructions. Everything also worked perfectly fine after restarting the TIVO. We are very pleased with the results, the service, and the advice. Thank you so much for your help and dedication to your business. TIVO really has changed the way we watch television. Being able to pause live tv and all the other great features has made it a must have for us now."
2003-01-18
"Just a note to express my satisfaction with my new dual 120 gig HDVR2 Hughes machine. The unit works great and even seems to be marginally quieter than the previous stock HDVR2 which I returned to Best Buy.... I was surprised that the quality of the recordings appears to be as good as the direct feed I got through my previous RCA DirecTV standard receiver. I added a multiswitch and retained the RCA for direct viewing and notice that switching between the Tivo and the RCA feeds really don\'t show that one is noticeably superior to the other. I have a pretty good 32 inch Sony XBR squared (the one that some of the reviewers used to say gave the best picture they had ever seen on ANY television) and I don\'t really see a real difference. I was prepared for a certain amount of picture degradation (but better than the Super VHS recorders I usually use for time shifting). Anyway, I am very happy."
2003-01-17
"Dear Weaknees, I\'m sure you must get a dozen of this exact same email every single day but, after one has installed a new harddrive and it works and you have to wait for Tivo to set up, what in the world else are you going to do except write your thank you note. I am a 54 year old woman who is not prone to taking stuff apart or putting it back together. My Tivo\'s harddrive started to sputter in the last month or two after years of dedicated (and a whole lot of) use. So I researched solutions. Everything pointed to you. But, could I do it? Your website gave me courage and I ordered. Your delivery time was excellent and the free shipping was sweet. Thank you. I planned my upgrade carefully as I had to watch everything on the harddrive first. Not easy. But, I did it. The hardest part, as you can imagine, was getting the cover off. I nearly gave up several times. Then those little screw drivers you sent are cute but those screws were in there tight and where are the nice big rubber handles to grip with? Not to worry, I managed. In fact, including the dusting out with canned air, the whole thing from unhooking to rehooking took 20 minutes. Total, tops and I spent a lot of that time reading the directions. I plugged it in and turned on the TV and voila! We currently importing even as I type. Thanks so much for a great product and great service. I now not only have a brand new bigger harddrive but the satisfaction of knowing I did it myself. Kinda. Thanks,"
2002-12-30
"Just wanted to advise that my order... arrived quickly and I am thrilled with the product. Your instructions were excellent and the install was so easy that I actually had fun doing it\xef\xbf\xbdit was interesting to see the TiVo\xef\xbf\xbds guts. Your website made it easy to figure out what I needed and your prices were competitive. Good job!"
2002-12-30
"AMAZING! I got my drive today, thanks... It went in without any problems and booted right up. You saved me from having to deal with Sony customer service. I would have been without Tivo for weeks.Thanks for the super fast service!"
2002-12-28
"Fellas! Thank you for such prompt service (and delivery)! I didn\'t think that I would get this before Christmas - I even had the order recepit printed up folded inside a card. You see, this was a gift for my wife. We love our TiVO, but when SciFi ran the "Taken" episodes (10 x 2hrs each) we ran out of room on our 60 hour unit (we only record in BEST mode). Weren\'t we surprised that the VERY NEXT DAY FedEx dropped off a box (before 10am, even!) - not too shabby.The upgrade went without a hitch and we now have a 220-hour (well, 68-hour @ best) TiVO! THANK YOU VERY MUCH! Regards,"
2002-12-26
"Hello, Installation took less than 5 minutes. Booted up and everything worked perfectly. Just wanted to register my satisfaction. Thanks."
2002-12-25
"Hi, I installed my upgrade yesterday and I have to commend you guys. I had some trepidation, but the instructions were great and made every step simple. I will be recommending you to all my friends whom I talked into buying a Tivo."
2002-12-24
"Thought you would like to know the whole process (including ordering and shipping of the drives) went absolutely perfectly. Thanks very much (FYI-Best quality time available went form 9 hrs to 81 hrs-more than just a slight upgrade!!)"
2002-12-23
"My TIVO has been working for a little over one week and it is great. Thanks for your help, you did everything you said you would and it has been a pleasure buying from you."
2002-12-19
"I got my drive and installed it. It works great -- wonderful to have that extra space. AND my HDVR2 makes just about half the noise now (quite subjective) -- nice to have it quieter!"
2002-12-15
"Just installed my new TIVO Hard Drive Upgrade. Your installation directions  were excellent, I had my TIVO up and running better than new in less than an  hour!! I highly reccommend your service.... why buy a new TIVO system when  it\'s so easy to just upgrade the one you have and keep your Lifetime Subscription!"
2002-12-11
"I wanted to pass along my sheer delight in my experiences with you. I ordered a 120gb replacement drive for my Tivo late Monday. It arrived today in a well-padded box. Thanks for that. The instructions were terrific. On a side note: Without a doubt, getting the cover off IS the hardest part!!! :) In less than 30 minutes, I was back up & running on the new drive. The indexing has just finished, and I\'m elated with the new disk space I have at my disposal. Thanks for your efforts. I\'m off to browse your website to see what other goodies I might find!!!"
2002-12-04
"I received a reconditioned hard drive for my TiVo a couple of weeks ago. It works great! Thanks so much for your help and input when I ordered. I am the person that uses the TiVo for a springboard diving practice.... Thanks, again, for your help! You guys were a lifesaver!!"
2002-12-03
"Easy install. Added time really improves tivo. Make all recordings at best quality now and have lots of disk space. Great product! Many Thanks!"
2002-12-02
"Weaknees, You guys may have saved the holiday season. After my original Directivo harddrive went to harddrive heaven, your website was an absolute savior. It answered my questions and allowed me to determine that it probably was the harddrive. Rather than spend the money on a unit, I was able to save $70 and order a larger harddrive all ready for installation instead. And let me tell you, the installation was as easy as can be. Your instructions were the best I have ever seen. My 3 year old now can watch Out of the Box and Sesame Street on demand bringing a bit of sanity to my life during this hectic holiday season."
2002-12-02
"Thanks Guys. Drive arrived fine and I installed it in the same time it took my wife to have a shower :-) Excellent service and really complete kit to do the job. regards"
2002-12-01
"Just a quick note that I received the 120GB HD upgrade that I ordered from you on 11/20/02 for my 40 hour at&t TiVo. Got the drive last Wednesday and installed it before we left town for the holiday. Installing it was a breeze and it has not missed a lick the whole time we were gone! I could have downloaded the software... taken my computer apart... made a backup... well, you get the idea. Just wanted to save some time and the extra money was well spent! I would gladly do it again!"
2002-11-23
"Hi, I rec\'d my new upgrade hard drive on Thursday but didn\'t attempt the install then as I was not feeling well. I did read through the instructions quickly though and started feeling a little apprehensive about doing the install. But this morning (Saturday) I took the plunge and did it. One I had the machine in front of me and opened the instructions became clear and the upgrade went smoothly. The only tough thing was getting the cables to fit properly. Very tight squeeze! I have to compliment you on your easy-to-follow, precise instructions. I\'ve seen many instruction manuals that were vague and general but you sent instructions that are written specifically for the product that you shipped. And the upgraded TiVo is so-far-so-good. I now have 220 hrs instead of the original 60. Many thanks!"
2002-11-04
"Just wanted to say I installed my new hard drive and external modem I ordered from you over the weekend & it was a lot easier then I thought it would be. Because my Tivo is out of warranty Sony would have charged me over 250 bucks just to repair the modem. For a few extra bucks I didn\'t have to send my Tivo away and tripled the storage capacity. Thanks again; I\'ll recommend you guys to other people for sure."
2002-11-04
"I have the first TiVo installed in my area. It is a stand alone unit which originally had about 14 hours of basic storage . I just installed the upgrade hard drive to my TiVo. The instructions were clear, succinct and easy to follow. And there weren\'t a bunch of parts left over. A first for me! Now I have increased my storage capacity 10 fold. Good Job!" 
2002-11-03
"Thank you for developing the modem kit for TIVO. I had been without the use of the modem on my Tivo for almost a year because I didn\'t want to send it to get another cheap modem installed by the manufacturer. It took only a few minutes to get it working and installed. I learned about your company from The Screen Savers television show. Your website is a new and necessary bookmark for me now."
2002-10-30
"I got my 80GB TiVo upgrade today. It took me all of 20 minutes to install. started up my TiVo and was pleasantly surprised to find that I went from a 20 hour recording capacity to a 171 hour recording capacity. Thanks so much!"
2002-10-30
"It worked! Yay. Your directions were simple, everything was in the box.  I was skeptical that it would all work but it did. You just saved me 300.00 over what I would have paid to have a repair shop get my tivo to work again, or the 399.00 I would have had to pay, but would have lost the 2 shows that I had in my "save forever" area of my existing Tivo. If anyone wants to know if you\'re really everything everyone says about you in your "comments" section, tell them they can write me at [
2002-10-16
"Thanks guys for the reminder and for the upgrade service. I have but one thing to say. I LOVE MY TIVO!"
2002-10-02
"I bought a B drive upgrade from you and it works perfect! (80 gigs model) Now I want to upgrade the A drive, is this possible? I would like the 120 gigs model as A drive..... Thanks"
2002-10-01
"[Y]ou guys are the absolute best!!! My new hard drive was delivered to my doorstep in less than a day. It was there when I went out for the morning paper. The easy to follow step by step instructions had my new hard drive installed in less than 30 minutes (it would have only been 20 if it weren\'t for that "pesky screw" :-) ). I\'m now up and running again and with 3 times more recording space. Had I sent it off to Sony I would have been without my precious TiVo for a minimum of 3 weeks and would have gotten it back with the original, puny 35 hour drive at half the price of your 120GB drive. Thanks so much. I am one satisfied customer!" 
2002-10-01
"Thank you for the TiVo upgrade! You guys are a pleasure to work with. You have a great company with fast and dependable service, fast response on e-mails, knowledgeable and professional in every way. I will recommend weaknees to anyone with TiVo troubles. Thanks Again"
2002-09-24
"I just wanted to let you guys know that I received my upgrade kit a day ahead of schedule, and had less than an hour to install it as I was leaving for a week-long trip overseas, and wanted to be able to record all the season premieres this week. The installation took maybe 20 minutes, and everything worked beautifully as soon as my TiVo booted up again. Your product is phenomenal, and kudos to you and TiVo for letting amateur computer hacks like me do some really cool stuff so easily. I\'m now in London, and have no worries that all my shows will fit. BTW, I found that removing the top of the Sony SVR-2000 was made a lot easier by taking a flat-head screwdriver and wedging apart the top piece from the back panel of the TiVo by just a few millimeters really helped being able to push it off. Otherwise, mine wasn\'t budging. Thanks again!"
2002-09-21
"I just wanted to take a minute to say thanks for all of your help with getting my Tivo situation worked out. The replacement drive seems to have done the trick! Installation went smoothly and we are back in business. Thanks again for your assistance. Sincerely,"
2002-09-20
"Hi... Just a short post to let you guys know everything is well with the Tivo Upgrade! Thanks again for the professional and responsive manner of your services. In today\'s Internet, it is rare to find services that say what they will do and do what they say. How refreshing!!!"
2002-09-16
"Gentlemen,  Order was received on Friday, as promised. Thanks for your prompt service.  One unit was upgraded on Friday, one Saturday and two of them today. All upgrades went without a hitch. The instructions were excellent. All upgrades yielded a total of 149 hours (more than expected.) Thanks"
2002-09-11
"Received my modem kit and it works as promised... thank you so much!!"
2002-09-07
"I just wanted to thank you so much for the great product and speedy service I  received from Weaknees. The fact that you sent the drive out the same day I  payed for it is incredible(Not to mention sending me the tracking number for  peace of mind). Once the drive arrived, it took me one hour to install it and get it up and  running. It really was SO easy. And for anyone else thinking of buying from  you I would say two words. SO Simple...and this is coming from someone who  had never even seen the inside of a piece of electronic equipment.  SO thank you again. I really apreciate it and I wouldn\'t hesitate to  recommend you to anyone."
2002-09-04
"I was going to write you all and thank you for the wonderful buying experience. The only "pain" in the whole process was waiting for the hard drive to come all the way across the country. I live in Virginia and I never thought it would get here... coming all the way from California. Anyway, my testimonial is this was the greatest investment I ever made...I installed the drive in 30 minutes and had my beefier TIVO fired up 5 minutes later (the instructions were perfect!) Ahhhh, the joy of not having to immediately delete everything after we watch it!!!  Thanks!"
2002-08-29
"[M]y TiVo works great and I have let my friends know about your great service. Thanks for your quick response."
2002-08-29
"I found you thru a co-worker. His Tivo died (hard drive) and he used you  to not only get back in action, but to upgrade to a larger drive size. He  said it was VERY easy to follow the instruction and so that is how you got  the order."
2002-08-29
"I followed your detailed, easy to understand installation instructions, plugged in my formerly 35-hour DirecTivo, and voil\xef\xbf\xbd! 149 hours! Thanks for a great product-- you are true professionals."
2002-08-29
"Hi Guys - Your product works great and is being recommended to others."
2002-08-28
"Just wanted to say that the drive worked spiffy and my TiVo is happy again. Thanks, especially from a former TiVo engineer."
2002-08-22
"Hi, I just finished installing the tivo hard drive replace kit for my sony SAT T60. It installed, booted and updated to the latest software without any problems. I am really glad that I found your site on the internet. Thanks a lot!!! I will tell all my friends, who have tivo, about you."
2002-07-31
"Hi... Just got my order. Just wanted to let you know that it was almost enjoyable to do the upgrade. Everything went smoothly and your instructions were pleasantly well-written. Maybe you should write computer software manuals. I was up and running easily within 15 minutes. Thanks for the great service you provide....[N]o problem if you want to add my comments to your website. It is so nice to see a product that matches its advertisement."
2002-07-31
"I got the drive and installed it, works great!"
2002-07-26
"Good Morning. Recently, I purchased and installed the 300 hours upgrade package in my, just out of the box, AT&T; Tivo recorder. The directions were clear and easy to follow, it took less than 30 minutes for me to install the new hard drives and have the unit up and running, it works great, no problems what so ever, 85 hours of best quality video recording time and 306 hours recording time total now. I am very glad I came across your web page, Oh by the way, the price for the upgade package is excellent. Thanks for increasing my Tivo viewing pleasure."
2002-07-23
"Have received my Tivo, and it is all set up, and now in perfect working order. Many thanks for your expertise and swift turn around. Best Wishes"
2002-07-13
"Our order arrived and works very well. The installation was simple. You  have another satisfied customer. Thanks."
2002-06-24
"I have received and installed my TiVo upgrade -- Thank you so much! Everything works perfectly and your product and service is excellent as advertised. I have noticed that my TV is sharper and the colors are more vivid, is this possible? I am a very \'hard sell\' and I investigated your company every way possible before sending in my order. Please feel free to use me as a reference at any time."
2002-06-10
"Hi, This is just to let you know that the TiVo upgrade arrived, was installed in 10 minutes and works great. TiVo with over 140 hours recording time. And I didn\'t even lose the recordings which were already on the disk! Thanks"
2002-05-29
"Hi, The upgrade worked like a champ. You do excellent work. I will be sure to tell all of my friends who have Tivo about your site. Regards"
2002-05-20
"Hi Guys Sorry I did not email sooner - things have been busy! Especially now that I can TiVo to my little heart\'s content... Your claims are 100% true - this was easy, fast and the best way to do an upgrade! My TiVo runs perfectly again and I love it! Thanks for the help."
2002-05-08
"I received my 200 hour (2 drive) upgrade today and installed in less than 20 minutes. Thanks for great service, Torx driver, and excellent instructions. All is working great."
2002-05-01
"I just got my tivo (and my life!) back from you guys. . . Thanks again for the quick turnaround!"
2002-04-19
"You guys are geniuses. Thanks for the great replacement/upgrade drive. ... I love you!"
2002-04-15
"Thanks for your help. If I have any friends that need an upgrade, I\'ll send them to you!"
2002-04-15
"Just wanted to thank you for the great job you did on my Tivo. Life is good  again. I\'ll pass your name on..."
2002-04-05
"I have to say that I have been enormously impressed with your professionalism, conscientious and ethical approach, expertise and committment to customer service. I know that you spent like ten times the usual number of hours on this one - and I really appreciate it. If you ever need a reference for a prospective customer, I would be happy to provide one. Thanks again."
2002-04-03
"Guys: You asked for feedback with my order. Well, your shipping was prompt and earlier than I expected, which is a good thing. The new hard drive was extremely easy to install. Your instructions were clear and to the point. The whole process took about 20 minutes at most. I enjoyed doing business with you and would recommend Weaknees to anyone. Regards,"
2002-03-30
"Dear Weaknees, Don\'t take this the wrong way, but I think I love you! Thank you so much for fixing my poor Tivo. It worked perfectly out of the box and is so much better than before. The extra $30 to have you do the install was CHEAP... especially considering what I retard I am with electronic equipment. Thank you so much for your fantastic and PROMPT service. I will recommend you to anyone who is considering upgrading their Tivo - and I know a few now that I\'ve raved about it to all of my friends and convinced them to become part of the Tivo community.  Thanks again from another VERY satisfied customer"
2002-03-15
"Received it today. Installed it in 30 minutes. Works great."
2002-02-18
" Thanks muchly for the drive fix! Works like a charm. Now, all I have to do is find out how to make Tivo dialout at 230AM instead of 3pm and im all set! Thanks again!"
2002-01-26
"Michael, I finally got around to installing the drive you sent me. You know how it is "if it isn\'t broke don\'t fix it." I\'m happy to report that my Tivo works great. Thanks for all your help."
2002-01-03
"Dear Gentlemen, Just installed my new hard drive and all seems well, I appreciate your prompt service. Will contact you in the future if I, or any of my friends have any TIVO needs. Thank you for making a great product 105 hours greater!!!"
2002-01-03
"You guys rock! I ordered the HD late Thursday afternoon, got it on Friday, got it installed (pretty easy), powered up, and was back in TiVo heaven... Everything was reprogrammed before bedtime. AND I\'ve got more recording space. I thought the world came to an end when my TiVo\'s hard drive died... but everything\'s back to normal now--and BETTER. Glad your company exists. Thanks for speedy shipment and well-written install instructions. Phew!"
2001-12-17
"Michael - I bought a 203 hour unit back from you in July. I am very happy with it. Thanks. I would like to buy two more (which I figure are 196 hours since 2.0)."
2001-07-24
"Hey guys, The TiVo has been great and is running trouble free. Thanks"
2001-06-19
"Just got my TIVO and  ran home to plug it in  Thanks"
2001-04-26
"Just wanted to let you know my Tivo arrived and is working great. I would leave you positive feedback -- but this was not an Ebay transaction. ;-) Feel free to use me as a referral if you do more off-Ebay deals."
2001-03-03
"Dear Folks,This is just a short thank-you note about your product. I purchased a replacement hard drive for my Sony Tivo unit. The instructions were very clear and the pictures were helpful. Overall, the installation took less than 5 minutes to replace the original hard drive with the new one, and I had absolutely no problems with this at all! I would eagerly recommend your company to anyone who wants to upgrade their TiVO unit. Thanks again for making the process easy and bulletproof. Regards,"
2001-02-12
"I ordered a 91 hour Tivo from Weaknees on 2/2 and received the unit on 2/8. Spent this past weekend playing with it and am so glad I decided to make this purchase and that I found you on the web (since finding Tivos in stores has been difficult, if not impossible!)...  Again, thanks for an excellent shopping experience. I will definitely recommend Weaknees to my friends interested in purchasing a Tivo."
\n\t\t1 - 929 of 929 comments \n\t
ll orders are eligible for FREE shipping! We use UPS and USPS (free ground shipping in 48 states - 
932-5633)
\xc2\xa9\xc2\xa02000-2017; WeaKnees.com. All Rights Reserved. Certain product images are \xc2\xa9\xc2\xa0TiVo Inc. All Rights Reserved.
How to Get the Best Picture Quality
How to Get TV on the Road
How to Watch NBA Games on TV
How to Get Internet in Your RV
How to Get Internet in Your Boat
he Best DVRs for Cable TV and O
We don\xe2\x80\x99t like wasting time, so we compared the best DVRs from TV providers and third parties for the most efficient use of lazy-time possible. 
11/29/2017
We considered over 200 DVRs and compared features such as storage, playback controls, recording abilities, cost, and whole-home connectivity.
he Best DVRs for Cable TV and O
We ran through a list of over 200 DVRs and weighed features important for average users. We sought out enough storage so you don\xe2\x80\x99t have to mess with it very often (if at all), enough connections to power each of your TVs, and special features that make it easy to get in and stay in the zone. Of course, there are costs and other considerations, but we\xe2\x80\x99ve focused on what makes a DVR worth your time.
Best DVRs for Cable TV and O
Whole-home connectivity (getting service to each TV)
While there are plenty of great options, and a lot come directly from cable TV providers, it turns out the best DVR is 
Best Cable TV DVR \xe2\x80\x94 TiVo Bolt+
What we love about the TiVo Bolt+
It\xe2\x80\x99s no shock the original DVR champion reigns supreme. 
We love skipping commercials on the top 20 channels with SkipMode. Other DVRs may have fast-forwarding, but you end up missing the beginning of the scene, rewinding, then fast-forwarding\xe2\x80\xa6it gets tedious. SkipMode skips that part of TV.
QuickMode is great because you can breeze through a show 30% faster with audio at regular pitch. If you spaced out during dialogue or a plot explanation, you can quickly back up and catch it without re-watching the whole thing at regular speed, plus no helium voices!
What we can\xe2\x80\x99t love about TiVo Bolt+
If you want Over The Air signals (which we cover below), the Bolt+ won\xe2\x80\x99t work. The standard version, 
, does, but it comes with 1 TB less storage and two less tuners. TiVo Minis are a bit expensive at $100 per unit, so connecting your whole home could be pricey.
he only other negative to the cable-only 
, you can expect average DVR service costs of $15 per month, or you can opt for a longer contract (either year or lifetime) that will save you money. A year costs $150 total, saving you $30 overall. Or if you\xe2\x80\x99re willing to commit to a \xe2\x80\x9clifetime plan,\xe2\x80\x9d you can pay $550 once up front, which hits our cost-effective mark at about three years.
If you don\xe2\x80\x99t want to fuss with your equipment, and if you want something that works and will hold its value, this is definitely the way to go.
Best TV provider\xe2\x80\x99s\xc2\xa0DVR \xe2\x80\x94 DISH Hopper 3
, takes things up a notch. Hopper boasts 2 TB of storage, records up to 16 streams, and connects up to 7 TVs from the main unit. Plus, it saves us time with commercial skipping, voice control, and remote finder.
What we love about DISH Hopper 3
It has by far the most storage as well as the most useful features from a provider DVR. Hopper has 2,000 SD hours, which is a ridiculous amount\xe2\x80\x94 perfect for binge-watching shows like 
. If you\xe2\x80\x99re a fan of HD, 500 hours is nothing to scoff at either\xe2\x80\x94you can record and watch over 160 different 3-hour-long indie flicks from IFC, HBO, or Sundance Channel.
If you\xe2\x80\x99re looking for Over-the-Air recording (free broadcast signals that can be picked up by antennas), you will need a separate USB antenna, but other than that, the 
\xc2\xa0jump(!) out is its special features: AutoHop, voice control, and remote finder. AutoHop skips commercials with a single button, no guesswork needed. The voice control remote means you don\xe2\x80\x99t have to select and type individual letters into your search, while the remote finder is a lifesaver for anyone who has spent more time looking for the remote than watching their show.
What we can\xe2\x80\x99t love about\xc2\xa0DISH Hopper 3
It\xe2\x80\x99s hard to say anything negative about the 
, since it has just about everything that we need from a DVR. Perhaps because it\xe2\x80\x99s the current gold standard, we don\xe2\x80\x99t have much to complain about\xe2\x80\x94except that we wish it was absolutely free.
Who should get the DISH Hopper 3?
If you\xe2\x80\x99re looking for a new DVR, the 
. While the extra terabyte of storage might sound nice, it\xe2\x80\x99s not that practical to purchase a new DVR for that reason\xe2\x80\x94just add an external hard drive if you need more.
Best DVR for Sports \xe2\x80\x94 DIRECTV Genie
ports fans love DVRs. According to a survey from Thuuz Sports,\xc2\xa085% of sports fans record their games, and 75% of those do so consistently.
We like to pause the game to grab snacks or use the bathroom, but DVRs are also great when life interrupts your flow, and you need to help someone in with the groceries or drop the kids off at practice. Plus, if you\xe2\x80\x99re coming home late from work or just want to avoid ads, you can start recording, give yourself 5\xe2\x80\x9310 minutes of prep-time, hit play, and watch the game \xe2\x80\x9clive\xe2\x80\x9d with all the conveniences of playback control, despite being offset from the rest of the world just by a bit.
What we love about the DIRECTV Genie
90-minute
, you can also pause and rewind live HDTV for up to 90 minutes, so even if you forgot to set the recording before you went to work, you can still catch up. Instant replay goes six seconds back, so you don\xe2\x80\x99t have to wait for the highlight reel, either. You\xe2\x80\x99ve got a 30-second fast-forward button that cuts past ads, boring halftime shows, and scoreless runs.
Watching multiple games is easy with picture-in-picture. 
, you can keep your phone as a second screen.
What we can\xe2\x80\x99t love about\xc2\xa0the DIRECTV Genie
nother minor complaint is the included remote control isn\xe2\x80\x99t equipped for voice recognition. While you can use a device like your phone or tablet, we\xe2\x80\x99d prefer the dedicated unit to have this feature. That way, we can use our spare device to look up other things, like player or game stats\xe2\x80\x94or pizza delivery services near us.
ny of the DVRs on our list could work for sports, sure, but if you\xe2\x80\x99re a football fan, 
unner-up cable DVR \xe2\x80\x94 XFINITY X1 Cloud DV
he on-demand library replaces titles often enough for users not to get bored. The other little conveniences 
It\xe2\x80\x99s funny how a simple feature can really improve your mood. While the 
With the NBA finals, it\xe2\x80\x99s a lot simpler to just say \xe2\x80\x9cNBA playoffs\xe2\x80\x9d than searching for channels or individual teams. Plus, the 
, XFINITY Stream, and if we want to transfer to the big screen, we can just plug in the HDMI cable. Plus, if we\xe2\x80\x99re watching something on our phones or tablets, the time-shifting feature saves a lot of time and guesswork.
What we can\xe2\x80\x99t love about\xc2\xa0the\xc2\xa0XFINITY X1 Cloud DV
Mobile features aren\xe2\x80\x99t flawless, and we\xe2\x80\x99ve had issues with latency and image quality at times. Also, the on-demand library is greatly reduced. Plus, only the most recent 60 hours of recording are available on the cloud, so it\xe2\x80\x99s not quite a solution to limited storage.
Who should get the X1 Cloud DVR?
, we don\xe2\x80\x99t see any major reason to switch to a different DVR. While more storage and special features would be nice, the 
Best budget DVR for OTA \xe2\x80\x94 Tablo 2
o storage, no HDMI out, but it works and it\xe2\x80\x99s cheap! The 
, you can watch on six devices and record two shows at the same time. Plus, you get a few of the same benefits as the higher-end DVRs like commercial skipping and scheduling recordings from anywhere
What can I watch over the air?
In our area, we found OTA networks like CW, PBS, PBS Kids, and then a handful of movie and shopping channels. A lot of people will find value in being able to tap into news networks and local sports. Couple that with the big four (NBC, CBS, ABC, and FOX), and you can build a decent library\xe2\x80\x94even more so if you use a streaming device to connect the 
What we can\xe2\x80\x99t love about\xc2\xa0the Tablo 2
2\xe2\x80\x99s
lso, you do have to get separate equipment (assuming you don\xe2\x80\x99t have it already).
While we prefer the idea of a simple setup and having access to every channel we desire, the 
, but want more than just a Netflix or Hulu subscription.
What do I need to use the Tablo 2?\xc2\xa0
WD 2TB Elements Portable External Hard Drive
oshiba Canvio Basics 1 TB Portable External Hard Drive
ote: You can also use the web-based app and your computer connected to your TV via HDMI. For laptop users, this is an easy workaround.
Capacity is measured in megabytes (MB) or gigabytes (GB)\xe2\x80\x94and more is always better. 500 GB seems to be a good starting point for storage, but remember that the ratio of storage compared to recording hours isn\xe2\x80\x99t the same across brands. If you run into storage issues, most DVRs have an eSATA port for an external hard drive.
Just to give you an idea, here\xe2\x80\x99s our personal 
lways go off of specified hours, even though those are only estimates by the company and will vary based on programming.
ecording is pretty universal across DVRs: either choose a single episode or select an entire series to record. This means you won\xe2\x80\x99t have to set up your DVR every single week to keep up with 
\xe2\x80\x94just once. Some DVRs even automatically record recommendations based on your viewing. 
For more information, see the FAQ below.
Make sure the number of recording and watching streams covers your needs because if you have five people in your house and only four streams, someone is going to have to compromise. With the 
, you can get up to 16 recordings going at once (which is ridiculous). When you use additional units like the Joey, Genie Mini, or TiVo Mini, you\xe2\x80\x99re increasing the number of individual streams to TVs, but rarely (if ever) do these devices add storage.
While pausing and rewinding are standard, fast-forwarding is a little less common because of licensing agreements. Companies make money from ad revenue, and advertisers pay only if they see results. Thus, TV service providers agree to disable certain content from fast-forwarding.
hat being said, we absolutely love when fast-forwarding is available. Better yet, we love when we can skip immediately to the end of a commercial. TiVo has SkipMode and DISH has AutoHop, both of which automatically go to the end of a commercial and remove the guesswork on your end, preventing possible spoilers\xe2\x80\x94or at least some frustration.
Basically, we want to make sure you get DVR service for every TV in your home. This ability has no standard industry term, so we\xe2\x80\x99ll call it whole-home connectivity.
ccording to the US Energy Information Administration, the average number of TVs per household is 2.3 TVs per house.
ach company has its own way of providing whole-home connectivity, so unless this is your main concern, we recommend picking your DVR based on storage and other features.
While the number of TV sets per household is declining, actual programming viewership is up. More people are just watching television on their mobile devices like phones and tablets. Experts estimate most households use an average of seven connected devices every day.
Over 55% of people consider mobile DVR service to be very important.
Personally, we often use our tablets and phones to stream content from 
, Netflix, and YouTube Red. To give you an idea, we\xe2\x80\x99ve included a screenshot from XFINITY\xe2\x80\x99s mobile on-demand interface.
It\xe2\x80\x99s easy to use, has all the info you need, and allows you to turn on closed captions and Spanish overdubbing easily. You can also \xe2\x80\x9cpush\xe2\x80\x9d the video to your big screen when you\xe2\x80\x99re tired of holding up your phone or when the whole gang needs to watch.
Whether you use your mobile device as a (voice) remote, schedule recordings while away from home, or just like having mobile and offline access, this is one of the best parts of modern TV.
OTA is short for Over the Air. In many locations, you can receive free (HD) programming\xe2\x80\x94all you need is an antenna. It\xe2\x80\x99s a great way to save money and still keep up on the big networks, as well as a few movie channels and family favorites like PBS.
With three broadcast towers within 50 miles, we could get an antenna with that mileage range for under $30 bucks. You can check out the 
1byone 50 Mile Range Amplified HDTV Antenna
, or if you need a greater range, the 
While Over the Air isn\xe2\x80\x99t perfect for everybody, fans of network TV and sports can find a lot to watch. The following DVRs on our list are OTA compatible: 
hose planning on using a DVR for more than three years should consider purchasing it up front. Renting is a better option for up-to-date technology, replacement equipment, and non-committed users.
With third parties, part of the cost consideration is whether or not you\xe2\x80\x99re going to stick with the same TV provider for a few years. While you may potentially have access to a better-brand DVR if you switch services, it\xe2\x80\x99s nice knowing you have a reliable DVR no matter which provider you end up with\xe2\x80\x94a big reason why we picked 
We\xe2\x80\x99ve noticed the industry average cost per month is around $15 bucks, so\xe2\x80\x94
o if you can choose a DVR for three years for under $540, you\xe2\x80\x99re saving more than the average DVR user. This doesn\xe2\x80\x99t take into consideration costs like repairs, maintenance, or upgrades, and it is also possible for subscription rates and fees to increase.
Going wireless with your additional units can keep your place looking tidy and minimal. We\xe2\x80\x99d opt for this to prevent drilling holes and running cables through walls.
VRs aren\xe2\x80\x99t just the VCRs of the future
ome people might not want to fuss with a DVR, but they don\xe2\x80\x99t know the power it holds. You can become the curator of a vast library of TV, control time with a remote (or even your voice), and instantly pull-up sport stats with a single button. Keep in mind, you can do all this on your couch. Future\xe2\x80\x99s here, folks\xe2\x80\x94it\xe2\x80\x99s time to get a DVR.
 Cloud DVR\xe2\x80\x99s storage is based on a company\xe2\x80\x99s server, but it is accessible by users just about everywhere. Think of it as \xe2\x80\x9coff-site\xe2\x80\x9d storage for your DVR, which means you can switch devices and keep your library.
Can I expand my storage with a hard drive?
Most DVRs can expand their storage. Make sure it has a SATA port if you\xe2\x80\x99re planning on adding an external hard drive.
We\xe2\x80\x99d like to know what you think or if there\xe2\x80\x99s something you\xe2\x80\x99d like covered, so let us know in the comments!
verage Number of Televisions in US Homes Declining
Households Now Use an Average of Seven Connected Devices Every Day: Report
We ran through a list of over 200 DVRs and weighed features important for average users, such as storage, playback controls, recording abilities, cost, and whole-home connectivity. 
"Our team makes recommendations after thoroughly researching products and services for your home. When you purchase something we've recommended, the commissions we receive help support our research."
\n                      Digital Video Recorder and Streaming Media Player - 4K UHD Compatible - Works with Cable.                    
3 Ways to Watch the NBA with NBA League Pass
Find the best TV providers in your area.
tay updated on the latest products and services anytime, anywhere.
 The information featured in this article is based on our best estimates of pricing, package details, contract stipulations, and service available at the time of writing. All information is subject to change. Pricing will vary based on various factors, including, but not limited to, the customer\xe2\x80\x99s location, package chosen, added features and equipment, the purchaser\xe2\x80\x99s credit score, etc. For the most accurate information, please ask your customer service representative. Clarify all fees and contract details before signing a contract or finalizing your purchase.
Our mission is to help consumers make informed purchase decisions. All content remains unbiased and uninfluenced by external compensation including, but not related to, ratings, rankings, and opinions. Our affiliate compensation allows us to maintain an ad-free website and provide a free service to our readers. For more information, please see our 
ll Content \xc2\xa9 2017 Reviews.org. All Rights Reserved.
\r\n  Customize the HTML layout for your page.\r\n  The CONTENT placeholder will be replaced by Digital River dynamic content.\r\n  Must not include < html >, < head > or < body > tags.\r\n  
his site is intended for demonstration purpose only. Actual products will not be shipped.
his site is intended for demonstration purpose only. Actual products will not be shipped.
\r\n                  Your shopping cart is currently empty.\r\n                
\r\n                                                                    ClearStream 4 Extreme Range DTV Antenna w/ CJMount\r\n                                                                
\r\n                                                                    TiVo Roamio Pro DVR with Montly Subscription\r\n                                                                
\xc2\xa0Layout: ProductDetailsPage, Generated: Thu Nov 30 02:32:59 CST 2017\xc2\xa0
Watch live or recorded shows at home or on the go.Download a one-hour show in as little as 15 minutes
Watch live or recorded shows at home or on the go
ownload a one-hour show in as little as 15 minutes
Control show playback with pause, 30-second skip, instant replay\xe2\x80\x94just like your TiVo
\r\n          \xc2\xa9 2016 TIVOInc. All Rights Reserved\r\n        
Intel 8th Gen Core Mobile Performance Review: Kaby Lake R Explored
MD Ryzen Mobile Benchmarks And Performance: Taking On Intel In Laptops
MD Launches Ryzen Mobile Combining Zen And Vega To Take On Intel In Powerhouse Laptops
Intel 8th Gen Core Mobile Performance Review: Kaby Lake R Explored
MD Ryzen Mobile Benchmarks And Performance: Taking On Intel In Laptops
MD Launches Ryzen Mobile Combining Zen And Vega To Take On Intel In Powerhouse Laptops
op Tech Gift Ideas For Black Friday And Cyber Monday Shoppers
"NVIDIA Star Wars TITAN Xp Collector's Edition Review: The GeForce Is Strong With This One"
Intel Hires Former AMD Exec Raja Koduri To Spearhead High-End Graphics Group
Intel Z270 Motherboard Round-Up: MSI, Gigabyte, And ASUS Offerings For Kaby Lake
MD Announces X300 And X370 AM4 Motherboards For Ryzen Processors, All Chips Unlocked
Gigabyte Z170X-Designare Motherboard Review: Affordable, High-Tech, Great Performance
Intel Optane SSD 900P Review: The Fastest, Most Responsive SSD Yet
oshiba TR200 SSD Review: Affordable SATA Solid State Storage
Crucial BX300 3D MLC SSD Review: Affordable, Durable, Solid State Storage
Logitech MX Ergo Wireless Trackball Review: Untethered, Precision Mousing
Classic Amiga Gets Modernized With Custom Amy-ITX Motherboard Project 
utonomous Smart Desk 2 Review: A Premium, Programmable Sit-Stand Wonder
ell Inspiron 27 7000 All-In-One Review: Rocking AMD Ryzen And Radeon
ell XPS Tower Special Edition (8930) Review: A Coffee Lake-Infused Sleeper Rig
xclusive: Ryzen Threadripper 1950X Performance First Look With Alienware Area-51 Threadripper Edition
ell Inspiron 27 7000 All-In-One Review: Rocking AMD Ryzen And Radeon
treacom DB-4 Silent Kaby Lake Media PC Build: The Sound Of Silence
xclusive: Ryzen Threadripper 1950X Performance First Look With Alienware Area-51 Threadripper Edition
VIDIA SHIELD Tablet Powered In-Car Infotainment System DIY Project Guide
Gigabyte Brix S GB-BSi5HT-6200 Ultra Compact SFF PC Review
ew Matter MOD-t 3D Printer Review: Low Cost, User-Friendly Creation
MINIX NEO Z83-4 Fanless Mini PC Review: Affordable, Dead-Silent Media Streaming
Origin PC Chronos Review: A Powerful Small Form Factor Desktop PC For 4K Gaming
Gigabyte BRIX Gaming UHD Review With Teardown And Rebuild Action
Qualcomm Centriq 2400 Server Chip Takes On Intel Xeon In Cloudflare Benchmark Gauntlet
Qualcomm Ships First 48-Core Centriq 2400 Server Chips To Take On Intel In The Data Center
MD Snowy Owl Platform To Take Flight With EPYC 3000 Series Processors
quantia Launches Multi-Gigabit NICs For Enthusiast-Class PCs and Professional Workstations
VIDIA Volta-Powered DGX-1 And DGX Station AI Supercomputers Debut At GTC 2017
Intel Kaby Lake Xeon E3-1200 Family Takes Flight
Qualcomm Centriq 2400 Server Chip Takes On Intel Xeon In Cloudflare Benchmark Gauntlet
Qualcomm Ships First 48-Core Centriq 2400 Server Chips To Take On Intel In The Data Center
MD Snowy Owl Platform To Take Flight With EPYC 3000 Series Processors
ProtectWise Builds Security As A Service Platform With DVR Playback And Jacks You Into The Matrix
VIDIA Launches GeForce NOW Game Streaming Service
mazon Echo Review: Introducing Alexa, Your Digital Assistant
Veteran Security Analyst Warns Windows 10, Even With Tracking Off, Still Tracks Too Much
Microsoft CodePlex Open Source Repository Closing, Devs Urged To Embrace Github
Microsoft Rolls Out Wake On LAN For Easier Remote Windows 10 Updates
Intel 8th Gen Core Mobile Performance Review: Kaby Lake R Explored
MD Ryzen Mobile Benchmarks And Performance: Taking On Intel In Laptops
Lenovo ThinkPad 25 Anniversary Edition Review: Retro Style, Modern Performance
Intel 8th Gen Core Mobile Performance Review: Kaby Lake R Explored
op Tech Gift Ideas For Black Friday And Cyber Monday Shoppers
MD Ryzen Mobile Benchmarks And Performance: Taking On Intel In Laptops
LG V30 Review: Setting The Record Straight For A Great Smartphone
Google Pixel 2 And Pixel 2 XL Review: Perfecting Android
Moto Z2 Play Review: A Refined Battery Life Champion Returns
Microsoft Surface Pro (2017) Review: Still Setting The Bar For 2-In-1s
Lenovo ThinkPad X1 Tablet (2nd Gen) Review: A Nimble, Business-Class Convertible
VIDIA SHIELD Tablet Powered In-Car Infotainment System DIY Project Guide
op Tech Gift Ideas For Black Friday And Cyber Monday Shoppers
"ASUS ZenFone AR Review: World's First Google Tango And Daydream VR Equipped Smartphone"
Huawei Mate 9 Review: A Well-Appointed Android Device, At A Bargain Price
"Ataribox Joystick Breaks Cover And It's As Beautifully Retro As You'd Expect"
"NVIDIA Star Wars TITAN Xp Collector's Edition Review: The GeForce Is Strong With This One"
"Destiny 2 Gameplay And Performance Review: A PC Gamer's Delight"
tarCraft II: Wings Of Liberty Is Now Free-To-Play, Here\xe2\x80\x99s How To Get It
VIDIA SHIELD TV, Google Assistant And Samsung SmartThings Form A Powerful Smart Home Trio
VIDIA SHIELD Tablet Powered In-Car Infotainment System DIY Project Guide
"Ataribox Joystick Breaks Cover And It's As Beautifully Retro As You'd Expect"
"NVIDIA Star Wars TITAN Xp Collector's Edition Review: The GeForce Is Strong With This One"
tarCraft II: Wings Of Liberty Is Now Free-To-Play, Here\xe2\x80\x99s How To Get It
inder Users Outaged As Machine Learning App Scrapes And Exposes 40,000 Profile Photos
Merriam-Webster Adds \xe2\x80\x98Sheeple\xe2\x80\x99 To Dictionary Citing Apple Fans As Prime Examples
witter Getting Rid Of The Default Egg Profile Picture That Has A Bad Actor Reputation
iVo Launches Bolt Vox And Mini Vox DVRs With Voice Control And 4K Playback
, streaming sticks, and media casting dongles over the past few years. To keep up with the times (and an ever growing field of competitors), 
"\nThe TiVo Bolt Vox comes with the new remote control. It is the flagship DVR in TiVo's lineup and combines the company's most powerful DVR with the popular online streaming services. Both it and the TiVo Vox Mini are largely unchanged from their "
, except for a color change (black instead of white) and native voice support, a feature that TiVo is pushing hard as part of a unified experience.
\n"With our new on-screen experience and Vox Remote, scrolling through endless TV guides and painstakingly entering search terms is finally a thing of the past," said Malone. "Bolt Vox is the only platform that combines the complete pay TV experience with major OTT services into a single user experience, on one input, controlled by one remote, with unified voice search across multiple sources."
\nThere are three storage options for the Bolt Vox, starting with the 500GB model ($200) that can record and store up to 75 hours of HD footage. Next up from that is a 1TB model ($300), which doubles the recording capacity to up to 150 hours of HD footage. Both it and the 500GB model feature four tuners for recording up to four shows simultaneously.
\nThe beefiest model checks in at 3TB ($500), which is enough storage to record up to 450 hours of HD content. This one also ups the ante with two additional TV tuners so users can record up to six shows at the same time.
"\nLikewise, TiVo's Mini Vox ($180) is an upgraded version of the non-Vox Mini. It is smaller than the Bolt Vox and extends the functionality of the primary set-top DVR to other TVs in the household. And like the Bolt Vox, it supports "
xisting TiVo Bolt, TiVo Roamio, and first generation TiVo mini customers can purchase the new remote by itself for $40. Unlike the upgraded boxes, it is available in both white and black color options.
ll of the new products will be available on October 29 from TiVo and Amazon, the latter of which is 
Intel Core i9 Mobile And 9th Gen Coffee...
op Tech Gift Ideas For Black Friday And...
op Tech Gift Ideas For Black Friday And...
Best Ethereum Mining GPUs - A Benchmark...
6 TB Hard Drive Round-Up: WD Red, WD...
Intel SSD 750 Series PCIe SSD Review:...
MD Ryzen Review: Ryzen 7 1800X, 1700X,...
Google Promises Fix For Pixel 2 And...
\nThis site is intended for informational and entertainment purposes only. The contents\nare the views and opinion of the author and/or his
\nassociates. All products and trademarks are the property of their respective owners. Reproduction in whole or in part, in any form or medium, without express written permission of HotHardware.com, LLC. is prohibited.\nAll content and graphical elements are
\nCopyright \xc2\xa9 1999 - 2017 David Altavilla and HotHardware.com,\nLLC. All rights reserved. 
iVo Bolt Adds Smart Commercial Skips, Speed-Watching
iVo Bolt Adds Smart Commercial Skips, Speed-Watching
iVo is certainly facing competition these days, with set-top boxes, TVs and consoles all offering a variety of smart and/or 
, introduces a couple new features that show TiVo still has gas in the tank, even with new Apple TVs and other inventions on the horizon.
he TiVo Bolt is\xe2\x80\xa6odd-looking. It has a strange, warped appearance that may have looked cool in concept but gives it a half-baked appearance as a final product. But once set up, the fun begis: This set top box can handle a lot of basic DVRing features, but its big news is a couple new abilities.
First, Bolt uses SkipMode to automatically and smartly skip commercials seamlessly, a feature that consumers have wanted pretty much before the TiVo even existed. Second, there\xe2\x80\x99s a new QuickMode feature that speeds things up by around 30%, but keeps voices smooth and low so you can listen without being irritated by the chipmunks. TiVo hints that this will be handy when catching up on DVRed sports games.
Other, more ordinary features include notable 4K support for the latest resolutions, OneSearch to search for shows immediately across all apps and channels, access to web apps and variety of smart streaming services, and up to 4 simultaneous recordings at once. There\xe2\x80\x99s a choice between 500 and 1,000GB TiVo Bolts.
he new features are welcome, but it comes back to what we have said about TiVos before. If you don\xe2\x80\x99t already have one, there are plenty devices that can take their place, including an 
, an Apple TV, A Roku, and other various consoles, 
, and cable boxes. But if saving a lot of shows at once is important, of it you already have a TiVo, then the Bolt may be a must-buy. Those new features add more value to DVRing than we\xe2\x80\x99ve seen in quite a while.
Of course, there\xe2\x80\x99s also the price. The Bolt costs around $300, pretty high for a cable box, although that does include a year of TiVo service. The 1,000GB version costs $400 if you want the upgrade.
"When he isn't enjoying the beautiful Northwest outdoors, you can find Tyler on business and tech sites, writing about the latest news, analyzing trends, and generally making the Internet a more interesting place."
Moxi Add Triple Tuner DVR To Their Arsenal And Drops Pricing By Up To $300
ivo Premiere Officially Announced, Is It The Tivo We\xe2\x80\x99ve All Been Waiting For
Get Tivo Shows on your iPod Video
chostar T2200S Is The First SlingBox Loaded DVR Box For Cable
isclosure: Some, not all links, earn us a small affiliate commission. All content remains unbiased despite these relationships.
ime Warner HD Box Firmware Upgrade Rocks! - Acts Faster, Smoother and Stronger
ivo On Comcast Gets More Official (video)
urn Your iPod Into A Digital VC
he Hauppauge 1212 HD-PVR High Def Video Record Available for Preorder
VR Rated The Must Have Gadget, World Wide
amsung MediaLive Extender To Arrive October 15
ew Tivo Interfaced Gets Leaked and Pulled
ivo Adds Netflix Streaming To Three Devices, Tosses In HD Movies
Gadget Leak: Netgear Digital Entertainer Elite EVA9000 Pricing Revealed
"Mivx Rolls Out A PVR, Couldn't Get Witty On The Name: MivxPVR"
ling Media Announces Sling Player Mobile For The iPhone
CES: Tivo Search Functionality for HD Boxes Hands On (video)
CES: Tivo Paused TV Ads & Dominos Ordering Walk Through (video)
ony Unveils The BRX-A320, A DVR Built For Bravia TVs
Blockbuster On Demand Coming To A Tivo Box Near You
Moxi MR-1500T3 HD Digital Video Recorder Hits Amazon, But Is It A Good Alternative To Tivo?
chostar T2200S Is The First SlingBox Loaded DVR Box For Cable
Moxi Issues Software Update, Enables Hulu, Netflix, Rhapsody And More
Lacie Refreshes LaCinema Black HD Media Player, Replaces With Black RECORD & PLAY
ivo Might Be Coming To Time Warner, Please Say It Is So
3 Gadget Of The Year Award Goes To Humax Foxsat HD
Moxi Add Triple Tuner DVR To Their Arsenal And Drops Pricing By Up To $300
"Tivo Premiere Officially Announced, Is It The Tivo We've All Been Waiting For"
lingMedia Working On iPad And Windows 7 Compatible Player
50 Channel DVR From Snapstream Is An Intervention Waiting To Happen
Logitech Revue Box Price, Release Date And Accessories Announced
ivo Unveils Premiere Q and Preview Boxes, Records up to 4 HD Sources Simultaneously
Win an Elgato EyeTV HD from GadgetReview
lingbox Now Compatible with WD TV Media Players
"TiVo's New Roamio Frees You From The Chains Of The Couch"
"Slingbox's New Hardware Makes Watching TV Anywhere Easy"
ling TV To Add EPIX Channels and VOD for Movie Buffs
iVo Stream: Mobile Streaming for All Your TiVo and Live TV
iVo Bolt Adds Smart Commercial Skips, Speed-Watching
\nis home to some of the best consumer reviews online on top gadgets ranging from the best gadgets to the top home security systems, the best satellite tv networks and top ten product comparisons. Do you want to make an educated buying decision and shop online with confidence? 
U.S. Markets open in 3 hrs 35 mins
2,631.00
23,997.00
6,320.25
1,284.00
iVo Bolt: Speed, More Speed, and Instant Ad Skipping
In the beginning, the TiVo set-top box was just a digital video recorder. You\xe2\x80\x99d look over a list of upcoming TV shows and movies on the channels you get, and click Record for each one you want to capture. You didn\xe2\x80\x99t know or care what time or channel they\xe2\x80\x99ll be on.\xc2\xa0
hen, on playback, you\xe2\x80\x99d skip 30 seconds at a time, fast-forward, and so on, using the world\xe2\x80\x99s best-designed remote. Virtually overnight, TiVo made old-school VCRs obsolete.
here\xe2\x80\x99s a new TiVo model now, called the Bolt. It still does all of that. But you\xe2\x80\x99re probably thinking what everyone\xe2\x80\x99s thinking: \xe2\x80\x9cNobody watches TV anymore! Everything\xe2\x80\x99s available online; who needs a TV box?\xe2\x80\x9d
h, but TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s been thinking that, too. So the Bolt is conceived as a clever hub for the whole 
ight now, the Bolt can search and play back shows from Netflix, Vudu, Amazon, Comcast or Cox on demand (if you have it), and, of course, whatever TV channels you get. It can also play music from Spotify, Pandora, Plex, and IHeartRadio. There are apps for YouTube, AOL On, Yahoo Screen, and others.
Hulu is coming soon, says TiVo, and it\xe2\x80\x99s working to get the on-demand services of other cable companies. Don\xe2\x80\x99t count in seeing the online movie stores from Apple or Google showing up, though.
he point is, if you search for a certain movie, the Bolt shows you everywhere you can get it. Similarly, if you select a series, the Bolt assembles a playlist of all episodes, all seasons, ready to play, regardless of which services they come from.
It can list, record, and play back 4K (ultra HD) shows, too, like the ones available from Netflix and Amazon.
Plenty of boxes attempt to consolidate all 
movie services: Roku, Apple TV, Fire TV, Chromecast. But the TiVo Bolt also incorporates 
V, the kind most Americans are still paying a cable service to receive.
he least likeable thing about the TiVo Bolt, if you ask me, is its design. It\xe2\x80\x99s a tiny white plastic rectangle\xe2\x80\x94that part\xe2\x80\x99s fine\xe2\x80\x94that\xe2\x80\x99s 
iVo says that that design is partly for ventilation, but mostly to look striking. Well, it\xe2\x80\x99s striking, all right\xe2\x80\x94but it means that you can\xe2\x80\x99t put any other components on top of it. Or you can, but they\xe2\x80\x99re tilted, which could mean vague psychological distress every time you sit down on your couch and see it.
s with other TiVos, this one requires that you replace your cable box with a CableCard. It looks like a metal credit card and goes into a slot in a compartment under the TiVo. You have to request one from your cable company, but there\xe2\x80\x99s a nice payoff: You get rid of a remote control, you eliminate a box and its associated cords, and you may save a couple bucks a month in box rental.
If you\xe2\x80\x99re not bent out of shape by the Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s being bent out of shape, the next pill to swallow is the TiVo Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s price: $300 for the box with a 500-GB hard drive, or $400 for a 1-terabyte drive. Plus, starting in the second year, you have to pay a monthly $15 fee. (You can also pay $150 a year\xe2\x80\x94a $30 annual savings. Or you can pay a one-time $600 and be done with it.)
You do get a lot for that money, however. This is a premium box for premium couch potatoes.
It doesn\xe2\x80\x99t heave and sigh and think every time you press a button on the remote. Apps like Netflix open in the time it takes you to pour a can of soda, not the time it takes to make popcorn.
ll the guts are better than on the last model, the Roamio: 3 times the memory, gigabit Ethernet, 802.11ac WiFi, the ability to stream video to other TiVos in the house using its built-in wiring, and so on.
he on-screen design is improved and streamlined, too. The remote uses RF (radio frequency) waves instead of infrared, so it doesn\xe2\x80\x99t need be line of sight with the box. And if you\xe2\x80\x99ve lost the remote, a button on the Bolt itself makes the remote play a little tune so you can find it.
You can now play back shows at 1.3 times their actual speed, too, without affecting the pitch of the audio. (You hit the Play and then Select buttons on the remote to turn this Quick Mode on or off.)\xc2\xa0
1.3X is a good choice. It gets you through a 60-minute show in 46 minutes without turning the TV characters into chipmunks. The musical tempos are a little faster, and there\xe2\x80\x99s a certain overcaffeinated quality to people who already talk fast. But for sports, awards shows, and Kubrick movies, it\xe2\x80\x99s fantastic.
nd then there\xe2\x80\x99s the Big Ticket Item: You get the ability to skip entire blocks of ads with a single button press.
It\xe2\x80\x99s a spectacular feature. You\xe2\x80\x99re watching a show; the first ad comes on; you press the D button; and 
you\xe2\x80\x99re back into the show, at the exact spot where it fades in after the last of the six commercials. (If you 
to see the ads, the channel up/down buttons jump to the beginning or end of each ad block.)
iVo is wading into dangerous, network-baiting waters. Ad-skipping technology is part of what killed off TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s onetime rival, ReplayTV. And this TiVo feature sounds almost identical to the Autohop feature of Dish satellite boxes, which quickly ran into legal challenges from ABC/Disney, CBS, NBC, and Fox.
Both ad-skipping services (Dish and TiVo) are available only for national, primetime shows. In TiVo\xe2\x80\x99s case, the ad-skipping works only on shows recorded from 4pm to midnight, on the 20 top channels. In your list of recordings, a SKIP logo appears on the names of shows for which ad-skipping is available.
o why not all shows, all the time? Because\xe2\x80\x94get this\xe2\x80\x94like Dish, TiVo has employees who watch these shows and 
you. That\xe2\x80\x99s why the ad-skipping feature isn\xe2\x80\x99t available until shortly after a show has been broadcast; it isn\xe2\x80\x99t in place yet if, for example, you\xe2\x80\x99re watching the beginning of a show while the end is still recording.
ish semi-lost its legal battle with CBS, agreeing to make ad-skipping available only a 
after the show\xe2\x80\x99s broadcast; for ABC/Disney, three days after.
But TiVo argues that its ad-skipping feature should be more palatable to the networks, because it\xe2\x80\x99s not automatic. You have to press that D button each time a block of ads comes up. Therefore, TiVo says, it\xe2\x80\x99s\xc2\xa0basically just a streamlined version of fast-forwarding, which is perfectly legal.
iVo has another weapon, too: Dish was forced into its ad-skipping compromises because it\xe2\x80\x99s also a broadcaster, which TiVo is not. The networks threatened to withdraw Dish\xe2\x80\x99s permission to broadcast their shows\xe2\x80\x94leverage they don\xe2\x80\x99t have against TiVo.
But we\xe2\x80\x99ll let the lawyers straighten all that out. For now, the TiVo Bolt\xe2\x80\x99s Skip technology works fantastically. The only heartbreaker is that it\xe2\x80\x99s not available on all shows. It\xe2\x80\x99s never available for news or sports; sometimes, it\xe2\x80\x99s even missing from the national primetime ones that are supposed to work. (On my Bolt review unit, ad skipping works great on Fallon, but Colbert\xe2\x80\x99s show isn\xe2\x80\x99t ad-skippable.)
If you have a TiVo in one room, you can multiply it to other rooms with the addition of a TiVo Mini ($150, no monthly fee). A Mini connects to a second TV, but shows the contents of the main TiVo elsewhere in the house.
here\xe2\x80\x99s a cluttered but powerful app for TiVo for your iPhone, iPad, or Android gadget. It lets you (1) schedule and manage TiVo recordings from afar, (2) operate as a remote control for the TiVo, (3) view detailed dossiers about actors and movies, (4) play live TV anywhere in the house, (5) play anything your TiVo has recorded anywhere in the house, and (6) download TiVo recordings to your phone or tablet.
hat downloading business is great for times when you\xe2\x80\x99ll be without fast Internet (a plane, a raft in the middle of the ocean), or when you\xe2\x80\x99d rather not eat up your cellular data plan. And why 
you be allowed to carry some shows and movies from your cable subscription with you? You\xe2\x80\x99ve paid to watch them, haven\xe2\x80\x99t you?
In November, TiVo says, the Bolt will be able to stream 
hen early next year, you\xe2\x80\x99ll be able to watch your TiVo recordings on the road, from across the Internet. And by the middle of next year, you\xe2\x80\x99ll be able to watch any of your 
V channels from the road. In other words, the Bolt will become like the Slingbox.
I\xe2\x80\x99m a hardcore, long-time TiVophile, and I want this thing.\xc2\xa0Its speed, its software layout, its consolidation of both cable and Web services, its playback stunts, its ad skipping, its ability to set your recordings free from the box in the living room\xe2\x80\xa6Now more than ever, TiVo is the closest thing we\xe2\x80\x99ll get to a time machine.
But I also wish the Bolt didn\xe2\x80\x99t have so many footnotes: features coming soon, features that work only on Comcast or Cox, features that work only on 20 channels.
iVo is working on most of those limitations, of course. Here\xe2\x80\x99s wishing good luck to its engineers, its dealmakers, and its lawyers.
Because you know what? This machine will be awesome, once a few of its quirks get\xe2\x80\x94you know\xe2\x80\x94straightened out.
avid Pogue is the founder of Yahoo Tech. On the Web, he\xe2\x80\x99s davidpogue.com. On Twitter, he\xe2\x80\x99s @pogue. On email, he\xe2\x80\x99s poguester@yahoo.com. He welcomes non-toxic comments in the Comments below.
 couple bought one of the most exclusive streets in San Francisco for $90,000 \xe2\x80\x94 now the city is making them give it back
"Here's what the Senate Republicans' tax plan means if you're making $25,000, $75,000, or $175,000 a year"
Putin Offers $8.6 Billion to Families as Russia Nears Election
People Hope Ann Curry Is Basking In The Glow Of Matt Lauer Being Fired
Facebook is trying to make it easier to be a better person
2018 Jeep Wrangler: The iconic off-roader, with new innovations
PN is laying off 150 people today
raceAhead: Matt Lauer is Fired, Doing The Math on Sexual Harassment, Undocumented in Hollywood
Meghan Markle Leaves Beloved Rescue Dog Behind as She Prepares to Live in Britain Full Time
Mark Cuban: Bitcoin is more of a collectible than a currency
"AT&T CEO says they'll invest 'at least ' $1 billion and create 7,000 jobs if tax reform passes"
"Trump\xe2\x80\x99s 'forgotten men and women' are still forgotten"
"8 Facts And Rumors About Matt Lauer's Wife, Annette Roque \xe2\x80\x94 And Their Tumultuous Marriage"
nap Inc. co-founder fires shots at Facebook
"TODAY'S CHARTS: Regal reveals possible merger; Chipotle pops on CEO search; Autodesk's messy turnaround"
"Supreme Court's newest justice invokes John Adams in high-profile cellphone case"
"Bitcoin's price is collapsing and people can't trade because 2 big exchanges have crashed"
"FDA clears AliveCor's Kardiaband as the first medical device accessory for the Apple Watch"
"New iPhone Leaks Reveal Apple's Small Surprise"
"There's little to stop the U.S. economic growth engine: NYSE trader"
othing about the FAANG stock rally is normal
"Matt Lauer Made at Least $100 Million Before NBC Fired Him. Here's What We Know About His Money"
"China has 'grave concerns' about North Korea's latest mis..."
Cut your food budget in half with these 10 money-saving tips
"Why Loki Probably Won\xe2\x80\x99t Turn Against Thor (Again) in 'Infinity War'"
&P, Dow open higher on tax bill hopes
he dark history of Pocahontas, whose name Trump keeps evoking to slam Elizabeth Warren
"How Much Is Matt Lauer Worth? The Fired 'Today' Host May Have Been the Highest-Paid Anchor Ever"
he lowest-priced brand-new, unused, unopened, undamaged item in its original packaging (where packaging is applicable).
ecent sale price provided by the seller
\xe2\x80\xa2 Returns accepted - 30 days money back
"Connect TiVo BOLT to your 4K TV and stream content in Ultra High Definition resolution with spectacular, eye-popping color and detail3. HDMI out: v2.0 (4k 24/60, 1080p, 24/60). Finds, organizes and gives you instant access to every available episode of any show you want to watch, whether it's on TV or streaming services like Netflix and Amazon Prime Instant Video2."
at, Dec 9 - Wed, Dec 13
iVo - Bolt 4K UHD 500GB DVR and Streaming Media Player
iVo BOLT 500 GB DVR Old Version - Digital Video Recorder and Streaming Media
IVO BOLT TCD849500 Unified Entertainment System DVR 500G 4K \xe2\x80\x91 White  NEW
iVo BOLT 500 GB Unified Entertainment System 4K - DVR + Streaming Media Player
W! TiVo BOLT 500GB 4-Tuners 4K UHD DVR with *Lifetime All-in Service Plan* FS!
iVo BOLT 500 GB Unified Entertainment System 4K - DVR + Streaming Media Player
iVo BOLT Digital Media Streamer  TCD849500  white
lide {CURRENT_SLIDE} of {TOTAL_SLIDES}- Compare similar products
oku Premiere + Digital HD Media Streamer
mazon Fire TV with Alexa Voice Remote Digital HD Media Streamer
Google Chromecast (2nd Gen) Digital HD Media Streamer
he TiVo Bolt 500GB Unified Entertainment System lets you explore and stream content from apps like Netflix, Amazon Prime, and Pandora, by connecting to the Wi-Fi. This powerful device lets you save up to 75 hours of recorded HD content in its 500 GB hard drive. You can connect TiVo Bolt to your TV and watch content in Ultra HD resolution. It can easily pair with Apple iOS 7.0 or later and Android 4.1 Jelly Bean or later.
712880624008,
851342000261
Great picture on my Vizio 4K TV
"First thing to notice is the excellent picture. Next thing is the the One Pass feature that let's you select shows for recording the whole season. I don't have much 4K content due to internet bandwidth limitations in my area, but the Tivo Bolt does a much better job of up-converting 1080P content. Also streaming shows are much better on Netflix and Hulu than using the built-in Vizio apps.\nThe only con is I occasionally have a brief blank out of the screen, but I can't say for sure that it is the Tivo or the TV."
It has nice features but does not seem to stay connected to the tuning adapter as well as previous models do.  I often turn on that TV and have nothing currently on any station as if it cannot see the stations until they are changed and can again hook up with the tuning adapter.\n\nOne would think by this time the SDV problem would have been resolved so no tuning adapter was needed.
lim and lightweight with lots great features...
lim and lightweight with lots great features...
"I have 2 TiVo Premiers and was excited to get a new updated faster TiVo. It is a little faster but I can not call it a Unified Entertainment System. As a stand alone DVR it works good. The DVR is now slower than the Premier DVR after 2 TiVo mini's were paired with it.  I recommend this 4 tunner model only if you use it as a stand alone DVR."
"Product is easy to use and full of features.  Just be aware will require subscription to Tivo.  Will allow for Tivo mini's to coo ect to Bolt free. Would highly recommend for those wanting to cut cord or save money from cable provider."
sk buyers and sellers about this product
lide {CURRENT_SLIDE} of {TOTAL_SLIDES}- Explore Buying Guides
8 Reasons to Invest in a Media Player for TV
oku LT Vs. Western Digital WD TV Live Plus
Best Selling in Internet & Media Streamers
rending price is based on prices over last 90 days.
pple TV 4K 32GB Digital HDR Media Streamer
Google Chromecast (2nd Gen) Digital HD Media Streamer
mazon Echo Dot 2nd Generation - Black
pple TV 4th Generation 32GB Digital Media Streamer
mazon Fire TV Stick with Voice Remote Android TV
rending price is based on prices over last 90 days.
BRAND NEW SEALED Apple TV 4K 32GB Latest Version MQD22LL/A 2017 
Google Chromecast 2 Digital HDMI Media Video Streamer 2nd Generation Newest Hot
BRAND NEW Amazon Fire TV Stick with Alexa Voice Remote IN HAND READY TO SHIP
mazon Echo Dot 2nd Generation w/ Alexa - Black BRAND NEW
mazon Fire TV Stick with Voice Remote Android TV
mazon Fire TV with Alexa Voice Remote Digital HD Media Streamer 2nd Generation
iVo USB Home Internet & Media Streamers
iVo Wi-Fi Home Internet & Media Streamers
iVo HDMI USB Home Internet & Media Streamers
iVo TV/Video Home Internet & Media Streamers
"This item doesn't belong on this page."
Copyright \xc2\xa9 1995-2017 eBay Inc. All Rights Reserved. 
\nDebugging Info for Theme support: \n\nTheme: Propulsion\nVersion: 2.6.1\nInstalled: propulsion\nAviaFramework Version: 2\nML:128-PU:7-PLA:9\n
"Atlanta's best choice for Home Electronic Systems & Design "
Leviton Security & Automation (formerly HAI by Leviton)
4K Home Theater and Golf Simulation Rooms
4K Home Theater and Golf Simulation Rooms
he new TiVo BOLT is bringing it all together, with unified television.
he TiVo BOLT is the shortest distance between you and your entertainment, because it combines all your options into a single box. No more switching devices, toggling inputs or juggling remotes. Whether it\xe2\x80\x99s from TV, available on-demand libraries or streaming apps like Netflix, Amazon Prime, HULU, YouTube or Pandora, TiVo BOLT delivers it all in an instant.
Find movies and shows with unified search.
OneSearch\xe2\x84\xa2 scours multiple platforms like TV and Netflix simultaneously, so your search experience is always fast, simple and seamless. No more drilling down into each app and doing multiple hunt-and-seek searches. Find shows and movies by title, actor, director or keyword\xe2\x80\x94and start watching in seconds.
o more waiting for commercial breaks to be over. With a single press of a button, you can continue watching your recorded show. SkipMode works with the top 20 channels, including ABC, CBS, NBC, Fox, AMC Comedy Central, Discovery Channel, TBS, FX, TLC, History Channel, TNT, The CW, Food Network, USA, Bravo, ABC Family, Syfy, Lifetime and HGTV.
QuickMode\xe2\x84\xa2 speeds up your shows by 30%.
QuickMode lets you zip through your recorded shows\xe2\x80\x94and shows with a buffer\xe2\x80\x9430% faster than normal speed with pitch-corrected audio. You zoom along and nobody sounds like a caffeinated chipmunk. It\xe2\x80\x99s the ideal way to power through slow-moving news shows, sports and long-winded political debates.
ecord up to 4 shows at one time and watch in 4K.
iVo BOLT can handle the biggest entertainment jones. It records up to four shows at once and provides up to 1 TB of recording capacity\xe2\x80\x94enough for roughly 150 hours of HD programming. Need even more? Add an external hard drive or a TiVo-ready NetGear ReadyNAS. And if you\xe2\x80\x99ve got a new 4K Ultra HD TV, then get excited, because TiVo BOLT is 4K-compatible right out of the box.
Get the most out of your cable service with our best box ever
Only TiVo delivers all the entertainment you love from TV and the web in one box. Yes, it\xe2\x80\x99s the most advanced DVR ever built, but it\xe2\x80\x99s so much more. It\xe2\x80\x99s all the TV, movies, music and web you want, on your TV.
and delivers your cable channels. Premiere does the rest, delivering on-demand movies, web videos, music and more through your broadband Internet connection.
\nIf your client does not subscribe to expanded digital cable service, a CableCARD may not be required at all. TiVo Premiere DVRs work with any analog cable (i.e. basic or expanded basic) source right out of the box and, of course, with ATSC antennas (for standard and high definition over-the-air signals). However, in order to receive certain HD and digital channels from the cable provider, a CableCARD is required.
How Do I Get and Install a CableCARD?
\nYour customer will need to request a CableCARD from their cable company. Most will not issue or release the card without the customer\xe2\x80\x99s personal authorization, and some cable companies actually require that one of their technicians come to the home and install the card. However, many cable companies will simply hand over the card for customer installation. Remind the customer that they can actually return the old cable box or DVR and that the CableCARD rental fee, which ranges from free to $11/month, is less expensive than the embedded cable box rental fee they are currently paying.
\nWith the TV on and the cable input connected to the TiVo box, insert the CableCARD into the CableCARD slot (with TiVo Premiere, it\xe2\x80\x99s on the back of the box).
\nWhen the decoder information screen appears, select \xe2\x80\x9cconfigure CableCARD\xe2\x80\x9d and then \xe2\x80\x9cCableCARD menu\xe2\x80\x9d.
\nCall the cable company (if you haven\xe2\x80\x99t already) for card initialization \xe2\x80\x94 you\xe2\x80\x99ll need to provide them with the appropriate numbers from the configuration screen. Be sure to inform the cable company operator that you\xe2\x80\x99re activating a TiVo DVR.
Looking for a simple way to get your video output to multiple displays for your installation?
iVo has you covered by making all three video outputs \xe2\x80\x93 HDMI, component, and composite, simultaneously \xe2\x80\x9chot\xe2\x80\x9d.
his means you can feed one TiVo box to up to three different displays without the need for splitters \xe2\x80\x93 and if you DO use splitters, the TiVo box carries support for up to 16 HDMI licenses.
njoy all of your TiVo content via any video output type simultaneously.
\nLink Your House is a TiVo Certified Dealer-call 770-209-0086 to learn more.
2015-2016
770-209-0086
866-656-5465
9am-6pm
01/27/2016
"SAN JOSE, CALIFORNIA -- I've had a TiVo Premiere since 2010; I had a series 2 before then. Earlier this week the cable company made a change in the channel lineup; no big I just have to re-scan on all of the TV's. Unfortunately, my wife went to re-scan on the TiVo and just told it to scan and didn't tell it to delete all the channels. We ended up with duplicate channels; one that works and one that doesn't. "
"If you're watching live TV it's annoying, but you can keep trying until you hit the one that works; for recording it's a crapshoot if you'll get a blank screen. No big deal, you delete all the channels and then re-scan and it works. Only when you go to hit three thumbs down and hit enter to confirm deleting it just takes you back to the previous screen."
o I contact support via chat, their preferred method. They try to blame my network and they want me to "reset my network". When I ask what they mean by that they want me to power cycle my cable modem and wifi router. Keep in mind, I\'m chatting with them online, so this will break the session. Second, why would a TiVo need a network connection to re-scan for channels. As they requested I did restart the TiVo and while it\'s restarting he kept asking if either of the channel scan options worked. 
"I explained three times that scanning always worked but the option to delete never did. After the third time, when I explain the TiVo is still restarting (it does take forever, but this is TiVo support). He then closes the case and disconnects. Frustrated, I call support and after a half an hour they decide that I should wipe my TiVo and reset it up. I assume that will work, but when I ask about them fixing the channel scan so future changes don't necessitate wasting over half an hour re-entering settings and I'm told there is nothing to fix."
"I contacted the executive relations team since I had their information from a problem last month and I was basically told I was wrong. Today I got a call back and I was told that the delete option was working as expected. When I asked what the point of having a menu entry that does nothing, she claimed that it would delete the channels. First, it doesn't delete the channels -- and yes I've re-tested that just to confirm. "
"Second, what's the point of having a DVR with no channels configured (if you were getting rid of it, you'd want to wipe all settings, not just channels). So my expected behavior that it would delete channels and rescan, the behavior that its exhibited for over five years, makes more sense. TiVo's response was just that I'm wrong."
"This is particularly frustrating as I have had this issue off and on for the last five years. I've open numerous cases about it -- typically explaining that I had resolved my immediate solution by using a different remote, using the android app, or wiping it and starting over. I was told that they have no record of my ever opening a case about this issue. They also said that I never contacted support earlier in the day as there were no open cases. "
"Since I mentioned contacting them a month ago, on Christmas Eve we most of our channels quit working. Support tried blaming the cable company, but they confirmed that my signal strength was good and I didn't need to re-scan for channels on any of my Tv's or on my MythTV setup. After four hours, only the last hour of which did I see any actual troubleshooting (checking signal strength etc), they said I had two options: buy a new TiVo or get a cable card. They couldn't guarantee that either would work since they didn't know what was wrong. Since they sell a device they are responsible for both the hardware and software, so I didn't find that acceptable. "
"I eventually talked to someone from their Executive Relations Team who said that a cable card isn't compatible with my current cable package so that's not even an option. He said that I have the newest TiVo that will work with the service that my cable company currently offers. So neither of those were solutions. Since he took weeks to get back to me, I had fixed the problems myself. I'm not sure which steps are necessary, but I un-plugged the TiVo and waited a couple of minutes. "
"After starting up it did't work. I then deleted and re-scanned for channels (in the one step, that I expected to work this month). Disappointed that we still had the issue of channels not working, I deleted and re-scanned for channels. While that didn't work, it did result in just 15 channels which is about how many were working. "
"I then went into the menu where you can hide channels that you don't actually get (you might get a signal, but it might be encrypted etc) just to confirm all the channels I should had were still checked. They were, but when I backed out of that menu, there was a long pause. After that, I had all of my channels back. Thus it appears it was a software glitch and that's consistent with none of my other devices having an issue at that time."
"Throughout this process I was told various things that really convinced me this company just doesn't understand their customers. The best example is when I commented about having to re-scan every couple of months despite none of my other devices needing to indicating that it wasn't a change made by the cable company, I was told that TiVo's require a much strong signal then a TV. That decision was made since they are recording. Also, the signal strength ever drop below that, the TiVo just drops the channel until you re-scan. "
"Think about that for a second; say you are watching your show and something happens and the cable drops out for five minutes. Instead of just losing that five minutes, you know must re-scan which can take awhile. Why would that be the desired behavior from my perspective? TiVo just argued that it was because you wouldn't want inconsistent recordings, but I'd argue something is better than nothing. There are other issue like I don't get any program data for my HD-channels. TiVo has said it's my cable provider's fault for not providing proper information on those channels. That may be true, but SchedulesDirect gets it correct for my MythTV box."
"At the end of the day, my MythTV setup has been more reliable, less work to setup and maintain (and that's with SchedulesDirect refusal to automatic renew, so there's a manual renewal every year), it has more features (you can have multiple backends -- that is tuners -- and multiple frontends that all cooperate), and overall is just a better product. "
ven the lack of customer service is an improvement over the TiVo\'s customer support whose actions scream "Please don\'t be our customer", who have yet to solve one of my problems, and who have REALLY annoyed me (seriously, get them some basic customer service training -- interrupting me every time I try to talk is not cool).
05/14/2015
I am very displeased by your service... Brief summary... Check case**. I bought a DVR from Walmart, the device was defected so I had to return the item even though I wasted a lot of time. Waited approximately 10 days for the new device... Received it yesterday, I was unable to change the TSN in my account on the web. Thus had to call in. This is what I was told..."When you placed your order via the website, the order and details of the order were placed in an older customer database (this took over 45 minutes to figure the issue)." After talking to a supposed manager the solution was..."We have escalated your ticket to be resolved ASAP but I have no idea how long that will take."
I was on the phone for 75+ minutes trying to become a CUSTOMER!!! RIDICULOUS!!! Today I get home and tried use the device because I receive an email with a survey on my experience... I am still unable to use the services I paid for weeks ago!!! I also paid for a full year!!! I asked for a refund and this was not an option. I am fed up and will be posting this in every avenue possible as I sit here on hold for 10+ mins... I also received an email saying my email address has been changed. NOW I CANNOT ACCESS MY ACCOUNT...
10/16/2012
"LOS ANGELES, CALIFORNIA -- I have been a subscriber to TiVo's service since 2001, and I would have considered myself one of their greatest advocates... until recently. Now, I am fast becoming one of their greatest detractors. I upgraded to the TiVo Premiere in July 2010. It worked fine... until TiVo deployed its updates. Although TiVo's Marketing Director suspects I received a defective unit, the machine worked perfectly for about 1-1 1/2 years before gradual deterioration set in, following a major software update. "
I will be the first to admit that, when it works properly, TiVo is phenomenal. BUT, when it FAILS, one has no other recourse but to launch the machine from a catapult atop a tall skyscraper. If your TiVo unit fails, and you have filled it with (hundreds of) hours of recorded programs, you will be faced with the following ultimatum: Cough up another $250-$400 to replace your machine and LOSE all your recorded programs; or, retain your recorded programs and learn to live with an expensive \xe2\x80\x93 and bulky \xe2\x80\x93 paperweight. Unless you plan to continue paying the monthly service fee for the second unit, once deactivated, your old unit will lose all its recordings. 
"So, if you have accumulated a volume of recorded programs and, especially if you added the DVR Expander for additional recording capacity, you will be wishing you hadn't if you ever have to replace your machine. Oh, and don't even consider TiVo's networking feature of transferring programs between machines \xe2\x80\x93 most programming, these days, is copyright-protected and, as such, these programs may NOT be transferred between TiVo DVRs, even if they reside within the same household. Perhaps TiVo should change its slogan to: \xe2\x80\x9cTiVo \xe2\x80\x93 OUR WAY OR THE HIGHWAY!\xe2\x80\x9d"
BEWARE, if you begin to experience the following: 
ecently, I recorded a movie at midnight. When I awoke the next morning, I looked for my recording in the "My Shows" list but, guess what? It wasn\'t there, so I reviewed my recording history and, sure enough, there it was listed as "Deleted"; according to TiVo, it was deleted because its time had expired and the space was required for another program. 
It provided an exact time for that other program, but NOTHING was recorded at that given time on my TiVo; in fact, NOTHING AT ALL was scheduled or recorded after the deleted midnight program, and my TiVo indicated that I still had 24 hours of space available for recordings (the deleted program was a mere 2 hours).
Ironically, TiVo now requires more micromanagement from me than the old TV/VCR combination ever did! Back then, I could set my VCR to record something, come home from work (or wake up in the morning) and... voila!... my recording would still be on the tape and would play back beautifully. Hmmm... Technology is good; progress not so...
Oh, and on another note, TiVo service in my area was down for several hours on two separate occasions. I contacted TiVo\'s so-called "customer service", only to have what I already knew confirmed. They assured me that my bill would be discounted for those lost hours, but did I see any such discount on either respective bill? In a word, NO! TiVo reps are NOT TO BE TRUSTED. I\'ve got a life, but TiVo just doesn\'t get it!
My biggest beef with TiVo (and other DVR services) is that, ten years ago, I paid $400 for a DirecTV/TiVo DVR and I OWNED the machine. I did not have to return it to TiVo, because it was COMPLETELY MY OWN PROPERTY. Now, one still has to fork over roughly the same amount, but the machines are leased ( i.e. NOT owned) by the consumer.
nd this brings me to my next point: I still OWN my 1st and 2nd TiVo DVRs, on which I can continue to view my recorded programs, even if their recording capability is no longer available. It\'s similar to having a library of DVDs without taking up valuable shelf space. But, after deactivation, the recorded programs on the TiVo Premiere will be no longer accessible. People "buy" DVRs, obviously, to record hours of programming, so they can "watch television when they want to watch it". 
"In what world does it make sense, then, to require people to return (or deactivate) their machine when they need to replace it with a new one, only to lose hundreds of hours of programming? So much for watching \xe2\x80\x9cTV your way\xe2\x80\x9d. In a nutshell, TiVo lets you watch TV when it decides to let you watch TV. In an analogous situation, should I be paying a monthly fee to Sony? After all, I still own and view my VHS tapes, loaded with programs recorded using my Sony VCR. (And, actually, many of the programs on my old VHS tapes look 10x better than the same programs recorded off digital cable/satellite \xe2\x80\x93 I've tried both \xe2\x80\x93 onto my TiVo DVRs)."
I do have to give some credit to the Marketing Director for his response to a similar review I posted elsewhere and for his efforts but, on behalf of TiVo, he cannot offer an amenable solution to my situation. Suspecting my current TiVo unit to be defective, he sent me a replacement machine, on the basis that I would transfer the programs from my old machine to the replacement and, then, return the old unit to him. And he gave me two months overlap time, for both machines to remain activated, to do so before returning the old machine. This would have been no problem, if I could actually transfer my hundreds of hours of recorded programming between machines. 
"All the programs on my current machine, however, appear to be copyright-protected, so they cannot be transferred from one machine to another, even if both machines reside in the same household ( i.e. on the same network). And, thanks to TiVo's heavy promotion of its large capacity hard drives (Record up to 300 HD hours with TiVo\xc2\xae Premiere XL4! - Now with 4 tuners, so you can record even more shows!), and the DVR Expander, I have accumulated over 1400 hours of SD programming on my DVR. If I were to keep the new machine, I would lose all that recorded programming! "
I, even, offered to pay the additional monthly service fee for the second machine, if I could keep both machines until I clear the old machine of its programming (by either viewing the shows or re-recording them on the new unit - though many of the shows are rarely re-broadcast and still many more will never be re-broadcast). 
o, after just 2 years of service on my current TiVo DVR, it looks like I will have to fork over yet an additional $250.00 PLUS an additional monthly fee for TiVo service on a second machine, just so that I can record on a (hopefully) properly working DVR, while still retaining the hundreds of hours of programming that I have recorded on my current DVR. On second thought, perhaps I will simply request a new generic DVR from Time Warner Cable (after all, the unit itself is essentially free, since I will only have to pay the monthly service fee, and I had initially returned their DVR when I received my TiVo Premiere) and FORGET TIVO ALTOGETHER!
"IN CONCLUSION, BEWARE: If you are anything like me, and you record a lot of programs on your DVR, you'd better hope and pray that your TiVo NEVER fails. Mine lasted only about 1 1/2 years before it began to deteriorate, thanks to bad software programming/deployment and/or a defective machine. Now, capitalism rears its ugly head as I must empty my wallet again for the sake of TiVo and my own sanity. TiVo - and Capitalism - wins again!"
05/06/2010
"A fair warning about TiVo and why TiVo sucks. Short version: I paid for a lifetime subscription. TiVo cancelled my account, claimed I called and cancelled, and claimed they credited my account. I never called and cancelled my account and they never issued a credit to my credit card. Now I have a useless TiVo machine with no service and I'm out over $300."
etails: I used to always brag about TiVo and have purchased 6 TiVo machines. I have been a TiVo customer for years and currently have three TiVo boxes "running." I have to put quotes around running since TiVo took it upon themselves to turn off one of them, which I paid a lifetime subscription for. I received and email warning and I emailed back to TiVo and even attached screenshot showing I had a lifetime subscription and never received any response. They proceeded to shut off my box. I then had the pleasure of calling TiVo. Should you ever call them, be prepared to be on hold forever. 
fter giving up on two previous occasions, I finally planned my day around it and was able to get through after about 20 minutes of being on hold. The customer service representative was less than helpful. He claimed I called and cancelled my account, which I had not. I explained I had a lifetime subscription and he insisted I cancelled my account and claimed my credit card was credited. My credit card was never credited and I explained that. He then claimed their records showed they issued me a credit and he blamed my credit card company and said I had to take it up with them. I called my credit card company and they confirmed I never received a credit from TiVo.
"I got online with TiVo, which still took about 30 minutes to get a representative. The guy looked at my account and agreed something did not look correct; however, he would have to send it to a supervisor to look at. Even though he did absolutely nothing to rectify the problem, except pass it along, he seemed helpful. He told me someone would call me and I asked if they would leave a message with a number I could call back without being on hold forever, since I don't answer calls I don't recognize, since they're oftentimes sales calls. He said they would leave a number that was a direct line. Did they ever call and so much as leave a message? No."
"Bottom line: TiVo can take your money, claim you cancelled, claim they refunded your money, and leave you with a useless TiVo box and out hundreds of dollars. But they'll make sure they wait a few months, so you don't even have recourse with your credit card company. TiVo SUCKS."
09/06/2009
Before entering into a relationship with TV (tee-voh), carefully consider the difficulty you will most certainly encounter when it inevitably comes time to "break up" with TiVo. After 2 and 1/2 years of being generally satisfied with the service, we realized that our casual and rare use of the service no longer warranted spending the monthly fee to keep it.
fter calling to cancel the service the day my account was billed for the NEXT month\'s service, I had to go round and round with their customer "service" department to cancel the account and get refunded the charge. The charge was indeed refunded in the customer un-friendly time frame of 10-14 days as promised, but unbeknownst to me, the customer "service" representative neglected to actually cancel the account.
o the next month upon noticing an additional monthly charge from TV on my charge account, I contacted the customer "service" department to demand an immediate refund and an explanation for the *unauthorized* access to my card. After 45 minutes on the phone with 3 customer "service" reps including a floor supervisor, I have a cancellation effective NEXT month and a credit coming back to me within the next 10-14 business days. It\'s interesting to me how they can easily process an incorrect - and unauthorized - charge on a Saturday afternoon, but they are unable to apply the corrective refund "because it is a Sunday".
his is a prime example of what I consider a customer disservice provided by an customer "service" department whose sole purpose is to provide a buffer between the customer and the people who create the policies and procedures that generate the dissatisfaction that I and many other TV EX-customers have experienced. Instead of being a highly dissatisfied TV ex-customer, I wish I had known this so that I could have saved myself the aggravation and not been a TV customer at all.
iVo Series 3 - The Truth Is Out There
02/08/2009
"NEW JERSEY -- Like many others - I was delighted with my Series 3 when I bought it in late October 2007 - with the original hefty pricetag. Despite some initial install problems (cable company at the time not comprehending cable cards) - once I got up and running I didn't look back."
"That's until late Jan/early Feb of this year when my S3 began simply coming apart at the seams. Freezing, Rebooting, GSODs etc. Like many others because you have an S3 with cable cards.. the S3 going down leaves you with nothing to fall back on. Despite constant running around replacing HDs, cable cards, cables etc.. all known possible fixes provided by support.. still problems that eventually leaves you feeling like you've just been kicked to the curb with Tivo moving on and no longer caring about their S3 customers. In fact you end up feeling like a nuisance rather than a valued customer."
"After reaching out to other S3 owners. The amount of users having the same problems with their S3's after a roughly 12-14 month period simply astounds me. (If you don't believe me do a google search for Tivo series 3 problems). It really makes me question why the S3 was indeed discontinued.. did Tivo simply get tired of replacing them or handling the endless tech problems? True Tivo can't do enough for you when you are a perspective buyer or a new customer.. but once youve become a long term customer with problems-they are suddenly a lot less unresponsive."
"True, maybe the new Tivo HDs are a lot better.. maybe its only those unfortunate enough to own an S3 who'll be left behind with now very expensive doorstops.. but regardless, based on my own experience.. I will not be looking to Tivo in the future for my DVR needs. Which is sad because I really do believe it was originally a great product and service. But once things went bad with the S3.. and they obviously did.. the number of people left out in cold, and brushed aside after spending so much hard earned money is simply inexcusable, even from a once great company like Tivo."
07/02/2014
N JOSE, CALIFORNIA -- I bought a new TIVO and when I activated it I didn\'t realize I had to call and ask them to cancel service on my old TIVO. I recently realized they have been double billing me for 16 months and when I called to ask them to refund the money from the 2nd billing, they told me that was "against our policy at TIVO." The staff members I talked to (about 5 people total) were all rather arrogant and refused to help me at all because of their "policies."
"The customer service at TIVO is evidently much worse than that at Comcast, a feat I didn't think was possible. I wonder how long this company will be around given the competition for the consumer dollar and MUCH BETTER customer service almost anywhere else. I used to rave about TIVO. No more. Now I'm warning people against it. There are much better options, such as On Demand and other DVRs."
07/03/2009
I signed up for Tivo\'s month to month service, specifically because it said no commitment. My account still says on it no commitment. I called to cancel because my service does not work, and it doesn\'t record. When I call to cancel they said that by "No Commitment" my service plan meant "no commitment AFTER a year long commitment." That they were sorry they made the mistake of putting "No Commitment" on the account, but that that was "no more dishonest than what cell phone companies do." 
ivo is pulling a classic bait and switch, call it "no commitment" even though they ADMIT that it is in fact an iron clad commitment to their service. Their early termination fee of $200 was more than the ENTIRE year long plan that THEY signed me up to. To them NO commitment means that\'s your plan after a commitment. I was ripped off. 
02/27/2014
Let me start off by saying I have been a loyal customer of TIVO since 2006 and have gone to battle many times with friends, co-workers and even strangers, making strong justifications that TIVO was worth the extra cost. Not anymore. The box I purchased back in 2010 has been acting up, so I called customer service to see if there was any cheaper options for longtime customers to purchase the Roamio than the big bucks listed on the website. I was told I could get a whopping $20 of the cheapest $199 option but that there were no other discount or upgrade options for the mid-grade or high-grade Roamio boxes.
"I spoke to the CS agent about cancelling my service and she seemed to think that was OK and didn't care either way. Is this really how TIVO thinks it's going to keep customers now that they have all this competition? I am sorely disappointed in my interaction with this company today... and will be cancelling my service."
12/06/2013
"JERSEY CITY, NEW JERSEY -- I purchased DVR F481 in December 2009. I upgraded to DVR 45C8 in November 2009 but failed to cancel the old service because it wasn't clearly apparent to me that upgrading to a new device would mean to cancel service on the old. I discarded DVR F481. Then in 2011, I upgraded again to DVR 7D92 and discarded DVR 45C8. Again not realizing that I needed to cancel the old service. So as of today, I have paid TIVO close to $1,330.56 in service fees of old devices that were discarded. Yes, you have a policy to call to cancel, I understand that now, however it is not a logical process nor did any of the written material stress this point. "
"From a customer service perspective, TIVO should have offered me either to credit my account or reimburse me the service fees, but you have refused. I also found many other former customers complain about this practice. Some even called to cancel old devices but the cancellation didn't go through and they were subsequently charged for months of service. That says to me that TIVO is OK with making sure people keep paying them for service that they can't even use. Beware."
408-519-9100
408-519-5330
\r\n\t\t\t\t\t\t\tThe most trusted and popular consumer complaints website\r\n\t\t\t\t\t\t
"I have complained previously about the TiVo box I have taping programmes not asked for or taping programmes you have asked to be taped for half the time instead of the whole programme. Previous calls have been with a call centre outside the UK and I have done exactly as they've asked this being to reboot the machine but this has not solved the problem. All I want to do is speak with someone in a UK call centre and for the TiVo box to actually work. I pay hard earned cash for this but get dreadful customer care! I was told by the agent tonight that I would have to pay for a new box but why should I when the one they've given me is kaput!!"
he\n following information represents my opinion of TiVo and its Sales \nSupport personnel based on a situation in which TiVo, in my opinion, \nwronged me. This posting not intended to be malicious, demeaning, \nslanderous, or misrepresenting in any way. It is intended to communicate\n what I believe is a breakdown in integrity and to stress that it is \nimportant for any customer to record calls that are made to TiVo \ncustomer support so that you have a formal record of conversations. The\n following is accurate to the best of my memory, with the final call \nfrom TiVo having occurred less than 1 hour...
"I bought a new TIVO box and activated it through the website. What I didn't realize at the time was that I needed to call and cancel the service on my first box. I thought my account covered whichever version of TIVO I happened to own. Well I learned the hard way (and the $$$ way) that this is not the case. You have to call and cancel your old service in order to avoid being billed twice, even if you only have one box. TIVO has been double billing me for 16 months and once I realized it, I talked to several different people, all of whom steadfastly refused to refund the money from the..."
ivo "LIFETIME" SERVICE IS A RIPOFF!!! It sounds good at first, but the lifetime is only for the lifetime of the box. If it dies prematurely, tough luck, apparently. TIVO will charge a LOT of money to transfer the subscription to a replacement box, even if they\'re the ones doing the replacement! My box died at 2 years. Tivo will replace it for $149, but also wants $199 to transfer the subscription to the new box.\n\nTivo has been losing customers left and right...their subscription base keeps declining each financial quarter. They may not exist in a few years. I understand their desire to...
I bought a TIVO set ($300) and signed up for the service only to find out that my phone company who provides my cable service does not use cards. After spending several months trying to find a workaround (this was not a high priority in my life), I finally realized that the TIVO would not work. When I tried to cancel the service, I was informed that cancellation after 30 days was not possible due to company policy. Needless to say this was news to me. The agent agreed that my inability to connect TIVO and all of the related problems were documented.\n\nI explained I physically could not use the...
I canceled my Tivo service. At the time they offered me the right to call back within 30 days to start service again with a better program. I declined. I disconnected my tivo. I had automatic billing and Tivo did not bill my credit card for two months. Then, after I stopped watching for the charge, they started billing my account again. When I called to complain and indicated how suspicious this looked, they said that I had been offered two months free and that is why the billing started again in the third month. I asked how that could be when he offered me the right to call and reconnect...
fter subscribing to TIVO service for 6 1/2 years, my TIVO box crashed. No repair service was available, as the box was no longer in production. No concession was offered; I would have to buy a new box for around $400. I cancelled the service and switched to Comcast on 2/20/2011. The TIVO rep told me he would give me 2 months free service to "think about it" in case I didn\'t like Comcast. I said I would get I would get back to him if I wanted to reconsider. TIVO resumed debiting my account for April and May. I called demanding a refund for both months, because I was being charged for a...
here is a web site for customers to contact the CEO of TiVo Inc. who are not satisfied with the assistance provided by the customer service department. I wrote the attached letter to the CEO this past Sunday and have not received an answer. I am currently looking for other disgruntled customers who are interested in filing a class action suit against TiVo for dishonest billing practices. I have spoken to a few lawyer friends and there are grounds to challenge the terms and conditions they site gives them the right to keep money for services they know they did not render. My next step is to...
"Purchased an upgrade to the HD Series 3 unit. Actually was defective and failed within a couple weeks. Was told had to pay for shipping of replacement unit and had to pay in advance for the replacement (which really is NOT supportive on how the warranty is covered). When I got the new unit, I was convinced to accept the 90 day grace period to remove all the content from the box and sell or give to someone - not fully disclosing that it starts billing again...!! Then, they won't credit back up to those months it started, and additionaly, state they have a 90 day credit back billing dispute..."
I signed up for TIVO and then found it impossible to install on my system. Took hours on the phone trying to reach them withoout success. I have been charged fdor several months without receiving any service. Then my credit card went stale dated and I thought that woluld be an end to it - but instead they said they had cut off service (which is what I wanted), place my account with a colelction agency and charge me a $200 early cancellation fee.\n\nTher seems to be no way to contact them buy email - which seems to be intentional so you cannot commujnicate and they can continue to bill.\n\nDoes anyone know how to contact them by email?
I have tivo series 2 connected to my directv, I signed one year contract thinking that the services will work as desired 33 days ago i did do some recordings where in tivo just records the channel i am watching which is not the desired way of dvr should be working, when i call tech support i am told thats the limitation of tivo dvr series 2. I just checked yesterday for the programs it has recorded and called in immediately as the cancellation is over 3 days i am out of eligible.\n\nI would like to strongly request i never used tivo services before and its not working as desired so expecting refund if not in full atleast for 10 months or so..
When I purchased my Tivo boxes I was assured that my privacy settings would be respected. I told them how I wanted them set and was assured again that they would be. To my surprise about 6 months later I learned that when you initially set up your Tivo box it automaticly sets you up for a less restricting privacy setting then you were originally told it would be. When I called to find out what happened I was told that I could have easily reset my privacy to the strictest setting by going to messages/settings at the time I set up my box. I pointed out that their were no such instructions to do...
I purchased a Tivo in February. On occasion the video is just freeze. At first I reset (cycled the power) it, but later found that the menu system worked and I could reset it that way. Sometimes just doing a channel up/down would cause it to work. This all tells me that the basic unit is working but that the video interface is getting hung up.\n\nI called customer service to ask for an exchange. I was given all types of reasons that it could hang - low signal, strong signal, etc. I finally asked for a supervisor. After 25 minutes (!!) the same representative came back(!!).\n\nHe advised me on doing...
I called TIVO to cancel there service coonectiong to FIOS, but that I would be moving to a new location which did not have FIOS. At that time I might use TIVO. The lady said I would recieve three months free service if I reconnected at new location, but after three months they started billing me. I have not moved still use HD FIOS and billed for TIVO for a service that is not connected. They are able to tell if the service is connected, try and connect a box, without calling them it does not work.
My Tivo unit refused to update its software. When I called in about this, I was told they would exchange the unit for $50 and my lifetime subscription would transfer.\n\nForward 2 years because there were many family problems and a move to another state. I call back in and now all of a sudden the fee is $349 PLUS I have to pay for service all over again.\n\nI cannot afford that.\n\nShame on Tivo for gouging the public. Since you do not stand behind the products you sell and try to make more money off those of us who already paid for a lifetime subscription by denying it when your box refuses to...
hey were not capable of making a simple credit card information update wich resulted in me having to call over six times and loosing many of my recordings. Not only were they not able to fix a simple problem but the make you wait over an hour just to get to the right person. And after you get to the "right" person, they keep putting you on hold until you\'re reduced to tears from frustration.\n\nThe president of this company should fire everyone in customer service and hire more qualified people.\n\nI will think twice about purchasing any service or equipment from tivo unless you feel like being treated like dirt.
I was given a Tivo for Christmas, I have had the service for 6 months. When first trying to connect to the service to download the guide, I could not get it to connect for the life of me. I called their tech support and they told me a code to use as my dialing prefix. Perfect the service connected and downloaded. \n\nAfter about a month I was getting sick of running a phone cord from one end of my home to the other to connect just so I could have a guide, because I did not have wireless internet at the time. So I recently switched internet companies so I could have a wireless connection. I went to...
"In Feb 2009 my TIVO DVR stopped changing the channel on the Direct TV satellite box. I spent hours on the phone with both companies but there seemed to be no solution. TIVO had me purchase a IR booster from Radio Shack but that did not work. After having a TIVO that didn't work for four months I finally called to cancel my service ($12.95 a month) and they told me I had a contract for another year and I would be billed $150 for canceling. Since their product does not work it seems odd that I have to continue paying for nothing. This company is dishonest."
"After paying for a 1-year subscription to service, the TIVO stopped working. Seems like a normal enough thing to me, so I cancelled my cable (because I don't watch a lot of TV), and went on my merry way. Didn't think that I would continue to be charged $12.95 a month for service I wasn't using. Well, I thought wrong. 14 months later, when I called about the problem, I was told that in my 1-year service agreement, somewhere in there, it told me that I would be automatically renewed to monthly service, without my permission. Beware, customers, because TIVO cannot give refunds, or so I am told. \n\nIs there anything I can do about this?"
fter being a 4 year customer with TiVo and not one missed payment, they refused to credit my account for the monthly payment that they sent through AFTER we cancelled our account!! Their customer service is the WORST I have ever experienced through ANY company and I have had some bad experiences. The supervisor was rude, uncaring and a disgrace to the job title. Beware and NEVER get TiVo through a bank draft!!! And PRAY you never need to talk with their horrific customer service department.
700000 gbp in irish promo uk 2017
How Do I Begin to Save for Retirement if I Have Not Yet Begun?
10 Tips: How to Triumph Over a Job Loss
"Cymraes's Corner \xe2\x80\x93 ~ weird and wonderful blogging from the Welsh marshes troll and fraud"
lesley jackson wales "a traitor to wicccans acow" and "a warlock medusa" scammer and fraud
700000 gbp in irish promo uk 2017
69-Cent
pple Expected to Start Production of a White iPhone This Month
pple Trying to Push for Repeat Downloads of iTunes Music Purchases
\r\n\t\t\tIf you have an inquiry, or any constructive thoughts, creative ideas, and reasonable offers, please,\r\n\t\t\t
